Let me first say I am one of Martha Stewart's biggest fans! I have enjoyed MSL magazine for years and loved the format of the "old" show (the new one is taking awhile to get used to). I jumped at Body and Soul when it first came out, but have been repeatedly disappointed in the obvious exclusion of anything "male" in the articles.  Not to mention, the articles on relationships and love have NEVER mentioned same sex partners which I find totally unacceptable, unforgivable, and just plain stupid from a marketing standpoint.  Why exclude men and gay people?  I have also noticed there are no ads from advertisers marketing to men either. Most if not all of the articles are nothing more than "new age" pablum, either "borrowed" or stolen from much better magazines such as Alternative Medicine.  Don't waste your time or money on this one.  This isn't even good enough to line my cat's litter box</review_text>
This is not the health magazine you'd expect from Martha Stewart -- it's extremely heavy on advertisements (45% at my rough count), and really cluttered, and just not "good". The recipes are interesting,  if you can find them among the aromatherapy and skin-hydration ads</review_text>
Even if you're a "conservative," you gotta admit that this is one of the worst magazines around. If you like good writing, don't even try this one. A "one star" is still too generous in my opinion.</review_text>
Oh those were the days, when I was in college, reading my first issues and then subscribing.  There were great things to be found in its pages, columns by Brian Crozier, Russell Kirk, Erik von Kuenhelt-Leddhin (sp?).  The great struggle with the Soviet Union was going into a critical stage.  It seemed NR was so on the right track.  And it was wonderful to read, at least from about 1979 to 1983.But then it became for a while duller.  It had some periods of recrudescence, such as under the editorship of John O'Sullivan.  But when Rich Lowry took over NR really began to dumb down (nothing personal Mr. Lowry).But what I've really discovered of late is how badly the neo-con agenda has sort have taken over the magazine.  We've got in the 50th Anniversary issue a call by Midge Dector to rally the country to our illegal and immoral war in Iraq.  Really something has happened to the magazine, a sinister force has entrenched itself there.  What is that force?  Well, go to come-and-hear.com and you will begin to learn part of the picture, especially when you read the material by Elizabeth Dilling.  I would also recommend Paul Findley's THEY DARE TO SPEAK OUT, which details the Israeli Lobby's domination of our Congress.NR was once a courageous conservative magazine, but now it has been heavily tainted by the influence of a terrible thing. WFB should know better, and maybe he does.  If he doesn't, then he should pick up NEO-CONNED! and NEO-CONNED AGAIN!, and then he should listen to Tony Martin's talk given to the IHR on a certain group's tactics deployed to suppress free speech.What has inspired me to write this review is WFB's recent column on the incarceration of David Irving.  It ends in a disgusting gloating.  WFB has fallen into an evil trap, and so has the magazine he used to run.  What has happened to the Christian faith of people like Buckley?  He now seems lost and terribly afraid of offending that supposedly saintly interest group...And you, Mr. Lowry, come on now: read widely and deeply and don't be afraid of reading the Talmud and about the Israeli lobby.  Once you do, maybe you'll develop the strength to think outside the box.  We're going to have to do that if we want anything but the bleakest future for mankind and the planet.</review_text>
If you want to keep yourself in delusions and in the dark about what's really going on in the world, read this magazine. National Review is for people who sympathize with Christian jihadists and white supremacists. Wouldn't want to be in that camp if I were you.  Read Time, Mother Jones, The Nation, or the American Prospect instead.</review_text>
I got this magazine as a gift, starting a few months back.  I really can't say I'm impressed.Admittedly, I'm much more left leaning than this conservative (sometimes very, very conservative) magazine.  Dispite my bias, I can still recognize good writing and well made points - this magazine generally lacks both.  This isn't to say that I've never seen a good point or anything, they're just fairly rare.  If you want to read a well-written, well-argued, conservative mag this isn't it</review_text>
This magazine just dares people to pick the most boring, pretentious, or ostentatious feature within any given issue. "Town & Country" is an extremely old money venture, and while it does have some good and useful articles (and lovely advertisements for things that virtually nobody can afford,) much of the magazine is essentially centered on a very elitist worldview that grows very tiresome rather quickly."Town & Country" was initially recommended to me because of ostensibly good coverage of travel and architecture, two areas I have great interest in. As an applicable aside, when I read a list of tips in the offshoot "Town & Country Travel" publication on ways to ease the stress of long range flights, I realized there was a reality check due when one of the first tips was to always fly in first class, ignoring the fact that the vast majority of readers would rather buy a car with what a typical first class ticket to Europe or Asia costs.As I mentioned, there are some good articles, and there are occasionally better and more useful offshoot publications like "Town & Country Travel" that are eminently more readable (although they still insist on advertising things like seven million dollar vacation homes on the coast, etc.) I will say that the photography is always good, and you can believe that if it appears here that it is the finest and most fashionable available: Hyacinth Bucket would, no doubt, like to be seen reading this magazine.Despite having occasionally worthwhile features, I find "Town & Country" to be excessively pompous, therefore I recommend finding another publication focused on whatever area of interest you have, whether it is fashion, society, or travel.</review_text>
Yes, T&C is the oldest continually published magazine in the USA, and it's their 160th anniversary. However, I see little reason to celebrate.  Why? Because I fail to see how it's really improved over the years.Nowadays, this magazine seems to cater far too much to the material lusts of the "nouveau riche". Back in the day when it was a true "high society" magazine, there were rather interesting and educational articles on the arts, literature and culture. It was beautiful and it really gave a person something to aspire to, but now just like so much of the rest of society has mutated into a lot of pretentious materialist wannabees bragging about "bling bling", so has this magazine.There are far too many adverts for so-called "luxury goods" for my tastes, and although they put in a patronizing article about women over age 60 being the new "power" base, they insist on using only THIN 20-something models who probably can't afford the clothes they are modeling!Articles wise, they are starting to sound more like Glamour or Cosmo than the erudite publication I used to enjoy buying on the newsstands 20 years ago.Yes, T&C has changed with the times...but these are not good times if that is the case. It's too bad</review_text>
I received this subscription as a trial, and found it one of the most boring publications that I have ever read.  By the last few issues that I got, I wasn't even looking at the pictures anymore.  There are drawn-out descriptions of their views of the finer things in life, which were very materialistic.  At the end of every issue there were pictures of &quot;real-life&quot; wedding announcements.  Perhaps this is fitting for your local newspaper, but it struck me as out of place in a magazine</review_text>
Great for filling the doctors office magazine selection - if it's free - but not worth your money to own. I bought if for gardening inspiration and there is really nothing about gardens or gardening in here. Oh, once in a while they remember to put a garden shot in the magazine, but not consistently. The home section isn't that inspirational either. Go for it if it's free, but if it's not, don't buy it</review_text>
This is a yuppie magazine for people with endless bank accounts and nothing to do with their money.  What's more is I didn't see a thing that had anything to do with actual gardens!</review_text>
I also bought this magazine sight-unseen and I wish I hadn't.  For re-decorating purposes, I found this magazine to be not useful at all.  The homes and gardens are pretty, but what they feature (furniture, wall and window coverings) just would not go with the middle-class home...way too opulent.  I was wanting more of a magazine that could give me a look that can be found in local or chain furniture stores... not that would try to make me get a one-of-a-kind table from XYZ Antique store in New York.  Also, I found this magazine text-heavy.  All in all, an OK magazine for a professional decorater maybe, but not for a average home-owner trying to redecorate</review_text>
I made the mistake of subscribing to this magazine sight unseen. I received a very good offer to subscribe, that I didn't want to turn down. I thought this was going to be like a Better Homes and Gardens, or Country Living but it wasn't. This appears to be a good choice for design professionals. I was just not very impressed</review_text>
It seemed like there were 2 articles &amp; 80 pages of advertisements</review_text>
I found this magazine very unrealistic in terms of fashion (not clothing you would actually see people wearing on a daily basis and definitely not clothing that most people can afford).  The whole magazine is one big ad.  If I wanted that, I could just turn on the tv</review_text>
Elle used to be a great fashion magazine, but no longer. Ofcourse, there are too many adds (but then, that's what pays for the mag). I just wish that Elle and many other fashion mags would quit presenting all these articles (the hard hitting type) on serious subjects that do not belong in a fashion periodical. I buy Elle for "the fashion/beauty advice" NOT to read some pseudo intellectual writer's hard hitting political agenda. For hard hitting news items I read the Wall Street Journal, Atlantic Monthly, and watch Fox News.</review_text>
the articles are "good" but the articles are wordy and doesnt get to the point. Too many annoying ads. If u want something to "read" this isnt the magazine for yo</review_text>
I had always suspected and recently found out that Elle uses a different kind of (at least) paper for the cover of the editions it mails to us subscribers. While the Elle magazines in bookstores, supermarket etc. have thick, glossy, high quality paper for their covers, the managazines I received in my mailbox has a dull and thin cover. I guess the company wanted to cut cost, because to remain competitve, they were forced to offer subscribers a deep discount. Still, it's cheating</review_text>
I read this at Stop and Shop each month, hoping it'll get better. Each month I hope desperately for some pertinent, relevant, or just plain mildly useful business hints and tips... and they are just not forthcoming.For someone who is interested in making millions with vending machines, look no further.Always longed to invest in one of those MLM (multi-level marketing) ventures that start their pleas with: "Dear friend, I was once a loser like you. Thanks to this company, I've turned my life around! What are you waiting for? Just send me all your money and you could be as tanned and successful as I am." ? Then this is your mag!For a business owner who is looking for some serious help? Don't bother! You'd be far better off with a subscription to American Venture or something in that line</review_text>
This magazine is great just for keeping the spirit. It's filled with many success stories. But hardly any of those success stories include the details that led them into success. It's also extremely geared towards franchising. Every other article, and every other ad is about franchising. I have a one year subscription and at this point I'm bored. I'll keep the subscription, but it's highly unlikely that I will renew next year.*** Though one should check out their web site at entrepreneur.com. You will find that it is the total opposite of the magazine, and will prove to be a great wealth of information</review_text>
My biz partner and I were excited to receive our first mag from this group.  We were sorely disappointed.  Most of the articles are not new information, but &quot;rehashed&quot; info widely available.  We read it cover to cover for about 4 months, then cancelled the subscription.  There are better sources out there and this is not one of them!</review_text>
When I first heard there was an American version of L'Uomo Vouge I was really excited.  I thought "finally an American men's fashion magazine that'll be edgy, risky, creative & original!"  I couldn't have been more wrong.  This magazine is virtually indistinguishable from lackluster Men's magazines GQ, Esquire & Details.  European men's fashion magazines are works of art with cutting edge photography, bold reporting & beautiful advertising.  You won't find any of this in Men's Vouge.  The editors of this magazine have greatly insulted the intelligence of American readers.  If I could I'd give this magazine a negative 5</review_text>
All this new magazine is is a glossy ad for makeup and clothes. I can't even get my subscription delivered and there is no phone number ANYWHERE to contact customer service.  Don't waste your money unless you love Paris Hilton</review_text>
This is a tabloid, so most likely the stories you're reading are not true. Why would someone spend there hard earned money on a magazine that prints alot of unfounded rumors that alot times turns out to be just that, a rumor</review_text>
I ordered Star magazine in late December 2003 for my elderly homebound mother who loves the crosswords. She stopped receiving it in June, well before her 12 month subscription expired.</review_text>
Harper's Bazaar is a pretty decent fashion magazine, but I wish now that I had never gotten a subscription. True, each issue would be more expensive, but1) I could pick out what issues seemed worth buying, as some are thin and empty2) They are quite often late with their delivery or you miss an issue. I have only gotten one issue on time, to be honest.</review_text>
My mom was a subscriber to Newsweek for years, and I'd flip through her copies.  Most of the material is friendly towards the powers that be (although, not friendly enough according to the review by the soldier who thinks the editors should be in jail.  So much for "protecting our freedoms").  Anyway, since Newsweek is beholden to Big Business advertisements, it won't do much to rock the boat that our corporate mafia owns.If people are interested in more honest, more critical views of the political and economic system that is causing so much devastation in the world (the neoliberalism of the US empire and other wealthy nations), then I'd recommend Z magazine.  I'll never forget finding my mom on the floor devouring it's articles on a range of issues the corporate media marginalize.  Z also publishes articles and interviews with the most-cited living author on the planet, Noam Chomsky (another figure I'm sure the US soldier thinks should be in jail.  Although, Chomsky recently spoke at West Point.  So, even the military is waking up to the hard truths he brings).</review_text>
I decided that I had to write a review about Newsweek this morning, after I came across yet another biased, over-hyped cover story. This particular one is entitled, "Rethinking the Marriage Crunch," and goes back on everything they presented 20 years ago about a woman's chances of getting married later in life. This was undoubtedly very easy for them to do as they probably had no evidence for their assertion the first time around, and neglected to have any on this occasion. I really think another reviewer's comparison to People is quite apt, but Newsweek also provides a reliably pro-sexual revolution and pro-sixties counter-culture take on almost every issue. Two years ago, we were made privy to another bit of front page sensationalism concerning "Infidelity Chic." Yes, it seems, according to their sources, spousal cheating is all the rage even though they argue, without even a hint of contradiction, that everybody still wants to get married as much as ever before. I find the magazine to be [...] as they offer opinion instead of news; theirs is a mission of persuasion. Overall, there is little of which to recommend this publication as it is geared for a readership of trivial people who possess the depth of a kiddy pool.</review_text>
If you are looking for actual good workouts look to Oxygen or Womens M&F</review_text>
I haven't received this item.  It has been almost two months</review_text>
Self what? The entire magazine now pushes product on every inch of every page. Their product placements went from "convenient and subtle" to obviously pandering to their revenue sources. Plus the stories and tips are so far out of reality that anyone over 25 with half of a brain couldn't relate. I once enjoyed Self and their monthly self-help plans. Their core message has gotten lost in the sea of product pushing</review_text>
I've subscribed to Self on-and-off for about 15 years, but have recently been feeling like I've outgrown the magazine. The articles seem to focus on issues facing single women who are just starting their careers.  Fine, but not for me anymore!  Also, their subscription department is terrible!  My most recent subscription has been plagued with missed issues, double issues and late issues -- and a customer service department that can't quite pull themselves together.</review_text>
First off, I usually just stick to rating & critiquing movies. But, every time I see an ad on this website for this Time/Warner (or whatever the hell the company calls itself this week) rag-mag I start to see red."Entertainment Weekly", which was once an interesting weekly deluge from the ho-hum of everyday life, has become just another rag crapped out weekly to stand on newstands week after week prostituting for your hard earned cash.Back in the summer of 89, "EW" was released and after I read a few issues, I decided to subscribe. I was instantly hooked (the new issue would arrive in my mailbox the Saturday before it would hit regular newstands) & I liked getting the latest news and reviews from movies, music, T.V., and video (that was later added in the mid-90's).The problem with the magazine started in the late 90's. I started to notice that "EW" would cover a big movie or event that hadn't yet been released and then the following week bash the hell out of it, or try to get some piece of dirt on it in order to generate more sales.I also hate the damn lists that "EW" comes up with. The latest entitled "The top 100 most memorable movie lines" was a joke. These lists have always annoyed me, because I feel they are truly not thought out and therefore not thought provoking.The other & most important thing I noticed was the absolute lack of an honest review.Case in point, a few weeks ago I picked up the latest issue in which the movie "Catwoman" had been reviewed (I wasn't to sure if it was Gleiberman or Shwarzbaum that critiqued it).I first logged onto "Rotten Tomatoes.com" to see what percentile "Catwoman" recieved from the nation's critics.Out of roughly 115 reviews "Catwoman" only got 10% of the good reviews while the rest trashed it (a film needs, at least, to get a grade of 60 - 65% in order to place it as a fresh or good movie). That makes "Catwoman" the worst reviewed film, so far, for 2004. Yet, "EW" gave the film a B. What erkes me even more is that "Catwoman" is released by "Warner Bros.", the same company that owns the rights to the "Harry Potter" films, "The Lord of the Rings" trilogy, & yes, the "WB" owns "Entertainment Weekly".Is "Warner Bros." trying to bribe or threaten its own critics at one of its most popular & lucrative magazine's?I'm not the only who has seen this developement. People have written in saying that there is favoritism among "Warner" products that are reviewed in the magazine. "EW", of course, hotly denies anything of the kind thumping there chests and standing behind there reviews, possibly in fear of being fired (they will deny that also).My only question to the reviewers at "Entertainment Weekly" is, "Whats it like to stand in your own pile of bull**it?"Or better yet, "What's it like to stand on a Democratic Podium?"</review_text>
Although I found the magazine itself to be interesting and colorful, with a good series of articles on marriage and relationships, I found that customer service was very dissapointing. I missed an issue back in October, and have contacted customer service 3 times to have them resend the issue I missed. It is now March, and I still haven't received my replacement. Just a heads up!</review_text>
I received my first "issue" of Modern Bride in the mail yesterday.  It was just the cover of the magazine, nothing else!Now I'll have to go through the trouble of ordering a replacement.Do yourself a favor and just go to a news stand and buy one</review_text>
I ordered the magazine and immediately received my first issue, but unfortunately over the course of the year I only received a total of THREE issues! The magazine is great, but I wonder what the problem is. I have no received much help from amazon or Modern Bride. Guess I learned my lesson not to subscribe online anymore.</review_text>
I subscribed to Modern Bride as a gift to my fiance.  Aside from not receiving our first issue until 3 months after the subscription, I only received about 3 issues total.  Months went by without anything being delivered.  While customer service at Modern Bride was very accomodating and helpful, nothing happens immediately.  When planning a wedding, each and every month is precious.  Especially during the initial stages of wedding planning.  To have finally gotten this subscription problem under control was exhausting.  Plus, by this time most of the wedding details were finalized, the magazines I received became useless.  If you're under 12 months to your wedding date, you should strongly consider if now is a good time to begin a subscription with Modern Bride</review_text>
I Love the Mag, but sister never recieved the order I gave her as a gift!!!</review_text>
I used to really like US magazine. I have been collecting every issue each week for several years now. But wait! Has anyone else noticed that this magazine has drastically changed since the beginning of this year? Where are all the interesting articles and info on the celebrities, movies and music? There's no more than a thumbnail's sketch of info on anything now. It's all photos and quickie hype. It has no more substance. What happened to this good magazine</review_text>
Why is it that Us Weekly can't get a copy to me weekly?  Sometimes three weeks will go by without an issue.  Then I'll receive three in one week.  Us Weekly assures me that everything is normal and that they ship them just as soon they come off the printing presses.  I'm not buying their story or the magazine again</review_text>
This is one of the many magazines that float around the school library, and it is the most common.  Maybe because not too many people read it.  All that is in it is pure celebrity gossip. There is really nothing else in here.  If you like blurry photos of Lindsay Lohan, Donald Trump, Paris Hilton, Simon Cowell, Paula Abdul and the like, (blurry so you can't see the zits and the flaws) then you should get this.  One article mentioned Britney Spears stomach, how it was coming back.  She was wearing a baggy t-shirt.  Baggy t-shirts are common among women wanting to hide a gut, not flaunt it.  This magazine makes it seem like celebrities lose weight like magic (they don't-not so far as I can tell).  If you want to read about the fact that Nichole Richie has acquired yet another Chloe Paddington, the fact that Donald Trump thinks his wife Melania looks hideous now that he has gotten her knocked up, or you would like to see photos of Victoria Beckham looking pissed off, then read this. This magazine is full of lies as well-for instance, one writer claims that young people like Lindsay Lohan can get higher car insurance rates for accidents they were not at fault in.  False!  You only get higher rates if you are at fault. This magazine is nothing more than an overpriced tabloid.  There is nothing of value in here. Half the time the insider is some anonymous friend, and half the time the facts aren't right. Avoid this thing at all costs, unless of course you are a celebrity worshipper. I've got better things to do than worship people who have too much money for their own good.  I'll stick to more intelligent fare, thankyouverymuch</review_text>
I have been subscribing to US Weekly for about a year and a half. In that time, I have never seen an issue without several pages of Jessica Simpson. I have to wonder; does Jessica donate money to this magazine? She seems to dominate the whole magazine, each and every week.I won't be renewing my subscription. I'm tired of Jessica and the untruths that US Weekly supplies</review_text>
I WORKED THERE BRIEFLY AND THEY'RE RUDE AND OBNOXIOUS AND HAVE NO CLASS. I WOULDN'T BE SURPRISED IF SOME OF THE STORIES THEY'RE ACCUSING OF MAKING UP ARE TRUE. THEY DESERVE TO BE SUED AND STOPPED. ALL OF THEM ARE REPULSIVE, I'M GLAD I GOT OUT WHEN I DID!</review_text>
Okay, so In Touch has never claimed to be anything other than what it is: A glossy tabloid.  But just when you didn't think it was possible for the American tabloid press to dumb down any further, along came In Touch Weekly and US Weekly.All In Touch really is is a bunch of photographs.  Their writing is slop, fit for second graders, and it doesn't go into much detail (and we all know how amazingly "accurate" these tabloids are, anyway).Want a quality tabloid?  Read Hello! magazine (from England). - Donna Di Giacom</review_text>
I HAVE YET TO RECEIVE EVEN ONE ISSUE. I LOOKED ON THE IN TOUCH MAGAZINE SIGHT AND IT SAID THAT I HAVE ALREADY RECEIVED 6 ISSUES. I WILL NEVER ORDER A MAGAZINE SUBSCRIPTION THROUGH THIS COMPANY OR THROUGH AMAZON AGAIN</review_text>
I have subscribed to "In Touch" since September last year and it's time to renew, but I'm not goint to....because this megazine is never arrived on time (at least 5 of them just failed to arrive), I don't know wether i should wait for it or call customer service. I would go to the store and buy it instead because the megazine itself is very entertaining.</review_text>
where are all of my magazine subscription first issues???????mar</review_text>
This is definitely the inferior rag of the big Trio of Science monthlies. Filled with poorly-written articles. I actually went back to Home Depot once to get a refund for this magazine. It is indeed worth the gas and time to get a refund if you actually pay for this magazine. This magazine promotes commercial products, and no I'm not talking about the advertisements, but the actual articles themselves. The magazine is not a news magazine, it is just one big advertising rag where manufacturers have paid to get in. If you like paying for ads, go for it</review_text>
I ordered this as a gift subscription on May 10.By July 20, it still had not arrived. I contacted Customer Service, and was told itwouldn't arrive until September!The description says it will take 6-10 weeks. It has now been 10 weeks,and I've been informed it will be another 6 weeks</review_text>
2 months after ordering, i have year to get my first issue.  i'm sure i'll like it...if i ever get it</review_text>
The heft and page quality of this magazine is impressive, but it's mostly advertising.  Very disappointing.  It does have some useful info and I do enjoy reading it (which is why it got 2 stars from me), but I definitely won't be renewing my subscription</review_text>
they may have some good info, but i was flipping through this in my local bookstore, and most of what they have is a whole lotta ads... and within the ads a lot of scams and MLM schemes.buyer beware. :</review_text>
Home Business Magazine is a publication aimed at those members of the general populace who either already own a home based business or who have an active interest in the subject and would like to pursue it further. This magazine contains articles relating to all facets of home business ownership from the initial setup all the way through to the payment of taxes at year end.I read several different business magazines and many of them have to do with entrepreneurship. Home Business is the only one I read that is specifically devoted to starting a business in the home and, unfortunately, it has many flaws that prevent it from being the enjoyable and informative read that it otherwise could be. Probably the most annoying feature of this magazine is the articles themselves and their tendency to be written in a list- type format rather than in a user- friendly way. I realize that people like lists but Home Business takes this a little too far. It makes the magazine seem callous and unfriendly- something you would consult in the same way you would an almanac. For example, it is common to find a one page article with a title like "Effective Ways to Design a Newspaper Ad", or "How to Obtain Quick Financing". In each instance, these articles will have a short opening consisting of a paragraph or two followed by a numbered listing of different methods/suggestions to solve the problem or answer the question. This makes the magazine read more like a reference guide than a piece of reading material.Another thing that is annoying about this magazine is the endless advertising. Not only does it get out of hand, it also includes all sorts of ads that emphasize money- making schemes and other similar material. Advertisements with titles like "Really Lazy Guy's Incredible Little Secret Idea Can Make You Rich", "Free $9.95 Report Shows You How to Make a Fortune", and "Six Figures in Six Months" clutter the pages of this magazine with get- rich quick garbage that everyone knows is unlikely to return even the cost of the introductory package.Some parts of this magazine are more bearable than others and it's this handful of positive attributes that prevent me from giving this magazine a one- star rating. I like some of the success stories because they depict ordinary people who have succeeded at making a living with a home- based business. But even here, the stories are inconsistent. Some are educational in nature while others have little valuable information to share. And to make matters worse, they are far too short- usually covering only one- half page each with a large advertisement taking up the space at the bottom of each page.Speaking of the advertising, this magazine wrote the book on advertisement excess. Advertisements cover about 75 percent of the pages in each issue and it is rare to see even two pages in a row without some sort of advertisement. The ads are posted everywhere, often right in the middle of an article, and they distract greatly from the already limited enjoyment of the magazine.This magazine is assembled together in such a way that it reads like a collection of articles taken from people in different parts of the country that were shuffled around and published in one magazine. In other words, this magazine has no continuity to it. It's like taking short articles from different business newspapers around the USA and then piecing them together into one magazine.Starting a home- based business is a goal that many people set for themselves and there is always a need for some good, timely information when you find yourself in this situation. Home Business, unfortunately, doesn't perform its mission very well. If you dig deeply enough you can find a few good articles. But the majority is too impersonal and too shallow (not to mention smothered in advertisements) to make this magazine worth the trouble.</review_text>
I purchaced this magazine thinking that it would be the next step from the amateur photo magazine level to the serious pro level.  In fact, it is not really either.</review_text>
i got charged for this and havent gotten it. what bulls**</review_text>
I still have not received this magazine, what is taking so long !!</review_text>
I wish I had something good to say but I ordered this Barron's subscription back in August 06. I've had this newspaper before and do enjoy it.  It is now November and I'm still waiting.  I called customer service and Amazon promised to resolve but that was several weeks ago. My next call will be to ask for my money back. Hopefully this isn't happening to other Subscribers.  I've ordered several other magazines from Amazon and always received them on a timely basis.</review_text>
If I could give this no stars I would. I bought this magazine because Nickelodeon programs are my sons favorite to watch. I bet they were banking on that when they made this sorry exuse of a children's magazine. Not even HALF of the magazine is ad free!!!! I bought this to keep my son busy on a flight, and he looked at it maybe two minutes. I wondered why, since he loves everything else Nick, so I looked inside for myself. Boy was I dissapointed. Instead of the quality children's material I had hoped for, it was just ad after ad. I'm glad I only bought one issue in the airport, instead of being one of the unfortunate people to purchase an entire subscription before seeing it's lack of content. If you want a great children's magazine, go for Ladybug for younger children and Cricket for older children. They are both high quality and they aren't stuffed full of advertisements like Nick</review_text>
When you watch commercial children's television, you have to accept the commercials because, after all, the programs are "free". But when you pay to subscribe to Nickelodeon magazine, I don't expect for it so be so full of alluring ads targeting children. These ads appear similar to the editorial content. It seems like 50% of the pages are advertisements!I was disappointed and won't be renewing our subscription. Better to look at something from the Highlights magazine series.</review_text>
I was looking forward to another Oprah magazine with great joy.  Unfortunately, the pomp and circumstance within "O at Home"'s pages is a real turnoff for me, an average, middle-class American living, as they say in "middle America".Although I hesitate to say this in print, it's been in my head for ahile now.  I am a faithful 20-year Oprah viewer but something has begun to change in her attitude and it is evidenced in this new magazine.Is it possible that Oprah has not only forgotten her roots, but has now skipped over all the stages in between her roots and now living in a gazillion-square-foot house in Malibu?  Is it possible that she has forgotten the 90% of us who live somewhere in between?  If this magazine is an indication, then sadly, she has</review_text>
Have a one year subscription to this magazine and will not renew it. Simply because its vulgar materialism to the extreme.  They say we Americans are obese in body, but magazines like this show to many are also obese when it comes to materialism.  Page after page of glossy ads for things we do NOT need.  And rooms to full of what amounts to dust collections.  Sure they make pretty pictures, but who wants all that 'junk' that probably has no real sentimental value but is more what someone else has told us we need to feel whole or successful.  I recommend the magazine Dwell which has a more holistic approach to a place to live that also wont mean hours cleaning.  For someone who professes to be so concerned about the down trodden, Oprah would do better to set a better example of living simply. And how many homes does one American need, when so many Americans cannot afford even one</review_text>
Like "Where's Waldo", it seems every issue must have at least one, if not several Mies van der Rohe daybeds.  While this is admitedly a classic piece of furniture, one gets the impression that there are a gaggle of designers telling their clients, "You have to have one of these, they're what's IN!"  Most of the features in Metropolitan Home suffer from the same fate; dreary antiseptic homes with the same dreary interiors that obviously were foisted upon gullible, uninformed clients by designers who know how to make an easy buck.  "Modern" equals, of course, a Mies van der Rohe daybed (notice how many times it shows up in this review?), otherwise you get month after month of 1970's florals, faux Louis the Whatever tables.  Even using feature extraction, wading through the dreck and finding something useable for your own purposes, it's painful to look through this magazine.  If you really want ideas for making your house reflect you, trust yourself and what YOU like, and if you do like Mies van der Rohe daybeds, by all means get one.  Just don't plunk one in your sun room because you were told it's trendy. If you like the Modern style, look up the works of Hans Wegner and Peter Hvidt and go from there; their furniture still looks stylish after 50 years of hard use by real families and is sturdy as well.  Maybe you want a house where nobody is allowed to set foot in any of the rooms and amounts to a bad hodge-podge of styles that all seem a bit busy and bumpy.  For everyone else, think about the things you'd like to see if you walked into a room, save your money and skip this magazine</review_text>
This magazine should be free, since there are so many advertisements.  Also, it is strictly modern decorating, unlike the editor's claims.  If you like extreme, modern style, try it out; otherwise invest in something else</review_text>
I haven't received this product yet and I'm pretty upset about it.I've requested that someone contact me about this problem and I haven't been given an answer.  I think I'm deserving of some sort of discount or at least an answer.Where is the product I bought???</review_text>
I echo the same gripe that other reviewers have voiced here: The magazine covers the same handful of people week after week after boring week.  How many times is a reader going to see no talents such as Jessica Simpson, Lindsay Lohan, the Tom Cruise-Katie Holmes joke, and THE most overrated, overhyped people of all time Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie on the cover and not get tired of it?It's nice to know what's going on with certain celebrities once in a while but every single week?  Can you say "overkill?"I'm glad I never got a subscription to this magazine.  I picked it up every once in a while on the newsstand but stopped because I was so sick and tired of reading about overrated, overhyped and glorified B-movie "actors" and "actresses" who were lucky to be in one successful movie and haven't done anything of value since.I picked up a copy today and have sworn it off forever.  Don't waste your time or your money. - Donna Di Giacom</review_text>
People magazine is one of the worst expressions of American life.  Instead of makiing our own lives more meaningful and exciting - which is possible - People encourages us to oogle and fixate over people who are essentially images, people we will never meet, and in many cases people who have very little going for them. Does anyone really think that Britney Spears has anything to say about anything, or that Paris Hilton is barely  aware of her own existence?  Does it ever make a whit of difference to your life how many times J.Lo is engaged (in order to get on the cover of another magazine) or who Demi Moore is grinding with today or where Gweyneth gets her gowns</review_text>
Laptop Magazine focuses on laptops, PDAs, and wireless computing.  Laptop Magazine seems like it's trying to be both technical and exciting; however it lacks the objectivity of PC Magazine and the deep enthusiasm of Wired.  Thus, it reads like a series of infomercials where each &quot;article&quot; paints a rose-colored view of each technology and the vendors products followed by paid ads of the same vendors portrayed so happily in the text.  Their conclusions all seem predetermined: new technology is better</review_text>
Laptop Mag can be best described negatively: it's not a really serious computer magazine.  It's more or less like Consumer Guide, which is basically paid advertising.  This means you can't really trust the article here because you don't know if they are not written by unbiased writers.  In the end, I feel this is a waste of money.  Besides, you can get all the info for free on the web, from CNET or ZDNET, anyway</review_text>
Give me a break,people!All Spin Magazine is a cheap rip-off/wanna-be of Alternative Press.I've looked at like maybe ten OR less issues of this waste of printed material in the past as many years.Think I may've saved ONE of those issues.Sometimes,I'll find an issue left by an uninterested patron at the post office that's been left behind.I'll then take it home,then likely toss it out after I've looked through it twice.Avoid at all costs</review_text>
I'm sure that this review isn't unique.  Spin rotates the same ten bands on its cover, not to mention the ridiculous articles written within. By the time they get done describing the 'euro-punk-indie-pop artist that just slammed them in the face on their way to the train station with their jazzed up sound' I've completely forgotten the point of thier article.  They must have the greatest time just sitting around finding how many contradictory adjectives they can tag onto useless music and still manage to say nothing. They sound like cyber-nerds who need to get out a little more and stop getting thier info from mtv.com. I'm sure that i've learned more about what thier editors do in the office on any given day than anything remotely close to music while reading spin.  Next time you see it on the stands, I suggest you spin in another direction</review_text>
I got my first month(a horrible Green Day issue)and then nothing! Uh,what up? Its not that good of a magazine,I just want what I paid for</review_text>
"Spin" is an accurate name for something like this -- a lot of hype, for an innocuous but rather tepid rock magazine. If Rolling Stone is the dirty old geezer of rock magazines, then Spin is the teenager who tries hard to convince you he's cool by name-dropping the Strokes.Spin covers some of the same turf as Rolling Stone and Blender, but less lasciviously -- lots of coverage of popular bands. Some of them are quite good -- the Hives, for example, or indie newcomer Steve Burns (who quit his job on "Blues Clues" after hearing a Flaming Lips album, and reinvented his life as a rocker).Unfortunately they overemphasize whatever bands are hot at the moment, and then overemphasize them again -- as well as tacking them up in whatever "coolest"/"best" lists they chalk up for the year/decade/century/history of rock. Indie cred is maintained by a few half-page articles on potentially hot bands like the Comas and Metric, but this info is halfhearted. It's like they're reluctant to tear themselves away from articles on better-known bands, regardless of talent.The writing, however, has that certain affliction that a lot of major rock magazines have: the Need To Be Cool. Their writers always are trying to be funny, but rarely come across that way. It seems silly and strained, like a soccer mom wearing a spandex tube dress. Even the CD reviews are mediocre. However, one recent highlight is Dave Eggers' columns -- witty, funny, and a little bit skewed. In fact, they are often the best things in the entirety of the magazine.One of the problems is the emphasis on stuff in Hollywood. Scarlett Johanssen is a wonderful actress, yes. But she doesn't sing, nor has she appeared in a music-based movie -- Jack Black yes, Scarlett no. And what is up with party coverage on TV starlet Mischa Barton and MTV couples?Check out sublimely indie mags like Chord, Filter, Under the Radar and the online Kludge for in-depth looks at some worthy bands. As for Spin? It's still trying to convince us it's cool, but Eggers is the only regularly cool thing about it</review_text>
Spin will do anything to try and stay hip. I wanted to gag when i saw a picture of blink 182 in their &quot;tribute&quot; to kurt cobain mag. Im a huge nirvana fan and the only good thing about those articles were the pictures. they were poorly written and dull. they didnt even scrape the surface of kurt's music, and his impact on an entire generation. i suggest maybe guitar world or anything other then spin..</review_text>
Can't give a review on Maximum PC.  Never received the magazine.  Instead I was sent the men's magazine FHM.  Please send my Maximum PC</review_text>
I subscribed in late May to MaximumPC and PCGamer. Early July I started getting PCGamer.  Still nothing from MaximumPC.  I called customer service and they said they had recieved my order June 2nd and to expect my first issue in late September. Thats nearly four months! That is an unreasonable wait relative to the industry standard and clearly outside the stated wait on the order form. I gave one star because the magazine is a good magazine. But at a $8.99 news stand price it is too expensive... so I am left with the choice of spending almost $35 to get the four months worth before my subscription starts (more than the subscription itself) or just missing out on those issue.  Very poor customer service.</review_text>
The magazines ordered through amazon take an ETERNITY to be delivered.  The estimated time for my delivery was April after I had placed the order in Feb.  That's a long enough wait as it is---I ended up receiving it the the end of June!  And when I called to complain...the customer service rep explained to me that it was technically within the estimated allowed time for delivery.  so bottom line...if you have an urge to order a magazine that may take half a year or so to get to you...then this is the ONE FOR YOU-hands down.  I plan on never ordering a single magazine through Amazon again.  Definitely don't send a subscription to anyone as a birthday gift- it'll maybe make it in time for the FOLLOWING birthday year..so plan years in advance</review_text>
This mag is for people who think they are computer experts because they can change out a video card or follow directions on changing an OS setting.Shallow coverage, and some of the lamest humor you will ever come across.It is nothing more then a rehash of what is freely and easily available on the internet. There is nothing original in this mag, ever. Also it tends to copy and paste much of the issue from 12 months earlier. All the main articles are nearly the same every 12 months. Don't believe me? Take two magazines that are 12 months apart and compare them.The reviews are also weak. nearly every month you will see: THE FASTEST SYSTEM WE EVER TESTED!!!!! YAAAAAWWWWWWNNNNN. Who cares? Anyone who knows even the slightest about computers knows that speed is not the most important attribute, even for gamers. Besides, does it really matter that system y is .00005% faster on their poor testing system then computer z?The second star is for Mr Halfhills column. It is the only part that is consistantly interesting and the only person there with real technical know-how.Read toms hardware and whatever tech news you want, learn how to use search engines, and skip this pointless mag</review_text>
Liked this magazine enough to order it but it gets one star for wasting my money. Thought it'd be simple enough to order it from amazon like i do everything else. But instead i've paid and never received it. I haven't been able to log a compaint with amazon cause every time i do it links me somewhere else, so this is the first chance i've had to even say i've been ripped off. They may eventually send it but it's not likely at this point, it's been a couple months now</review_text>
I don't know what the heck is going on with your subscription service.  I bought this magazine for my nephew back on July 9th, and HE STILL HASN'T RECIEVED AN ISSUE!!!!  I am extremely disappointed with your service.  It should not take this long to get a magazine</review_text>
This magazine is all puff-- if you're looking for honest and insightful reviews, this is not your read.  However, if you already know all the artists they profile and just like pretty pictures of them, this magazine is worth buying for the sampler disc included with every issue</review_text>
Lots of lovely photos, great ideas, deco tips and food</review_text>
I flip through Time every now and again at the barber shop.  Sometimes there are good bits that they are using to keep the interest of people who want progressive social change, people who are sick of the power of the corporate elite and the violence of our militarists.For the most part, since Time receives most of its revenues from Big Business advertisements, it can't challenge the establishment as it needs to.So instead I read magazines like Z, Utne, Mother Jones, The Progressive, The Sun, Earth Island and the New Internationalist</review_text>
My sixth grader likes it.  It is extremely ordinary and easy to outgrow</review_text>
I am a Time person of the year 2003 (shared title - actively deployed U.S. servicemembers).  I must say that reading Time magazine is like reading the platform for the Democratic Party.  Actually it is even worse than that it is like reading John Dean's diary, filled more with fantasy and personal wishes than actual reality.  One of the latest from the online edition is that Realists have taken over Washington.  Give me a break.  A new set of hogs have come in to take over at the troff and that is it.  Anyone who believes Nancy Pelosi and her gang of political hacks is going to help America is a fool.  Best thing we can hope for is that they create so much gridlock that no one can spend any money in Washington.  Maybe then they will see that America improves on its own and politicians on both side make things awful.The sad thing is that people that read this publication actually think they walk away knowing something about the world.  This publication is so biased that it not only misinforms its readers it makes them look like fools when they try to repeat what they have "learned".If you want a truly useful weekly news publication then subscribe to the Economist.  It probably will not change your political affiliations but it will at least make you sound competent when you debate others.  The Economist is quite simply the best weekly news magazine in existence.  The articles are well written by people that know what they are talking about.Leaders from around the world read and contribute to the Economist.  This is something that Time, Newsweek and the rest of their ilk cannot claim.I am not affiliated with any political parties and do not consider myself political.  I look at things from an economic perspective and vote accordingly</review_text>
This was a gift for my daughter. Instead of receiving the New Yorker, she is receiving People. You need to fix this</review_text>
New York Magazine's articles and advertisements are too risque, always pushing the envelope.  Thanks, but NO Thanks</review_text>
it would be nice if i were writing about the magazine CONTENT here but since i never received a single copy of my subscription.all i can say is their customer service  SUCKS !!!! after repeated attempts to correct the delivery address or find out what happened the issue still hasn't been resolved.NOTE;i've had a number of delivery problems when ordering magazines  on amazon (there might be some glitch) .however the other magazines have quickly corrected  the problem soon after contact.</review_text>
Amazon must think we are fools. It's $4 cheaper directly from Stewart's website.On the other hand, there appear to be a lot of fools here</review_text>
I was ecstatic when I received this magazine subscription as as gift. Two issues into my subscription it stopped. I was really anticipating the December issue because I had many guests coming and could use some of Martha's helpful advice, however it never came and neither did January or February. I have called Martha Stewart Living magazine twice and while they are very nice and apologetic, I still have not received another issue. When I asked to cancel for a refund I was given a phone number with an automated system that uses a credit card account look up - being that it was a gift this is useless. Very clever for Martha and very frustrating for the giftee/consumer</review_text>
The amazon ad said next day shipping. Took over a month for the first magazine to arrive.DO NOT BUY THIS FROM AMAZO</review_text>
I read rolling stone for the music and those who make it, not for some guilt ridden, agenda blasting editorial team that feels their politics (and guilt at being so much the establishment they wish they could hate) is something we should all read about at nauseum. when they stick to music, it's good, when they parade their shreiking political views, it's boring.</review_text>
Anyone with a good taste in music will hate this magazine, as it only rates bad bands from bad genres good reviews and whatever good bands are listed, are often given bad reviews.  Its all pretentious pop-culture drivel for the conformist, weak-willed mainstream American.The worst part of Rolling Stone is the 100 Greatest Guitarists of All time list; as they highly rate Kirk Hammett, Kurt Cobain, and Tom Morello (all extremely overrated guitarists) while rating Eddie Van Halen at a very lowly #70 and not even mentioning these awesome guitarists; Kerry King/Jeff Hanneman (Slayer), John Petrucci (Dream Theater), Trey Azagthoth/Erik Rutan (Morbid Angel), Jeff Loomis (Nevermore), Steve Vai, and Joe Satriani.  If you know anything about good guitarists, those eight guitarists I just mentioned DESTROY Kirk, Kurt, and Tom.Don't read this if you're trying to decide what good music is, YOU decide what good music is.  Think for yourself, don't let MTV and Rolling Stone think for you</review_text>
More and more, all the industry wants to do is tell you what it is you are supposed to like, and ridicule anything we might consider to be a guilty pleasure, and if you indulge in such a thing, you are 'shallow'.Music has evolved past this attitude, and no one believes in this naked emperor anymore. And oh yeah, their politics is so mixed up, they don't even know what they believe anymore. I was a subscriber for eleven years, my renewal notice came, and I couldn't come up with one good reason to send it in</review_text>
I have been a subscriber for 15 years and still enjoy the magazine.  No, its not the best magazine for music, but it is one of the best for for general pop culture news and I still occassionally find new artists because of the magazine, though I tend to find more new movies now.However, if you ever have a problem with customer service, forget it.  I never got my copy of the 1,000 issue, and when I asked for a replacement, I was told they were out of that issue, but would extend my subscription by one issue.  I pointed out that it was a double issue AND that they are still selling back issues on their web site for $20.  If they don't resolve it quick, I might just cancel my subscription, I'm so disgusted.</review_text>
Oh Lord!! Does anyone still read this?? I was a subscriber back in the early 70's,when it was a folded up, newspaper.By and large, Jann Wenner let people run it, that knew how to. It is now, and has been nothing more than an Ad choked,gossiping Teen slick.Right, like they are the ones with the money!! I wonder what they still pay Raoul Duke, to do??!! Ralph Gleason has to be turning over in the grave</review_text>
This used to be a pretty decent music magazine.  Not the best that was out there, but still decent.  However, Rolling Stone has taken a huge nose-dive in the past ten or so years.  I'm not sure I'd even really call it a music magazine anymore.  It's more a pop-culture magazine that panders to teeny-boppers.  A music magazine's main focus should be music, but RS has over the years started including more and more articles on TV shows, movies, politics, etc and less and less on music...especially less and less on good music.  If you want a magazine on pop-culture go with Entertainment Weekly.  It, at least, has a bit of taste here and there and doesn't spout off about politics.  If I want politics, I'll read the newspaper or watch CNN.  I don't buy music magazines for politics.  I buy them for music.  If you want a good music magazine, this isn't the place to look anymore.</review_text>
Our library has just finished its magazine usage count, and to my surprise the American Spectator came dribbling in with only a couple of hits, measured by current copies left on the table and check outs of older issues. And yet our patronage here is very conservative. Perhaps people who once read this sort of thing no longer read at all, or maybe, as a couple of reviewers suggested, with Bill Clinton out of office, it no longer has the same appeal.You can change my rating to five stars if you like, for the sake of ideology, but you still won't read the thing. Just like I don't read the Nation anymore</review_text>
Interview is definitely a different type of magazine for me- someone who usually reads business and travel mags- and it's not quite what I expected. With a title like "Interview" I read my first copy of this magazine anticipating pages and pages of nothing but interviews. It turns out that interviewing is the main focus of the magazine, but it's not the only one. There is substantial space given to fashion, movies, and other areas, too. Some of these columns are worth an occasional look, but they failed to grab my attention. The writers seem to play it safe, and that includes the interview section. They don't ask many daring or controversial questions. They keep it simple, asking questions about an entertainer's latest album or movie, without delving much into their personal lives.Interview has many general annoyances. My greatest complaint is the advertising and the arrangement of the contents. About half of the pages in each issue are covered with ads, with fashion, liquor, beer, and hair care items providing the bulk of the advertising revenue. The ads are everywhere, with the majority in the front pages of each issue. The table of contents is buried, and I find this very frustrating. The contents starts with the interviews for that specific issue on one page, then a few pages later, proceeds to the remainder of the contents, which is the regular monthly features. What's annoying is that you have to search for the table of contents. It varies from one issue to the next, falling somewhere in the first half.Interview also varies greatly in length. Some issues are as short as 80 pages while others are more than 200 pages long. The shorter issues use staples for binding while the longer issues are bound in a more professional way, minus any metal.This magazine centers on entertainers, fashion, music, and the like. You won't find any interviews with politicians, businessmen, etc. Interview sticks strictly to entertainers, and that includes the regular monthly columns. You won't find a column about the business side of the music industry or film industry. You will find only articles about the stars themselves.Interview's only saving grace is the photography. It would make a nice gift for those who enjoy fashion and who like looking at pages and pages of men and women modeling fancy clothing. But in many ways, the photos are overemphasized and there isn't enough substance to the magazine. The articles are very shallow with more eye candy than reading material.Overall, Interview is sloppy and cluttered with too many ads to make it worthwhile reading material. My subscription was free, and I'm thankful that it was. Besides a few nice photos for clothing, there isn't much to make this magazine worth the cost.</review_text>
I bought this magazine as reading material for my flight home from Ruzyne Airport in Prague to NYC. This was the first time I ever purchased this magazine.Terrible choice. First of all this magazine was not worth the $10+ USD I paid for it. It was way too large to do anything with on the airplane and the content was for the lack of a better word BORING!Every other page was some chic ad. Who buys this magazine?Well I will not be buying it again</review_text>
I subscibe to this magazine.  Will not renew it either!  Maybe I am too old to appreciate this periodical.  It is way overpriced even with the Amazom, and others discount</review_text>
I've been a loyal subscriber since 1998 and have always enjoyed the magazine. Something happened to them in early 2006 - they've either been bought or have hired a new editor / staff or something. This magazine is absolutely terrible now. All ads, fewer and fewer pictures of babes in each issue, and the hilarious articles are now long gone. My last two issues (Sept and Oct) were in the trash within minutes of pulling them from my mailbox. I'm canceling my subscription.</review_text>
Once upon a time this was a good magazine worth reading cover to cover.  Unfortunately they've slowly been replacing content with more and more advertising.  As the magazine currently stands you could probably finish reading the actual "content" in about an hour.  The rest is advertising and BS.  This magazine jumped the shark a long long time ago.  Just let it die already like it's supposed to</review_text>
...1) I can't;2) on second thought, it deserves at least one star for having some silly, funny stuff that you don't find in other magazines.That said, it is grossly overrated. How is it consistently in the top sellers list? Well, there are as many millions of folks with a below average IQ as there are above average. It's too bad they can't play up the silly humor a bit more while leaving the abhorrent juvenileness out. The images are generally trashy and sometimes airbrushed to the point that it looks fake and ridiculous--they could improve the quality of the photos a LOT.Admit it, you would probably hide an issue if you ran into anyone you actually respected. Doesn't that say it all? Reconsider the standards you are setting for yourself, and respect your own brain, too</review_text>
I certainly do hope one of these days that Maxim magazing will get women who are small-breasted equal time.That's all I have to say</review_text>
The recipes included are good, but this is not a "cooking" magazine. This is a women's fitness magazine in disguise. While I am all for a magazine that focuses on overall health and fitness, it shouldn't advertise itself as a cooking magazine. There is way too much other junk. If I wanted a makeover or an exercise routine, I don't expect to go to my cooking magazine to get that.</review_text>
I wanted more recipes and this magazine has too much other junk in it.  Will not renew, not what I wanted</review_text>
I ordered this magazine without really knowing anything about it.  I was very disappointed.  Not enough recipes.  The recipes that are included are not really ones that I would use.</review_text>
Many of us who have contibuted years of creative expertise to our field feel quite insulted by publications of this sort that attempt to "take a ride" on the creativity of others. My advice: Do not purchase, read, or advertise in this third-rate publication. There is little more credibility or validity than watching "Jerry Springer". Please, do not embarass yourself or your clients! Save this one for the bottom of the cat box only</review_text>
amazon sells a one year subscription for $14 which includes a $5 amazon certificate that you get later.in the actual magazine, the subscription card is 6.99 for one year or 2 years for $10.00so use the card, save some money and also dont have to wait for your $5 back and then find something at amazon that you can use the $5 certificate on.</review_text>
For some strange reason, I began receiving this magazine in the mail. Never ordered. Never paid for. My conclusion based on reading the last three issues: You're kidding me. How can Time Inc. still publish this rag? What's the point</review_text>
The problem with Computer Shopper is, it's neither a serious trade magazine like PC Mag, or a shopper's paradise like its former self was.  If you want hardware tips, Maximum PC is way better.  You can find pretty much everything in Computer Shopper for free on the web ..</review_text>
i remember back in the middle '90s this magazine was think... probably anywhere between 1.5-2.5 inches... it contained Ads, reviews, supplier lists, benchmarks and sometimes trial software... Well i have picked one up sense them... and they are now a centimeter thick (if your lucky) they contain ... reviews that are well written or well read, and a whole lot of ads... my conclusion don't buy it... if you want reviews buy PC Magizine or PC World... and if you want ads... surf the internet</review_text>
They allowed me to try one issue before I paid for the subscription.  After I read the first issue, I decided to cancel.  There are a couple of good topics but the articles were poorly written, for example, you couldn't see clearly what the conclusions or recommendations are.  The rest of the magazines are all advertisements, which you can get for free from the internet (or just anywhere)</review_text>
Why? Because it underestimates our intelligence! It has nothing to do with natural health. It has to do with advertisements. It is empty, completelly. More: it looks like a woman magazine but I believe that a clever woman would feel like I feel now, angry! I paid for something that I believed but it is not. OK, we make mistakes</review_text>
Wasn't worth the subscription. I found the magazine to be bland, full of ads and basically boring. All the information can be found doing a quick web search. Highly Disappointed</review_text>
I loved this magazine in 1995, until a few years ago.  They have changed editors a few times and now it is not even worth reading the ads.No new information.  Glossy pics of models with bright red lips.  What is about health here?Get Life Extension magazine and Alternative Medicine Magazine.  They've changed too over the last few years, but still a far sight better than this one</review_text>
IT HAS BEEN SEVERAL WEEKS AND STILL NO MAGAZINE FROM MONEY!!!!OH YEAH BUT THEY DID REMEMBER TO BILL MY CREDIT CARD IN A TIMELY FASHION....MAYBE WHEN SOMETHING TAKES OVER A MONTH YOU SHOULD BILL THE PERSON WHEN  U SHIP THE PRODUCT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
Nice cover pictures and headlines, but way too many ads.  There's a reason its only twelve bucks, this is an ad-sponsored mag</review_text>
i send away for a 2 year subscription,they sent me a 1 year sub,i wrote 5 letters,sent copies of bank cheque and order form,emailed them,no response,they could care less,what more can i do ?</review_text>
I have been a subscriber for a few years and have found alot of the articles repetitive and not all that educational. Recently I have subscribed to Shutterbug which is a much better magazine for both the novice and professional photographer. Its articles are insightful and even after many years they still can teach this old photographer a few new tricks !!!!</review_text>
This definitely a magazine for gearheads.  It's pretty much just equipment reviews and advertisements.  I would have given it a higher rating but for two things:1) I don't think I've ever seen Popular Photography not LOVE any piece of equipment.  The reviews can still be useful if you're just wondering what features the new gizmo has, but still, they ought to be a bit more critical if they're going to be such a review based magazine.2) Many of the ads are from vendors with bad reputations.  I believe they make some sort of claim about requiring a certain level of honesty from anyone they sell ad space from, but it sure doesn't look like they have ever kicked anyone out of the magazine to me.So what do you have when you have a magazine full of uncritical reviews, the occasional beginnerish article about technique, and a lot ads from stores of dubious virtue?  At best a 2 star magazine</review_text>
This is my favorite magazine in the universe and the only one to which I have ever subscribed. However, after this, my second subscription is over, I plan to call it quits. The magazine never gets delivered unless I send several angry e-mails every month reminding them and demanding delivery. When the issues come they are often 2-3 months behind. The current issue is over three weeks late and who knows when and if I will ever see it. In the end, although this is a brilliant publication, it simply isn't worth the headache. Photo, if you're out there, please forward me the June issue.... and while you're at it get a head start on July and August and maybe they'll make it on time</review_text>
I got a free one year sub. to another gaming mag. with purchase of a game at GameStop. After it ended, about 6 months later, i started receiving this magazine, and i thought it was the same one, some kind of mix-up. But I didn't get a magazine every month. It skipped a few. Finally I went on their site to complain, and they promised to send extra issues to make up for it. I told them that there must have been a mixup...Then I cancelled my supposed "subscription", only to receive an e-mail saying that now they wouldn't be sending me anything, even the extra issues promised. Stay AWAY from these people!These people are extremely unprofessional.Try Playstation mag instead if you have a PS - I was just reccommended it</review_text>
Was a subsciber for many years mainly due to extremely balanced reporting, indepth coverage, etc.  Then, starting about 1-2 years ago, the magazine started to take a "left" tilt.  (I do not consider myself "right wing", am registered as an independant, but do like fair balanced coverage in my news)  Since the beginning of this decline, the Atlantic has become more and more just another liberal magazine.  The bias has also led, as it always does, to less in-depth reporting, since they tend to now ignore any aspect of an issue that does not support the left bent.</review_text>
I was under the impression that this was a literary magazine that would be full of fiction, short stories, essays, book reviews, and literary criticism. Instead I received a magazine that discusses political issues. Does the magazine know what it wants to be? They recently released a special fiction issue on the newsstands. Why would they if they're becoming a political magazine?  Do they want to be a news/political magazines such as Time, U.S. News & World Report, and Newsweek or do they want to be a literary magazine?They're doing a poor job of establishing themselves and drawing the line of what they want to be. I regret subscribing because I felt mislead. Of course for The Atlantic staff, turning the magazine into a political direction will probably bring them more sales. I don't think that reading and literary magazines are dead by any means but the format needs to be revamped so that people will want to read it.</review_text>
I cannot review this item because a month later, I still have not received the first issue of my subscription. SorryFrank Caldero</review_text>
Flipping through the pages of Writer's Digest at a local bookstore, I found some of its content to be particularly useful and interesting, especially those on the trade of writing that could benefit the novice writer. So I decided to subscribe to the magazine and it was only then that I realise that problems do persist in this seemmingly wholesome and helpful magazine.Since I have subscribed online directly through WD's website in Jan 2005, I have received only a few issues. In the first few months for almost half a year, I received no issues at all. It was only later then when I e-mailed them did they manage to get some issues through to me. The annoying thing is that even though I have e-mailed WD a few times on this problem, they would reply apologetically saying that they will extend my subsription. How does this tackle the root of the problem? If they could not have assured its overseas subscribers a consistent service, they should not have offered an 'overseas subscribers' option. Ironically, I received their letter asking for a renewal of my subscription recently with my home address clearly printed on the front of the letter.Logistic problems aside, the magazine does have its plus points. In the issues, there are useful tips for writers not simply on the craft of writing, but also on the business and spiritual aspect of the writing process as well. Occasional issues also features insights into the lives of authors to give us an idea of how and where they work, their opinions on life and the areas from which they derive their inspiration. All this from a range of authors from a range of genres. Essentially, the business of writing is also not left out.However, the magazine is not one fraught without problems. The problem with WD is that the information presented to readers is too limited and scattered. Each article though containing valuable tips on writing, does not have enough depth to really improve the work of authors if they are really implemented. In addition, because of its range, it also does not provide what some writers really want consistently, which can be a waste of time for them to read if they are subscribers. Sometimes, it does seem that the magazine is purposely limiting the information that they give to readers in order to encourage further buying of future issues. This for example, can be seen in the amount of publishers' addresses that they offer. At most, each specific article on a particular topic contains on average 7-10 addresses. There is nothing wrong with this, but why would an author want to waste his time to have bits and pieces of such information when he can just purchase a Writer's market collection of publishers(and agencies) addresses collected into one? And ironically again, the same company does publish a 'Writer's Market' collection which is of excellent quality annually.That said, the same problem - the lack of information and depth, is also seen in the advice and tips it gives as well. To make matters worse, every issue is usually cluttered with a plethora of advertisements that can be frustrating to readers at times. Writers want to organise their time and information, not add on to it.If you want are thinking of subscribing to WD, do consider the alternatives that are currently available. Writing is a craft that requires more common sense and acumen than many would like to think. However, if you are not particularly concerned with little information fed to you in slower dozes or are not too worried about a little more untidiness in your life, than this magazine might be for you. But do your research first</review_text>
Writer's Digest puts out a lot of great resources for writers. The magazine ain't one of them, however.For starters about half of the magazine is ads - mostly for other Writer's Digest products. One you get past paying $19.95 a year for what's essentially a brochure, you'll notice that most of the articles don't apply to you. Most writers stick to one genre, yet the magazine focuses on all aspects of writing - fiction, poetry, business writing, editing, non-fiction, etc. If you're working on a biography of J. Edgar Hoover, do you need to look at an article on poetry in the stlye of ee cummings? I'll take "no" for $600, Alex.So, now you're down to about 10 pages that might be relevant. Well, let's start chipping away at that:The letters about grammar questions are a waste: if you have a question about affect versus effect, would you write to a magazine and wait a month or two or would you pick up your style guide and have an answer in less time than it took for you to read this sentence? Thought so. (Furthermore the idea that someone would write to a magazine with a question like that is so incredulous one has to wonder if the questions aren't just submitted by staff members in an attempt to fill space, like I used to do when I was the news editor at my college paper.)Writer's Digest does review software and other technology that might be useful to writers. My favorite was when it reviewed Microsoft Word. Thanks - I'm sure most readers had no idea about the monopolistic word-processing program. To be fair, some of the reviews are useful, although you can get better information just by looking up the product on Amazon.com and reading the reviews there.If you're going to Writer's Digest for market information, you'd be better served elsewhere: the annual Writer's Market publication has all the markets and is more thorough, whilst the Writer's Market website has all that information and is up-to-date. Your money would be better spent on those two products.About the only articles I have found useful are the profiles on authors and how they have succeeded. There you have it: two or three pages an issue that are useful.If you're trying to get your work published, Writer's Digest has several other products that are a better investment than its magazine: go with the annual Writer's Market book, the website, and pick up a style manual of your choosing (Chicago is the best). Don't waste your money on this magazine</review_text>
Reason once had two things going for it. It articulated principled libertarianism, and it was a consistently interesting magazine. Now its ideology is fuzzy; certainly not consistently libertarian. It is also dull and aimless, often badly written. Case in point: the current issue as I write includes a defense of the FDA by a writer who publically attacks prominent libertarians, and who works for an organization that supports a prohibition on the sale of nutritional supplements, as well as promoting state assaults on the tobacco industry. The "old" Reason would never have published such a piece.  Nor would Reason have previously published Ronald Bailey's article advocating mandatory health insurance. Bailey also supports the Iraq war and psychiatric coercion. A bright spot continues to be the writing of Jacob Sullum</review_text>
While waiting for my daughter in an orthodontic office last month (July 2005), I read through what I thought would be the familiar Redbook magazine of the past. Instead, I was shocked to come across a new sexual advice section in which the explicit techniques for giving your man satisfying oral sex without tiring yourself out was described. Another article within this section explained how a taller man can have sex with a shorter female partner while both standing.I felt embarrassed and outraged that this magazine was out on the tables in the waiting room for any age group to read. I am age 48, college educated and the mother of 2 teenagers. I would not want my 13 year-old daughter to consider this light reading or helpful advice, nor do I think it appropriate for a magazine such as Redbook.Parents please seriously consider whether you want this magazine on the end tables in your homes. IT HAS CHANGED</review_text>
Hi, I am writing this review in an attempt to help you save $10. This magazine is an embarrassment in every angle. It is full of pictures of "sexy" boys/men dressed in cloths no guy with self esteem would ever wear. And pictures is all there is, for you that think there will be something interesting to read, read this: THERE IS NOTHING IN THIS MAGAZINE TO READ!!! The latest issue contains of 48 (forty-eight) pages before you get to this issues contents. The first "article" starts on page 126 (!) and is about "why a man would like to slice of his testicles"! Totally the magazine contains of 260 pages and there is text (letters that forms sentences) on about 40 of them. Besides this, the magazine also has a huge dilemma of being a gay magazine or not.Well I can go on and on but I won't. Unfortunately I have a subscription and I am going to see if I can get it canceled, I don't even need my money back. Take your $10 and run them in the disposal, it will be more fun to clean out the disposal than "read" this magazine</review_text>
Ordered 11/27 - Never received a single copy.  Not very fast is it?  SLOW COMPANY may be a better description.  Can I have my money back</review_text>
all you manager types.you know who you areyou read 'who moved the cheese' and jesus ceo,this is the mag for youlame, triteand oh so self importen</review_text>
I never bought GQ back in my 20s because for one thing, I never thought of myself as a clothes-horse.  Also, I actually took the G in GQ to mean that it was actually for Gentlemen, ie, sipping Champagne on a Yacht pass me the the Caviar type Gentlemen.Well, after now having reached a "certain age" I find myself going back and forth between Esquire and GQ and find that in many cases, neither are exactly right for me.  However, I think I've bought my last episode of GQ.  The 2006 "interview" with Will Ferrel was interesting for the first three paragraphs, and then it became an excercise in self referentialism, disguised as an attempt at wit.Also, the Politics of the magazine are unabashedly anti-Bush Administration, which would be OK except for the fact that I'm not reading GQ for Political content.  There are plenty of magazines out there make this their specialty, and when I find it in GQ, its just tiresome.  Frequently, swipes at Bush and his policies just come out of nowhere in an article, as if the Editor decided that a jab at Bush and his policies might help the piece, regardless of its content.Not to mention - does anyone actually wear the clothing they put on display?  $800 tennis shoes?  I fear that I will be an Esquire reader - I can't bear to become a "Men's Best Life" subscriber just yet</review_text>
I first subscribed to GQ when it was still a quarterly...an issue only every 3 months.  Back then it was primarily a men's fashion magazine.  It was sophisticated, useful and classy filled with clothing men could actually wear and practical grooming tips, trends and style.  I suppose in many ways it resembled a Ralph Lauren print ad. Now fashion is relegated to a few pages in the back of the magazine with men wearing things they seem to have found at a local flea market.  Nothing seems to fit properly, patterns - plaids - stripes...anything goes.  It resembles homeless couture.  Odds and ends that nobody should actually wear.  Sure the world has changed.  But fashion, good taste, and quality are timeless despite tweaking and contemporary preferences.  The editors may feel that grunge, hopeless edginess for it's own sake and adolescent sloppiness sell issues.  But they might be surprised that there's a huge pent up demand for sophistication and real style, both formal and relaxed.  I hope someone else picks up the torch.</review_text>
Don't pay Amazon $34 for this subscription when you can get it directly from National Geographic for $15</review_text>
The legend goes that there was a time a few decades ago when "The Gramophone" was the unquestioned authority for reviews of recordings of classical music.Whether or not that legend is true (I'm too young to know), Gramophone's time has definitely passed. Today there is a multitude of sources of free information on classical music on the internet, from newsgroups to websites. Some of it is less well-informed than Gramophone's criticism, but some of it is more well-informed. What is undeniable is that, for the price of a few mouse-clicks, it is possible to find a far greater range of reviews of recordings on the Internet than Gramophone (with its British-based critics) can offer.What is more, Gramophone is tied to a business-model for the classical music industry that is fast becoming obsolete. Historically, the most important classical recordings were issued by a few so-called "major" companies such as EMI, Deutsche Grammophon and CBS (later Sony). These "majors" would buy lavish advertising spreads in Gramophone and so finance the magazine. In return, Gramophone would devote lengthy reviews to the majors' new releases and would produce pages of fluffy interviews with musicians under contract to the majors.Today the situation is different. The most interesting new release is more likely to appear as a MP3 on an obscure Russian website than on a new CD from Sony. Small companies, dedicated solely to classical music recordings, produce great results on shoestring budgets while the "major" corporations have virtually abandoned new classical recordings.This development causes problems for Gramophone's business model. The new players in the classical music industry don't have the publicity budgets to fund a glossy magazine like Gramophone through advertising. With Gramophone's implicit bargain: "advertise with us or we won't review your recordings", the magazine seems to be becoming more and more irrelevant.If you want to subscribe to a classical music periodical, I recommend "International Record Review" or "Fanfare". Both offer substantially more reviews per month than Gramophone. But most of all, I suggest checking out the huge range of classical music information available for free on the web and usenet</review_text>
Esquire is a subpar Men's magazine, in my opinon.  More than half of the magazine is advertisements, and when you finally get to the articles they are rarely entertaining and/or thought-provoking.  If you like ads and cologne samples, pick it up.  After all, it is pretty decently priced</review_text>
I bought the magazin on november, and I don't recive it yet</review_text>
I hate this magazine.  I subscribed sight-unseen based on the good reviews, and find the recipes are for food that no one in my house would ever eat...way too exotic.  If you like good ol' American fare, don't buy this one</review_text>
I used to love Outburn magazine. I first discovered it when I came across the mag at a local mainstream bookstore chain. The first thing I saw on the cover was VNV Nation. I bought that issue and soon after that I ordered a subscription. What I loved about Outburn at the time was that the magazine covered artists and bands that aren't covered in the mainstream music magazines, namely those in the goth, EBM, synthpop, and industrial scene. Unfortunately within the next year and a half, the magazine started covering less of those types of bands and more death metal bands and hardcore punk bands, two genres I don't give a rat's behind about. I don't know WTF happened at the magazine but they stopped covering anything goth related and started covering more music I would much rather have my ears ripped off by pliers than listen to. Just like Alternative Press, Outburn started out as a cool mag but now they have become a joke and more about following than setting trends</review_text>
If I see another picture of a blurred waterfall or creek I am going to puke...I have not seen one truly imaginative, artistic image in this magazine. Everything is run of the mill, boring, standard outdoor photography.  Lots of sunsets, flower fields.  No different angles or perspectives, colors, nothing new.  The articles are geared toward inexperienced photographers and really repetitive.  I think I clipped one interesting article in a year worth of magazines..</review_text>
I was a charter subscriber to this magazine when it started up publication.  It was a breath of fresh air in a stagnant field of almost universally wretched photography magazines.  Over the years things changed.  Columnists died or moved on.  Editorial directions were switched.  Articles that once inspired now only offered consumerist bullfeathers.  When digital photography became dominant in the marketplace, "Outdoor Photographer" was in the vanguard, pushing every gadget and Photoshop manipulation plug-in that popped up.  The magazine became a wasteland of promises of better pictures if you just buy _____ (fill in the blank with whatever the current trend might be).  What I thought was ironic at the time was that the best photographs they printed were being done by photographers using the least sophisticated equipment.  Photographers using film (!?), a lot of large format guys, occasionally some black and white and stuff made with cameras just about any serious hobbist already owned.  But these portfolios began to dwindle from occasional to rare to almost non-existent.At some point, my interest in this garbage lapsed before my subscription.  The magazine made a once monthly trip from the mailbox to the trashcan without even opening it until they finally stopped sending it."Outdoor Photographer" impresses people who measure quality photography by whether or not the equipment used in production cost the equivalent of the gross national product of small third world countries.  It offers little in the way of nutrition to a hungry mind.  It's empty calories, just making you want more and more while starving your potential.  It truly is wretched.</review_text>
This magazine is just one more reason why women think that men are immature, stupid, and boring.  The magazine does nothing but highlight and impress upon the superficial tendancies of men and in its so-called news coverage gives short details of events and people that doesn't even begin to scratch the surface of good taste.  Don't bother</review_text>
The writing seems to have come from under-educated teenage males who try too hard to look and sound cool.  I wasn't sure if I was reading a magazine or viewing an internet chatroom filled with juveniles.  This magazine isn't for men, it's for boys.However, the one star is for the photos of the women which, we can't deny, both men and boys can appreciate</review_text>
I've at various times subscribed to Stuff, Maxim, and FHM magazines.  Stuff was the only one I ended up not resubscribing to.  It has its moments and the photography is fine.  I would describe it as Maxim's younger brother.  It's whole attitude seems to be like the younger sibling of the popular kid in high school, and this kid then tries to be hip by being just as funny, etc., but it is forced and very juvenile.  It just is snarky and predictable after awhile.  On the other hand, I'm not 21 anymore either, and maybe if I was in my 20's I would find this the height of humor</review_text>
Haven't received this item.  It has been almost 2 months</review_text>
I was told this magazine was good to look at for design ideas. It isn't really, and there isn't really that much to this magazine.  It is just another tired old AOLTimeWarner publication, just like Time, People, or Teen People.  I looked at the August and September issues and the only things in those two that impressed me were the features on Elton John's Out of Africa fundraiser and the article on Julian McMahon.  The rest of it was ads, and not the classy type ads that make the advertising tolerable in Vogue magazine, but the same old ads you'll see anywhere else, and they are annoying.  There were several nonsense fashion articles with the likes of Kelly Ripa (post excessive Photoshop airbrushing tools-one of my professors would call it "plastic person syndrome") Mark Consuelos, waay too much on Jennifer Garner and her baby, and other weird things, such as the trend of designer cupcakes.  I wish I was kidding on the latter, but I am not, nor do I have $25 to spend on a glorified cupcake just because it is Jessica Alba's favorite.  There was entirely too much dress/act/eat/shop/play this way because the stars do it that way in here.  Despite the size of this magazine, there is very little to sink ones teeth into, just way too many photos of the same old same old, and tips for mimicking them.  I am NOT interested in becoming a Teri Hatcher clone, nor am I interested in seeing Vanessa Carlton's pad.  This magazine is for you if you like excessive ads, no diversity, a subscription that is actually not a year (it says that special issues count as regular issues in the magazine) and your life's ambition is to try a cupcake from a bakery in New York because some celebrity did.  This magazine is mediocre at best, and the worst part is, it has the exact same fashion advice as Vogue.  I went with Vogue because there is substance in their magazine, and the ads are classy and very chic.  Leave this one behind-it looks to me like another brain fluff read from the folks at AOL Time Warner.</review_text>
I have only received the paper for 2 weeks.Where is it? why did it stop comin</review_text>
dO not order MENtle floss Magazin.  it preetends to be sMart but It's just a teaz.  Covers intersting toppics, aks good qestions but the ansers are lackng.  Each issu has half a page of corections frm the preevius issu.  whats the point of reeding a mag whitch promises to mak you smarter if its not so clevver itself?  Like ths revue, it dosn't live upto it's claims.</review_text>
I used to sell and fix Macs since the original Mac 128,I have owned 14 Macs over 21 years so I have seen it all.Mac Addict is OK but only because our choices are so slim. Mac User was always the best and I couldn't bother renewing MacWorld after they got nasty with my late payment after I bought it for almost 20 years.I quit buying MacAddict because of all the free disks. They were full of buggy freebies and Ii turned me off. To keep up with Macs, read the NY Times in the Circuits section and David Pogue's column, web site. Also. if you can afford the Wall St Journal, read Walt Mossberg for all Techy things. He gives a fair review and answers any questions he can, Mac Pc, Camera. The Wash Post on line has a good tech writer for Mac stuff.We reallt don't need a Magazine with the Web. Happy Mac-ing and order TIGER.I JUST GOT MY NEW IPOD PHOTO 60 gig and a 1gig Shuttle which I use every day in the gym. Buy Applecare and Apple will cover the (probably) 2 batteries. I have an original IPOD (10Gig in 01) and the battery still works and I abused it on many plane trips. It still runs and is my bedroom pod hooked up to my Bose Cd/Radio. yeah I love toys.Roger Taylo</review_text>
Where Macworld is bad, Addict is dreadful. It is dumbed down to the level of Teen Beat, and the "reviews" don't deserve the name. The extent to which it drools over Apple is embarassing, leaving no pretence of independence. Like its competitor, it exploits the crummy support that typifies the computer industry, so we get articles about the "secrets" of such and such product. A "secret" in the computer industry is a feature or defect that has not been properly documented by the manufacturer. This should be blasted, not applauded. But Addict is happy to exploit readers by selling them the information they should have gotten when they purchased the product</review_text>
This mag needs a new editor. I haven't seen anything interesting in Better Homes for six months. Maybe they are spread too thin with their website and contests</review_text>
This magazine is a waste of money and bores me.  Nothing here to see but ads</review_text>
I subscribed to BHG from their website and ended up subscribing to an additional year.  The articles are helpful to a degree but the layout of this magazine, with its overwhelming amount of advertising, takes away from any good points.  I've found the style to be choppy and very difficult to read because of the ads.  It's hard to tell how long an article is or where it starts.  I rarely find anything I'd want to save.  Overall a disappointment</review_text>
for ads only pretty much. there is not much to read or learn for the common reader. it seems like it's mailing for the fashion elite not for everyone.</review_text>
As a member of a Southern family who treasured this magazine, it is with a heavy heart and a sense of loss that I have decided not to renew my subscription this year.  Yes, I've always given the brides in our family a subscription as a gift, and waited eagerly for my issue to come in the mail.  But those days are past.  Southern Living Magazine has been offered to all states for some time now, and I believe this has caused the editors to try to appeal to a broader readership.  This, in turn, has changed the recipe section into something one can find in any other magazine.  Honestly, I do love all sorts of different cuisines, but in a magazine called "Southern Living", I expect to find wonderful and traditional Southern recipes!  This magazine needs to go back to it's roots.  From now on, I'll be giving new brides a subscription to Southern Lady Magazine, and that's what I'll be reading myself!  I will miss the Christmas book, though.</review_text>
At one time, Southern Living was truly a source in our family for cooking ideas.  Over the past few years, it has become a collection of new things to do with canned and boxed food, in a sad attempt to re-arrange the same old thing for people who do not know how to cook.  Only the Christmas book seems to actually embrace cooking now.  We cannot speak to its information on gardening, just the cooking part.  If it were not my mother's habit of reading Southern Living, we would have cancelled this long ago.  If you are a serious cook, get the cookbooks from years ago.  The current magazine is well beneath you</review_text>
To be honest, I do pick up this Mag from the Newstand 4 to 5 times a year, but I can hardly call myself a fan. If you are looking for a solid computer or tech mag, Wired is not for you, It tries too hard to be hip and trendy, but it's group of Left/Lib Nerds too often come off as being lame and borish.  Wired needs to be "ReWired" to meet the needs of the modern tech community</review_text>
First off, I'm a huge geek.  I love programming and computers and the internet.  You'd think Wired would be like some great magazine for me.  But the whole thing is just so whiney and worried about all this "bad" stuff in the world, it makes you sick.  For every cool article about Japanese robots, you have to wade through like 10 articles about "how America is doomed".  Whatever...  they need to man up</review_text>
I was very disappointed with this magazine.  The tech reviews have absolutely no depth to them.  Most articles are rather pretentious and boring.  In the 5 issues I have received so far only the May 2006 issue had any thing interesting.  And it only had two articles which were worth it.  The first was "Robbed Blind" which was about RFID chips and the second article was "DIY ways to go green"</review_text>
Wired Magazine has proven to me something it had never even occurred to me to imagine: That there is a level of cynical, style-whoring, inaccurate, myopic snarkiness that goes beyond merely "trading substance for style." Wired is consistently behind the curve these days, but that doesn't stop the publication from spinning every article like a golden truth you were too lame to know. In articles about controversial subjects, one side is routinely saddled with straw man arguments that are so blatant and artless that I find them offensive even when I disagree with the parties who have been set up for a fall. Just as often, features which don't discuss a contentious topic still have an edge to them, making fun of a person, group, or idea in a way that isn't enlightening or even humorous, let alone warranted by the subject matter.Generally, Wired is as mean-spirited as it is self-congratulatory. This attitude appeals primarily to the demographic of tech wonks and IT industry tourists professionally and personally deflated by the bubble burst, desperately trying to assert their relevance and relive their high-flying, know-it-all glory. Any content is easily outweighed by the sheer volume of half-truths, shoddy reasoning, and straight-up falsehoods which could easily be revealed and corrected by a casual investigation of the subjects treated in pages choked between high gloss, Yuppie/GenXer-targeted corporate mind-poison (advertising).Isn't the world of technology interesting and magical enough without mixing the spin, double-talk, and factual misrepresentation of a presidential debate with the impotent, absurd bravado of Battle Bot pre-match trash talk? People know little enough about how tech rules the world and how it can, quite plausibly, save it. This magazine could evangelize for technology's promise and educate about its current and future potential. Instead it concentrates on one-shots written in a style that passes for "hip" that forwards an attitude rather than a message, with an emphasis on sensationalism over accuracy, having more in common with advertising than edification</review_text>
I am a low income disabled person and require copious amounts of bathroom reading material, 'Wired' is even too tedious to fill that need. Its sponsors tend to run the lengthy ads reminiscent of old picture filled National Geographics of questionable scientific value. On the other hand the articles, for example in the latest issue, 'Are Higher Gas Prices Good for Us'(paraphrase of title) offer little information and if I had time to do the research this one is particularly like a sheaf of 1970 Nixon press releases in conjunction with the announced Operation Independance. The intention at the time was to free the U.S. from dependance on foriegn oil.Oh we of short memory, condemned to sacrifice our sons and now daughters!Of interest may be the dumb means by which I obtained an unending subscription to this and some other almost as pointless magazines, Playstation Magazine - now X Box Magazine, the completely amoral Men's Health, Garden Club, Cooking. I simply check the highest income level on every form I fill out on the internet and everything else short of a tax form or loan application.Typical of something recieved for nothing  Wired  is not a publication for which I would recommend laying  out any money or time. Including bathroom time.</review_text>
I AM STILL NOT RECEIVING THIS MAGAZINE.  AND I HAD A GIFT SUBSCRIPTION ON THAT ORDER, TOO.  I'VE BEEN MEANING TO GET IN TOUCH.  THOUGHT IT HAD BEEN MORE THAN LONG ENOUGH FOR SUBSCRIPTION TO START</review_text>
Regardless of the quality of the magazine, it is really annoying to see Oprah on every single cover! and to make it worst, she does not pick "regular Oprah shots", instead you look at every issue's front cover and ask yourself "How did they take that picture? She doesn't even look like her!" It's as if Oprah is telling all of us "See how I can look like?" Every month is just a new testimony from Oprah, that money does do wonders.On the top of that, Oprah's personal thoughts, things, favorites, ideas, even more pictures are all over the few pages that are not advertisement.I still gave it 2 stars because from time to time you can find a good article, but the bottom line is the question: Is this a magazine or a show off ?</review_text>
I am sure this will be a great magazine, but I have not received my first issue yet</review_text>
I can not review something that i have not received.  I thought I would have received my first issue by now but have not.If and when i receive the magazien i order i will be happy to review</review_text>
If you want to do the same exercise over and over.. but with better make up and cuter outfit go ahead.If you want better exercises and articles look to Oxygen or Women's M&</review_text>
I use to subscribe to SHAPE several years ago, and then it was packed full of great work out routines, meal plans, etc for women at all levels of fitness.Well . . . my last few months of Shape have been a complete disappointment.  I found very few pages of good genuine fitness and healthy eating advice.  Instead, it ranks right up with Glamour in the category of magazines with the highest percentage of advertisements, nearly all of the excercise material is supposed "quick fix" fitness fluff which gives women very unrealistic expectations, and the healthy eating advise is absolutely elementary.There is no substance in here for women like me, the average working woman who desire to live a healthy life everyday and have limited time to commit to exercise.  I want a magazine that is inspiring with a focus on living a sustained healthy lifestyle, not a joke about getting flat abs in a week with illustrations of perfectly chiseled models who obviously do not face the body challenges of average women.  I'm sorry but most women are not going to look like "her" after two weeks, or many months of Shape's 10-30 minute a day routines, but they sure lead you to beleive so.I highly recommend "Her Sports"  it is THE magazine for women desiring to live an active, day-to-day healthy life</review_text>
While I rarely subscribe to magazines, I was looking for something to motivate me to exercise and so I signed up for a one year subscription to Shape. Before and during college I was a ballet dancer, but after entering the real, 9-5 working world half a year ago, exercise time became more difficult to find. Unfortunately, I found that Shape magazine was not really about exercise at all. It was about beauty products, fancy new-age spas and resorts, and trendy workout accessories. I was also shocked by the models on the magazine's covers and pages. Not only were they skinny but they usually sported next to nothing. I finally cancelled my subscription when a magazine came with a woman in a see-through, lacy top on the front of it, visible nipples and all. Workout wear? I think not! Trust me, the woman belonged in a porn magazine, not my exercise magazine</review_text>
I subscribed to this publication expecting to read reviews of various fiction/non-fiction books - what it turns out to be is a series of editorials, premised around virtually all non-fiction.  All very high-brow and frankly, quite boring.  The one item worthwhile is the classifieds.  I think I'll ask to cancel my subscription and obtain a refund.  I anticipated something that would help me in finding great books to read but after 4 issues, I haven't seen anything of interest</review_text>
This magazine recently (April 05) featured what they felt were the 100 greatest movie moments of all time.  Number 1 was the sing-along scene from MAGNOLIA.  Other moments in the top 10 included the credits from AUSTIN POWERS 3 and one of Eugene Levy's quotes from AMERICAN PIE.  Keep in mind, these are the 100 greatest movie moments of ALL TIME.This mag/rag is nothing more than the film section of FHM stretched out to full-issue length.  Utter trash</review_text>
I have yet to see a PW review of anything that was not vetted by the PC Police, not to mention utterly stupid. When they want to pan a book, they apparently have a list of criticisms they pick from at random, such as "non sequitur" or "murky argument" or "reductionist". They pick them by throwing darts at the list and writing down whatever phrases the darts hit, in ways that prove that they don't actually have any understanding of what the terms mean. It's especially annoying because even when it's a book I like, I can easily see criticisms that someone with a different worldview could make that would be valid, but they don't make them; that would require work.The reviews are so shoddy and wildly inaccurate that I thought about asking Amazon.com to stop using them for the product info pages, but then it occurred to me that any book PW pans is guaranteed to be good, so they are useful in a backwards way. Anytime PW praises a book, I don't bother with it, but if they attack it, I know it's going to be great</review_text>
A friend of mine got me a subscription to this magazine because I like Cooks Illustrated.  This magazine is nothing but ads for snazzy expensive foods and restaurants.  There are so few recipies in it I wouldn't call it a 'cooking' magazine.  What few recipies they do have don't explain why they chose the ingredients used or give much detail at all.If you consider yourself a 'foodie' who likes to go to fancy restaurants and likes to know what's hip on the latest gourmet food and wine, then this magazine might be for you.  If, however, you like to cook and know what you are doing and why you are doing it, try Cooks Illustrated instead.</review_text>
Order placed early June. First issue of subscription not yet received. This is service</review_text>
Lucky is one of my frequent checkout pickups. Bright, fun, and not requiring any frontal lobe interference, it's the perfect pick-me-up for the early morning commuter train. I give it five fabulous stars!However, the actual subscription was very underhanded! Within the space of a week I was sent last month's issue (long gone from the stands), the issue just about to decirculate, and, finally, the actual current issue. So, two weeks after my order i am already 3 issues in to a 12 issue subscription, and none too happy about it. Cond Nast needs to be told that subscribers do not exist to let them clear out their unsold backlog</review_text>
Lucky Magazine makes me feel Not so Lucky.  It makes me sad that I can not afford all the items they put in their magazine.  One month they tell me round-toed shoes are in and show me 50 pictures of shoes that I would love to own of which 2 I can afford.  Then the following month Lucky tells me round-toed shoes are out and square-toed shoes are in and show me another 50 pictures.  You get the idea?  This magazine is based on trends and you will be broke if you try to keep up and feel bad if you can't afford all the great things it is showing.I did enjoy Lucky for it's profiles on upcoming designers, some great website links, and the one or two affordable items it does toss in each section.  I also got a few ideas on how to wear clothing in new and different ways.   Most of the time, though, I felt sad and envious after I finished reading it.  These are feelings I'd rather not encounter.  I think I would enjoy it more if it were more informative discussing the quality differences in the items they are showing, maybe testing them out in different situations to help me make the best choice in my purchases.</review_text>
I cancelled my subscription to this magazine 6 months ago with a letter to the editor stating that I loved to see nude woman, but subscribed to learn from the masters about photography.  I cannot tell you how disappointed I was when I resubscribed after not taking the magazine for years... it used to be a wonderful magazine chock full of insightful articles, lighting techniques, studio setup diagrams, lots of great stuff... I subscribed to a 2 year deal through an online subscriber and asked them to quit sending it after only 6 months and to keep the money.Not worth the paper it is printed on- period.  Apeture I hear is pretty good, and I also hear Popular Photography has gotten much better and now only 95% about advertising and product reviews and at least 5% helpful tips and tricks..</review_text>
American Photo began as a magazine devoted more to photography than to gear, as an alternative to the gear obsessed magazines like Pop Photo and Photographic. It has evolved into a magazine that divides its pages between equipment obsession and cheesy &quot;glamour&quot; photography that tries for art and delivers soft core porn. No stars</review_text>
Bad journalism and plenty of adds....if you like to exoticize Black people then this is your mag.....Nothing to be gained here except maybe the cost</review_text>
I ordered this magazine as a gift for my brother almost 5 months ago and he still has not received an issue. I cannot get a straight answer from anyone about what is happening and I have not even been able to get my money back.  I would not recommend anyone wasting their money with this magazine unless they can find a legitimate web site to get it from.Kerr</review_text>
CT is quick to call the collection agency.  They require written &quot;opt-out&quot; notification from the subscriber that the subscription is to be terminated.  Beware, these guys are a credit risk.  Too much trouble for what is otherwise a good magazine</review_text>
If you are into high brow interior design then this is for you.  But my problem is not so much with the magazine as it is about their customer service at Veranda and the subscription department's ability to read.  They are by far the worst</review_text>
2 months after ordering, i have year to get my first issue.  i'm sure i'll like it...if i ever get it</review_text>
The heft and page quality of this magazine is impressive, but it's mostly advertising.  Very disappointing.  It does have some useful info and I do enjoy reading it (which is why it got 2 stars from me), but I definitely won't be renewing my subscription</review_text>
Ordered my wife a subscription last christmas.Recieved 2 issues, never got the rest of them.I'll never order magazines through Amazon again.</review_text>
About two years ago, Vanity Fair was not only the best magazine of the year, but maybe all time.  I would read it from cover to cover.Now, sadly, it is a bunch of fluff.  The quality has really gone downhill.  I am going to let my subscription run out.  I really miss the old days</review_text>
I'd always heard about interesting articles in this magazine. But the mess of ads and People magazine gossip that lands (with a big, heavy thud) on my doorstep every month is the most worthless magazine I've ever made the mistake of purchasing. It's pretentious tripe aimed at a small group of NYC media insiders, self-regarding movie celebs, and those people who'd like to be part of that world. Even when they occasionally hit on a compelling subject, the writers are so narcissistic as to be truly repellent. It'd be more accurate simply to cut "Fair" out of the title</review_text>
A self absorbed mag that likes to pat itself on the back for feeling pity for the lower 'folks.' They named Cindy Sheehan in their January 2006 Best of the Best issue for 'best stand!' They are so diluded they think that 'nut'is making an honorable stand-only by using her son's honorable death to serve her ego! Secondly, open the edition Tom Ford and you will be discusted with his self-gloating, and sexist photography of women. I don't mind nude pictures, but he only uses women-like sex objects. Reese Witherspoon (highest paid actress in Hollywood) is showed holding a doll by it's arm with an empty stare into the lens.the men are portrayed in sexual positions with the women, and the African actors portrayed are dressed in animal skins!Revolting</review_text>
I TRASHED THE ISSUE WHEN I SAW THE SHOT OF TRASHY PARIS HILTON.  THERE IS ENOUGH NUDITY ALREADY IN YOUR PUBLICATION AND SEEING THAT SAD PIECE OF WORK (HER) ON THE COVER JUST TURNED ME OFF COMPLETELY.  SORRY YOU THOUGHT HER 'COVER WORTHY'.  PROBABLY MISSED SOME FINE ARTICLES.  SINCERELY: DEANE EVERETT</review_text>
After falling in love with Gourmet's yellow cookbook, I subscribed to Gourmet, hoping for the same great classic recipes and commonsense commentary.  Wow, what a disappointment.  I have just received my second issue and, as another reviewer said, it is about 90% ads for high-end luxury goods like jewelry and cars.  The 6-page "Special Advertisement Section" stops being so special when there are 20 of them in one issue! What happened, Ruth Reichl?  The few recipes that one can find are unattractive and/or too difficult for even weekend cooking.For those cooks looking for a great cooking magazine, I highly recommend Bon Appetit over Gourmet: the majority of the magazine is recipes and cooking tips, with only interspersed ads.  I will be calling to see if I can get my subscription switched tomorrow.</review_text>
I would agree with previous reviewers, in that the burgeoning ads in this magazine over the past decade has made the magazine a chore to read.  The number of ads now easily exceed the number of pages devoted to articles.  It is also quite disturbing to note that many of those ads (possibly 50% or higher) pitch ultra high end products, such as Viking ranges, BMW's, Oceanna Cruises, trips to Bora Bora...WTF? Although I do enjoy I a luxury meal, I don't want to go into massive credit card debt purchasing products this magazine is selling.  Ocassionally, behind the clutter, I find a useful recipe; I rarely find an interesting article.I am going to let my subscription expire at the end of the current period</review_text>
I began subscribing to Gourmet in 1961, and continued to subscribe for about forty years. I also gifted family members with subscriprions.I discontinued my subscription because the magazine has deteriorated so much in the last several years: There are so many ads and tear-outs in the magazine that one can hardly find the recipes, at least half of the magazine, and sometimes more; also I object to the "political," and some downright offensive, articles. I am Catholic, and I was very offended by an outrageous article charging that, during the Nazi era,naked Jews were made to crawl through the streets on their knees by persons, which the article linked in some way to the Catholic Church. I think that the information was apochryphal; and, what does this have to do with food?</review_text>
First issue arrived today. After tearing up  8 or 9 insert ads which made it difficult to read the magazine, I sat back to enjoy. First article  was a lecture by Robert F. Kennedy Jr. on the danger of mercury in fresh water domestic fish. Perfectly safe to fish we are informed (well duh). Just don't eat what you catch. Expectant mothers should be extra careful as babies with high level of mercury have lower IQs. The net is full of peer-reviewed studies from major universities on the subject of mercury poisoning. Why buy a food magazine to read what an activist lawyer has to say about the subject?Next article was in: "Politics and the Plate". The controversy  here concerns local and season foods. Gourmet asks: "Are those who promote them sincere? Or is it just a come on for gullible diners?"  So who does Gourmet think is "gullible"? The reader? Implication seems to be the reader is too stupid to figure out that yes, vendors might promote locally grown products that aren't all that terrific. Nothing of substance in this article at all.Going back to the front, an editor of Gourmet recalls how her late father didn't appreciate health food stores (Aren't fathers stupid?).Three downer articles in a row. I gave up. This isn't the magazine I remember from 20 years ago. Even the format is annoying. It is difficult to know where ads end and articles begin (recall the most junked up website you've seen, that is the Gourmet model)If you do enjoy the politics and  the environmental stuff (on either side)  you can do better on the net for free. If you want entertaining, informative articles on food, Gourmet is not the place to look.Subscribed to Saveur at the same time as Gourmet. It is a pleasure to read.  No annoying ads, no political screeds. Great photographs. Interesting and exotic recipes. As good or better than Gourmet was decades ago.</review_text>
I've subscripted to Gourmet for years but I let my subscription run out.  The lifestyle articles keep pushing out the recipies.  As I read through food magazines I dog-ear the page with a recipe I want to try.  In the last year there were very few dog-eared pages and it wasn't worth continuing the subscription</review_text>
Today I purchased my first and probably last issue of Gourmet. While there were plenty of recipes (some of which I won't use but they were still cool to look at) there were TONS of ads.It makes you wonder either a) how much the people who make this magazine get paid or b) for all the ads why this isn't free.I can see the need for a few ads so that we the consumers don't have to pay a fortune for a good magazine. But I took out 33 pages of ads and figured there were about 140 full page ads. That's over half of the magazine which is 260 pages. That's really sad.Recipe wise, some of them look interesting and very gourmet, but there are things you need to have that I can't get in the middle of the U.S.And about three of the six articles were interesting to read - when you could find them slipped inbetween their plethora of ads.Fine Cooking is still the best one out there</review_text>
I found this magazine to be helpful for an introduction to advanced computing.  That's about it.  This mag seems to be biased towards certain products &amp; manufacturers.  They neglected to open my eyes wider.  The reviews/articles that are published seem to favor big money companies (microsoft, dell, etc). They don't give credit to smaller, better, less-well-known companies and technologies.  All the info is pretty basic for intro users, but if that's what you are interested in... then this is a great non-comlicated publication</review_text>
I paid I never received magazine at all even though I received all four of the other magazines that were ordered at the same time</review_text>
i wouldn't know if this was a good magazine, i have yet to receive it, after waiting three months.  it is cheaper to order through food and wine website anyway</review_text>
The editor's gratingly smug and breezy monthly letter sets the pace for this vapid Lifestyle magazine, which you'll enjoy only if you're like her -- rich, creepily entitled, self-absorbed, and interested merely in the accoutrements of opulent dining, but not really food or actual cooking itself.</review_text>
I subscribed to Food &amp; Wine for a while and was continuously disappointed. The articles are on the superficial side and more importantly a lot of the recipes and product reviews are not as well researched as they should have been. I experienced more than one flop trying their stuff. The magazine tries very hard to be trendy and pick up the latest and greatest in the cooking and restaurant scene without being careful enough in deciding what is actually an important or meaningful trend rather than a fad. This magazine can't hold a candle to &quot;Bon Appetit&quot; or &quot;Gourmet&quot;</review_text>
I like to read Cook's Illustrated at the library.  Their magazine is much too expensive for the small amount of recipes included within. I like the tips sent in by readers, and some of the product reviews.I have found that most of their recipes are very involved--nitpicky, to be kind.  The lemon meringue pie recipe--which I tried from their "America's Test Kitchen" cookbook--calls for cooking cornstarch in water, cooling it, and then beating the solution into the meringue. Supposedly this keeps the meringue from destabilizing.  All that happened in my kitchen was I found little lumps of cornstarch glue at the bottom of my mixing bowl while scraping out the meringue.  I have made meringue before without cornstarch, and can't help thinking this is an extra step that isn't neccessary. Their "best" brownies are good, but I can make equally good brownies without all the extra steps involved in melting chocolate and cooling it, etc.If you're looking for easy, fool proof recipes, that don't take a gazillion steps and aren't fussy about exactly what ingredients you use, this isn't the magazine for you</review_text>
This is a good magazine for the home cook that wants to branch-out from the standard Family Circle or Good Housekeeping  no risk recipes.My BIG problem with this company is once they've got your contact information, you will receive more junk mail than you thought one company could generate; hawking every single publication they produce, relentlessly.I stopped subscribing and it took a year to stop receiving their snail spam; and there's no way to 'opt out' onlin</review_text>
I subscribed to Cooks Magazine some years ago, back when it  began publishing again.  I had problems with issues that failed to arrive, and wrote to them about it - never received a reply or any note of concern.Since that time, I occasionally glance through it at newsstands to see if there are any articles of interest.  Even by dint of casual glance, I've begun to tire of the formulaic articles in which some drone tirelessly adds or deletes ingredients in order to finally come up with the "perfect recipe" for something or other.  I now skip right to the "perfected" recipe, and decide whether its worth committing to memory.  Some of the explanations for the success or lack thereof of the inclusion or exclusion of a particular ingredient are hare-brained at best.There are also two other areas of this magazine that have disappointed me:1.  Product Reviews:  They range from just plain wrong to idiotic.The KitchenAid Pro 600 was hailed by Cook's as the best in its class for many mixing chores.  Yet, the Amazon reviews tell a different tale - one of a short lifespan when used to mix bread dough because of a plastic gear cover that deforms and finally comes apart, allowing the metal gears to separate.Christopher Kimball (the editor) once performed an evaluation of cookware in which he calculated the price of the cookware per pound of its weight.  No, I'm not joking.  In that evaluation, Le Creuset came out on top simply because it was heavy.  All-Clad, even though it conducts heat very evenly, suffered for not having as much heft, and therefore was judged pricey, on a pound weight basis.One issue of Cooks boasted on its cover "Unsweetened chocolate -supermarket brand beats others".  Apparently, Hershey's was designated best.  Not too many months later, Callebaut was recommended above all others, and Hershey's was judged barely acceptable.  Feeling manipulated yet?2.  Finally, there are those dreadful editorials by Mr. Kimball.  Rambling, painfully written, and punctuated with a picture of Mr. Kimball wearing a bow tie, and looking very much as if his head were being held on by it. Mr. Kimball is a humble man, with much to be humble about.  He writes as if he were chanelling Helen Gurley Brown, but in red and black flannel watch-plaid and without her sense of play.Time to re-vamp this magazine, folks</review_text>
Cook's Illustrated is the first cooking magazine that I'd found myself truly motivated to read cover-to-cover, even though they DO insert advertisements for their own products, which I suppose, to them, makes this an "ad-free" magazine, but I'm not surprised they've bent the rules with that claim. The one time I found it necessary to contact Cook's Illustrated about a customer service issue, I was simply floored by the treatment that I received... I'll simply leave it at that.I personally don't intend on re-subscribing ("Fine Cooking", here I come!). You, however, may find that this is the cooking magazine for you. And, as far as what they do goes, Cook's Illustrated IS good at what they do - I'll give them that.If you have not found this review to be helpful, I'm sorry if I haven't made the value in my warning apparent. Just know that there are those of us out there who HAVE had bad experiences, and are simply trying to prevent others from experiencing the same.</review_text>
I should preface this reveiw with the fact that I am an accomplished home cook.  I have been cooking for 25 years and own more than 500 cookbooks.  I do not buy commercially prepared products like breads, crackers, mayonnaise or salad dressings.  I make these items myself.  I suspect that I am not the target audience for this publication.The May/June 2006 issue is 32 pages in length in total.  Given that there are only 6 issues a year, I was expecting a little more than a mere 32 pages.The May/June 2006 issue contains the following information:Simplifying Moroccan ChickenBringing Home Fish and ChipsGrilled Tomato SalsaGrilled London BroilMain-dish Vegetable Stir-friesHow to cook pastaFoolproof Veal ScaloppiniA new Twist on Chicken SaladsGarlic and Olive Oil Mashed PotatoesUtimate Turtle BrowniesBest Strawberry Cream CakeThe Scoop on Vanilla Ice CreamA review of tongsIf you are an experienced cook their isn't much about cooking in this issue that will be new to you.  This issue contained not a single piece of new information for me about cooking.  However, I enjoyed the equipment reveiws and did find them informative and useful.This magazine would be helpful if someone is an inexperienced cook.  Bottom line, I will not be renewing my subscription unless future issues have a little "more meat" in their content.  I think that this magazine is overpriced for what you receive.  I would suggest saving the price of the subscription and buy their "Best of" cookbook instead.  It costs about the same amount, contains many more recipes, has many of their equipment reviews and is bound in a hard cover so that it will hold up longer.  Additionally, check out an issue of "Fine Cooking" which is another test kitchen type of publication, just with more depth.</review_text>
As a professional photographer, I think the organization that publishers this magazine has truly lost their way.  The images are predictable and unimaginative and haven't changed in the past 25 years.  There are much better magazines to read</review_text>
There are very few serious articles in this magazine-- just tons of tidbits (stats/facts/tips). By the time you get to the end it's difficult to recall anything from the magazine; it's that shallow.Occasionally there's a good recipe, but that's about it</review_text>
I started my first subscription to this one in 1980-81. It was EXCELLENT!! It had all kinds of great advice and help on real issues relating to "preventing" ailments/conditions.  Now it's a little advertising manual for drug users and fad dieters!  Wow...what a change now. I'm not interested in "paying" to read ads. I'll get my motivation and information on more reliable sources.  Besides, I got tired of all the little order forms that kept falling out on my lap while I rode the stationery bike!  What a waste of trees. :</review_text>
This magazine seems most interested in promoting books, etc. that it has a financial interest in--most notably lately the South Beach Diet. Prevention and it's website are now full of misleading banner ads promoting irresponsible dieting techniques and fads.  Too bad, because more than ever nowadays we could use a nice little magazine about nutrition, weight loss, exercise and natural remedies that isn't influenced by it's publishing partners and advertisers. Skip this one, and try Self or Health for a more well-rounded look at women's heath needs</review_text>
Back in the 1970's my grandmother subscribed to Prevention. At that time, it was a wonderful magazine, filled with informative articles aimed at the "Prevention" of illness and the promotion of wellness (as the founder of Prevention, J.I. Rodale had preached). Articles about the role of vitamins and nutrition were light years ahead of their time. (J.I. can be given a lot of credit for bringing vitamins and supplements to the mainstream). Over the years, and especially after the tragic death of Robert Rodale (J.I.'s son), and the takeover by his wife and daughter, it has unfortunately transformed into a fluffy, tabloid-like "women's magazine" with scantily clad women on the covers, and one- or two-page articles instructing women to get killer abs and burn the fat. I think J.I. Rodale is probably spinning in his grave to see what his descendents have done to butcher this magazine, which bears NO resemblence whatsoever to what it used to be. I flipped through a copy in disgust recently to note, as another reviewer has stated, plenty of ads for DRUGS which really seems to go against the idea of preventing illness in the first place (whereas the old Prevention sang the praises of vitamins and health foods). I don't know why the Rodale family doesn't just scrap the title and call it something else, but alas, they are a major corporation now and I have little hope that this magazine will improve any time soon</review_text>
This magazine comes with lots of advertisements - 70% or more. Plus, articles (less than 15 articles in every issue) in the magazines are not very useful.  I subscribed the magazine because it is inexpensive and it is rated high by other subscribers.  Now I realize I made a mistake.</review_text>
I got this as a freebie along with W and it lasted only as long as I received it for one year.  The use of fur and skins was nauseating and I couldn't have been more disgusted at the vapid, innocuous, 'insights' it offered.  This magazine has no redeeming social value.</review_text>
A friend once said to me, "If you want a glossy that is a no brainer then get Vogue!"How right she is, despite having glorious photography, fashion models that daren't stand sideways or you wouldn't be able to see them and the occasional good article in it, I have to admit I find Vogue too pretentious.Vogue wants to be the voice of fashion, the voice of the high brow media but its clientele are the likes of you and me, ordinary people who can't afford to live the high life they are portraying on its gloss filled pages.Personally I'd rather spend my money on a movie ticket, I get to see a good thriller, sci-fi, romance etc, etc I don't have to know about the substence abuse and emotional demons that haunt a particular actor's life, I'm just interested in enjoying myself for a couple of hours before I go back to my hard working life in the real world.Vogue is trying to sell me a dream that I don't really want to buy into, never had a penchant for selling my soul to the devil,  it's gets two stars though because the photography is really superb, shame about the rest of it though</review_text>
I was looking forward to a magazine that took a good look at different subjects than those covered in the mainstream media. What I received was a manual on how to think the "right" way. I've never delved deeply into politically labeling myself, but I vaguely considered myself a liberal. Man, was I wrong. Clearly, liberal means much the same as the demonized "conservative". This magazine has a single viewpoint, that of an ultraliberal ex-hippie who has found themselves wealthy in the 21st century. It is full of articles about "finding meaning" and "reassessing life" that seem to have been written by folks who drive Chevy Suburbans and pay too much for a cup of coffee. The magazine gives off a strong smell of covert superiority, and it made me nauseous</review_text>
How people can read and be fooled by the nonsense sprouted in ths rag is beyond me. All the usual suspects are found through out it's pages. This rag represents all those things that leftists are now notorious for: Polictal correctness, anti-capitalists, anti-gobalisers etc With all these -isms and ologies your in for a pain in the head. What's more the 'ideas' you'll find here have been tried, tested and more importantly failed. Ah well... some people are just too easy to fool</review_text>
I ordered this mag back in JUNE, now it's DECEMBER and I've yet to receive it. This equals a big fat ZERO in my book.</review_text>
I would like to classify myself as a moderate but I probably lean conservative.  Because of that, I subscribed to Harpers so that I could read good writing that would challenge my beliefs and stretch my mind in new ways.  I got that, more or less, at first, but over the course of a couple of years the magazine drifted further and further to a leftist propaganda screed, the worst of which was Louis Lapham's bitter drivel editorials.  It got to a point where the writing was incredibly predictable; I knew exactly what position (read:  left of Pelosi) the writer--any writer in Harpers--would take on whatever the issue was, and I had a pretty good idea of what the line of whining would be.If you attend dinner parties on the Upper East Side; if you drive a Prius to the Oscars; if you think commercial organic farming is an environmental travesty; if you've ever desecrated a Starbucks, then look no more--this magazine is for you.However, if you're dumbfounded at how the Republicans can keep winning elections--and then you realize they have the Democratic party as opponents; if you realize the genius of George Bush and Karl Rove is in getting liberals to underestimate George Bush and Karl Rove; if you want to read smart, insightful writing that will inform and entertain, then try The Atlantic Monthly (which, by the way, I am surprised to see reviewers describe as a liberal magazine; I think it is moderate, and if anything, a bit on the conservative side.)   Needless to say, I let my Harpers subscription lapse.Two stars, tho, for the Harper's Index--however, that wasn't worth the price of a subscription (it got to be the only thing worth anything for the price of the subscription).</review_text>
I've read many positive reviews of this magazine and I did receive, several months ago, a trial issue. After sending in the subscription fee, I was billed again. I wrote a note letting them know that the check had been endorsed and deposited. Yesterday, I got a notice telling me my subscription had expired after one issue. I give up. It might be good, but customer service is really lousy. What a disappointment.</review_text>
There was a time when liberalism had a connotation of deep thinking, tolerance, and openness to healthy, civil debate.No longer.  And HARPER'S is a perfect symbol for all that ails the Left.  To call this magazine "Left leaning" is a farce.  It doesn't lean...it completely, totally, enthusiastically, and blindly tumbles and falls into the "Far Left" swamp.  The tone is often hysterically and shrilly partisan, reflecting the ongoing deafness and disconnection that the leftist media elites have towards the mainstream of America.The quality of the writing and feature selection has declined precipitously through recent years.  This rag is about as credible now as THE GUARDIAN, NATIONAL ENQUIRER, or, come to think of it, The New York TIMES!  Save your money, LOL!</review_text>
So I ordered the magazine in Nov. 6, 2005. Its now Feb. 22nd, 2006 and the magazines (since I also ordered the Smithsonian and Scientific American) are nowhere to be seen. Of course, my account was quickly charged and at this pace, I'm guessing the whole genomic structure of all living organisms in this planet will be decoded before I receive any of them... so if you actually want to read this excellent magazine, it might be a better idea to get somewhere else..</review_text>
I dont enjoy this publication at all anymore, dont know if editorial leadership has change</review_text>
Gee, I guess I really can't rate it.  I ordered it on August 9th, and still have not recieved it as of November 3rd.  Guess I'll know better then to order through Amazon again</review_text>
I've been a People subscriber for 2 years now & I quite agree with the majority of reviewers... Same Celebrities, different week. If it isn't Tomkat/kitten, it's Branjelina or Benifer 2. Oh, and we cannot forget "Mrs. Oops, I Did It Again" Spears-Federline. Very little on real people/human interest stories anymore, very little...As for the actual magazine, it seems I've become, through no choice of my own, one of People's Quality Control employees. After subscribing, I informed Customer Service of my allergy to their scented inserts. I was told a note would be made to my account and I would no longer receive inserts in my magazine. Here is where my job of QC employee came in, with my having to remove these inserts several times the first year, then again the second year in which I made another call to Customer Service. They apologized. Stated there was a note on my account regarding my request then they offered to extend my subscription for two more weeks.Next problem and part of my "new" job requirements... reassembling my magazine. I received at least 4 or 5 issues of People put together either backwards, upside down or with half of the magazine in the front & the other half flipped over in back. In order to read and enjoy these issues, I had to remove the staples, try and rearrange the pages & then line the pages up by the staple holes to reinsert the staples. Again I called Customer Service to complain. Again they apologized then offered to extend my subscription another 2 weeks.I've since written to cancel my subscription. I've not heard a word back from People Inc., regarding this. We'll see how it turns out</review_text>
As a child I remember finding this magazine at my doctor's office and reading it because it was the only thing available. It has not changed much. There are no redeeming features to make up for the dated and patronizing content. This Magazine will neither stretch your child's mind nor keep him entertained. It only teaches the child what he already knows and feeds him what he has already seen. In the coming era of global connection, children must become aware of other parts of the world and lifestyles alien to them. Only telling them what is already common in their everyday lives helps to foster racism and xenophobia</review_text>
I ordered this magazine a year ago, and my nephew still haven't receive a single magazine!  Every time I email customer service they would tell me that it's coming next month.  I will let you how the magazine is when I get it, but don't hold your breath.</review_text>
I started ordering Glamour 2 months ago, and honestly it is a huge disappointment to me. There are so many ads in this magazine its unbelievable. Ladies, my advice is to save your money for a different magazine..I dont recommend Glamour at all.</review_text>
DO NOT BUY THIS MAGAZINE! FOR ANY PRICE, IT IS TOO EXPENSIVE. MARIE CLAIRE HAS HARASSED ME REPEATEDLY TO PAY FOR MY SUBSCRIPTION.  IT WAS PAID FOR IN ADVANCE THRU AMAZON. I HAVE SENT THEM COPIES OF MY AMAZON RECEIPT TWICE.  THEY ARE REPORTING ME TO A CREDIT AGENCY FOR NON-PAYMENT.  AVOID THEM, AVOID THEM.  THEY ARE SCAM ARTISTS AND WILL FALSELY AND WITH MALICE DESTROY YOUR CREDIT RATING.</review_text>
I'm a big player of PC games, but I also love reading and thinking about my favorite hobby. For the past few years I've been living in the UK, but when I come to the US (and now that I live here again) I would pick up the American version of PC Gamer.I have to say, and I hope some of you take my word on this, the U.K. publication is light-years ahead of this one. The humour is grown-up (not to mention actually funny) and doesn't drown the magazine. It's bigger, the cover and pages are of much better quality paper and ink, the articles are neatly laid out... added to this, the demo disc is a jam-packed dual sided DVD, with archives of patches, movies, free games, demoes, hardware guides....Not to mention the fact that there are many highly intelligent articles every month.In case you're still feeling sceptical: the UK version of PC Gamer was the original. It came to the US after it was set up in the UK.Having lavished the UK PC Gamer with praise, I think you can read between the lines and figure out where the US version falls short</review_text>
This magazine used to be THICK, fun to read, full of information. But that was about 5 years ago. Now it's just a flimsy looking mag filled with vulgarities and non-sense. The editorial is almost always filled with political opinions. I won't renew my subscription</review_text>
This publication has no business calling itself a "magazine"; published by San Diego book distributor American Marketing Servies, this is nothing more than a fluffy info-mercial for its clients and publishers they want to woo. Don't waste your money</review_text>
This publication has no business calling itself a "magazine"; published by San Diego book distributor American Marketing Servies, this is nothing more than a fluffy info-mercial for its clients and publishers they want to woo. Don't waste your money</review_text>
This magazine reads like an inflight magazine: something airlines, careful to not stir any scary adreneline rushes, put out to lull their readers to sleep. Not controversy here. No thought-provocation. Don't you wish someone out there would publish a really good magazine about books? One that featured meaty stories and well-written reviews? Well, alas, this one ain't it. It is dull and bland. Occasionally it offers up a conservative book review by neocon writer Catherine Seipp, who is about as enlightening as Bill O'Reilly (that is, entertaining and offensive and laughably stupid) so this can sometimes cut the dull. But someone here said bland and I agree. Avoid this one if you have an IQ above 90. Pick up The New Yorker, The Atlantic Monthly or Harper's if you like to read intelligent writing. Or, if you like romance novels, mysteries and other badly written pieces of fluff--which is all this magazine covers--this might just be the thing for you. I want my money back</review_text>
ITS BEEN MONTHS AND I STILL HAVE NOT RECIEVED MY COPY OF  THIS MAGAZINE.  THEY HAD NO PROBLEM CHARGING MY CREDIT CARD, BUT THEY CANT SEEM TO GET A COPY OF THIS WEEKLY MAGAZINE OUT IN UNDER A QUATER OF A YEAR. WHAT A BUNCH OF NONESENSE.</review_text>
articles weren't anything new. mostly fluff and cosmetic/clothes ads. better info and exercises in Oxygen and Women's M&F.</review_text>
We subscribed to this for a school fundraiser. The first issue came November 13 with many useful  coupons, ONLY they expired in October 2006! I wish I could get my money back on a useless magazine filled with alot of advertising. If you want a decent health magazine, try PREVENTION. They have alot more to offer than this rag. Save your money, I wish I had!Take the time to search around. I hope this saves someone from making the mistake I had</review_text>
Occasionally when I go to the grocery store I pick up a magazine by the check out counter. So I bought an issue of Fitness magazine and then decided to get a subscription. I don't know what the heck I was thinking. Each time I got the issue I noticed there was always some skinny blond chick on the cover wearing a bikini.  There were NEVER any women of color on the cover. So when I was sent a letter, asking if I'd like to renew my subscription, I said he11 no. I'm not wasting my money on a so-called fitness magazine that doesn't feature women of color on its cover. There's just no way. I thought fitness was for everybody, not just for skinny blondes who wear bikinis. And just because your skinny doesn't make you `fit' either. Skip this if possible</review_text>
I subscribed to this magazine for a year and found it a waste of money. Every issue has a girl in a bikini on the front (can't a woman look sexy in anything but?) And every issue claims to have "the best ever exercise for...." ok..what about the last 10 issues that claimed to have the same thing..those exercises are no longer "best ever?" I didn't like the fashion sections, and I also don't like how there really aren't any articles. When I subscribe to a magazine I'd like to be able to read it, not just look at pictures. The only thing I liked about it were the success stories..and even those seemed repetitive...are we only allowed fruit and grilled chicken?</review_text>
I ordered the magizine subsribtion and when I ordered they told me it would take up to 6 weeks, So I went out and bought that months issue.  A few weeks later that issue came, which is understandable but they had sent me the previous month before that.  I hadnt even ordered my subsription that month.</review_text>
I picked up an issue of this magazine last week because I wanted to take the picture of the cover girl into my hair dresser. After I got it home, I opened it up to check it out and discovered it is the most brainless magazine I have ever seen. The articles read like something from "Teen Beat", yet it's filled with adult material. There were about 10 articles on "how to please your man" and "what guys like" and even a "sex workout". These articles didn't contain any "real" advice--just unintelligent babble. For instance, did any of you know that guys don't like it when you act unenthusiastic during sex? HMMM, crazy.Anyway, I don't see how anyone over the age of 16 could find any of this stimulating, and yet there are too many articles about one-night stands for anyone under 18 to read.But if you're still into taking quizzes and looking at "half-naked hunks" who have barely hit puberty, then this magazine is perfect. I would have given this magazine 0 stars, but unfortunately it's not an option</review_text>
If you're in search of a magazine for women that actually has worthwhile content then move on. There is nothing of substance in Cosmopolitan. Open the latest issue and you will find "sex tips that will drive your man crazy!!!" and "snag that cutie!!" galore. It's pathetic. And sophomoric.The sad thing is young women purchase magazines like this and want to emulate the fake lifestyles within that revolve around a) Looking for your "one true love" and by default B) How to achieve multiple orgasms with random sexual partners/boyfriends whilst on said search! And let's not forget inane question and answer spreads. Those are a hoot with such inquires as "my crack gets really itchy. What should I do?"No, this magazine is not my bible.This is another publication that deserves to be thrown into a furnace</review_text>
I was reading this magazine at work, and I consider it to be a trashy magazine. It only focuses on the sexual part of women, like if sex is the best thing in the world, because they had this article in which a girl was riding a taxi, and she thought the taxi guy was fine, so she unbutton her shirt and told the taxi guy to touch her breasts. And then she says it was the *best experience she ever had.I just cant believe they publish garbage like that, giving the message to women that its ok to undress yourself with a total stranger, who you dont even know.I prefer to read things that focus more on the inner heart, on the emotional, and spiritual side of things. And read books that will help me be a better person right now and the future, and throw away the garbage this society has</review_text>
Once thought of as a women's health magazine, Cosmo has taken a twisted turn into pointless redundancy. At one point, Cosmo seemed to be a must-have, along with water and oxygen.More and more lately, it seems that the magazine is posing the question "how can we survive on ONLY water and oxygen, and still be sexy while we do?" Ocassionally, a featured article faces the issues of things ranging from eating disorders to politics, but few and far between.They don't seem to realize that on the other side of the page for the eating disorder article, is a woman who wears a size 0 and is still unsatisfied with herself, thinking that she must conform to some "heroin-chic" fad.Fun Fearless Female - articles about real women who make a real difference - is great. It shines the spotlight on someone who not only is beautiful and successful, but has enough education and talent to succeed in the world, without needing a man. If the magazine featured more of these things, maybe it would be worth my subscription fee.But tell me when the last time is that you saw a cover NOT featuring the phrases "mind-blowing sex", "how to satisfy (insert breathing life form here)", or "barely-there", which seems to refer to not just underwear anymore, but EVERYTHING.This isn't a magazine about women's health anymore. It's all about how to keep your man happy, while still conforming to social standards in fashion, weight, and financial standings. I'm sorry, but the "girl on a budget" can't afford a $430 skirt, or uncomfortable shoes with the uncomfortable price of $300+.Cater more to the real woman; not the one who only cares about her relationship status, pant size, and bank account</review_text>
I had hopes that this magazine would be a nice alternative to the others out there.  From the moment I opened it, it felt so smug.  I gave it a chance and read it cover to cover (the April issue).  But what finally did me in (after having read that I could buy an $800 blouse to make me feel pretty in that after pregnancy stage, that I could match my children's shoes to my Jimmy Choo's and finally that I could buy my child the latest $300 tricycle) was the article entitled "Normal" about a child who was misdiagnosed with Autism.  The article discussed how distraught the mother was after her child was diagnosed with Autism to the point that she tried to committ suicide.  The article ended with the fact that the child turned out to be a genius.  What was the point of this article?  To say thank God it wasn't true?  What about those parents out there who have an autistic child, how does this article make them feel? The article was painful and insensitive.  There are better ways to spend you $10 than on Cookie</review_text>
I have to agree with those who didn't care for it. the only thing I liked was one article written by a Dad who was skateboarding with his son. It was witty, insightful and inspirational. the rest of the mag just seemed totally irrelevent to my life. It is aimed at people who dry-clean their childrens clothes. Does anyone do that? I don't want my kids to be that concerned with clothes and money. the few issues I read made me mad and depressed. I've never written a review before but felt compelled to do so regarding this lame magazine. Give me break with that $400 cashmere hoodie for my son! my son likes his vilified character t-shirts and that is what matters. He is not a reflection of my style, he is a reflection of his own. Get over yourselves</review_text>
I was going to buy this and then stumbled on it in the doctor's office. I love InStyle, Lucky and other shopping mags, but the tone of this is mean and snooty. There are too many ads, and very little content. There's a Q&A section about sex after baby that's just mean, threatening that if you don't jump back in, "one of you will start sleeping with the girl in marketing..." Way to put an anti-feminist tone on sex after baby. Yuck.</review_text>
This was kind of an impulse buy for me and I didn't get what I thought I would get. I thought it would be a clear and concise magazine on what is up and coming in TV and the Movies. Instead I got indepth ramblings on actors and directors. If you want to pick up a magazine and find out what is coming up without fluff and filler...this is not the mag for you.</review_text>
I suscribed to this magazine since I got a great offer on it from the company I get my other suscriptions from so I decided, why not??Its been a year and, although the previews of each week's prime-time programs are fun (2 pages worth) I was very dissapointed. The articles are empty, boring and some downright retarded; rehashing show's dialogues, requoteing newscomments - its a mistery to me how this magazine is still around.I realize this is an entertainment magazine, but still, the articles in People magazine seem like rocket science in comparison - gasp!!!Do yourself a favor and just buy a TV guide - MUCH more interestin</review_text>
I was one of Entertainment Weekly's charter subscribers way back in 1990. It started out great -- a different, intelligent and witty approach to entertainment coverage. But financially, things were shaky, so the magazine was dumbed down a bit to reach a wider audience. I couldn't blame the editors. It helped them reach the needed tipping point, and they gained their needed mass audience. EW remained better than any other publication with an entertainment focus, and I kept resubscribing.Until 2006. These last few months, EW has fallen off a cliff. It has become entirely superficial and shallow, with hardly any substance at all. The publication design has also been degraded into a teen magazine format. I can only imagine the editors have decided that anyone over 30 is no longer part of their target audience. So, I've let my subscription lapse -- reluctantly, mourning the enjoyable magazine that used to be</review_text>
This magazine is just page after page of Hollywood P.R. agencies releases. Unbelievable. Why didn't I think of it? I know all magazines look for editorial content from outside sources, but other than a few pages of VERY subjective movie/music/book reviews, this magazine just re-writes and prints Hollywood press release after Hollywood press release again and again and again. This magazine must not have a staff of writers, but must employ an army of copy editors manning a warehouse of dedicated fax machines or e-mail inboxes. The funniest thing about this magazine is how the first few pages may be dedicated to a typically obsequious press release provided by, say, Tom Cruise's management company/major film studio/hired PR flak fawning over Cruise or his newest movie - and then you turn to the movie review section where some clever, sassy, wanna-be hipster movie reviewer proceeds to tell you that the movie absolutely sucks. Uh, okay - wait, didn't you get the press release? If you Tivo EXTRA and have the theme to Entertainment Tonight as your ringtone, this magazine is right up your alley. Otherwise, don't waste a penny on this nonsense.</review_text>
I've been a subscriber to this for over 10 years and I've loved getting this, but it has undergone changes recently and NOT for the better. Specifically, I hate what they've done to the graphical design inside. Whereas they used to employ several different styles when it came to things like fonts and artwork for whatever subject was written about, now they've adopted a uniform style where nearly EVERYTHING looks the same. It looked better BEFORE. The writing isn't as witty or sharp (have longtime staff departed?), and there are "filler" pieces in the form of moronic sidebars and boxes - useless attempts at humor that simply don't work. The strength of the magazine continues to come from the critics, especially the movie and dvd section. Sadly, typically, when changes like this occur they almost never revert back so it looks like I'm going to have to consider letting my sub expire 'cos I don't let my mailbox fill with crap like this</review_text>
I have subscribed to this magazine for almost a year now and I have become very skeptical of much of its advice.  This advice seems to be heavily influenced by its paying advertisers e.g. the US Dairy Industry (there is always at least one of those annoying "got milk" ads) and not surprisingly, every issue there are several articles in the magazine that hype the supposed benefits of a diet high in dairy products (e.g. milk and cheese).  However having read many books on nutrition, it has become very clear to me that that the majority of current research shows that a diet high in dairy products can actually be very damaging to your health - for instance read the The China Study by Colin Campbell, an extremely comprehensive nutritional study that sheds a great deal of light on the US dairy industry and its shady methods of influencing the public's perception of the healthfulness of its products.  It is well known that there are many better ways of getting calcium etc into your diet than by dairy but this magazine is unfortunately blinded by its advertisers' paychecks.  The magazine also appears to be very similar to Prevention magazine which I also have subscribed to and I would make the same criticism of.  My advice is to stick to reliable sources on health like the excellent "Berkeley Wellness Letter" that are not supported or influenced by the advertisements of drugs companies or powerful industry groups like the US Dairy Industry</review_text>
I received two free trial issues in order to give the magazine a chance before subscribing. Boy, am I glad I didn't subscribe! The magazine is nothing but fluff - good only for people who mostly want to flip through and look at pictures - not for people who actually want informed articles and reports on health.</review_text>
I have been a reader of BusinessWeek for over 10 years.  I have noticed that it has had a significant change in focus over the last year.  While there are more articles on "Personal Business", the hard-core articles have gone the way of Newsweek, and U.S. News and World reports.  The nature of the articles are lightweight and do not reflect issues important to decision makers today.Like many others, I have noticed a political slant or agenda over the last year.  Specifically, their commentaries and economic analysis trend to the left.  Bob Kuttner is co-editor of the American Prospect and contributor to the Boston Globe.  Every one of his articles begins with the premise that the President's policies are bad and then is followed by a tortuous rational for that thesis, to include discussion of the days of gold backed currency.Andrea D'Andrea Tyson is better, but as a former Clinton advisor, is not objective in her analysis.  Alternative economic opinions are far and few between and what opinions they do tout, does not agree with the numbers stated in their own Figures of the Week.While BW has the potential for great reporting based on their resources, they have let their editorial priorities get in the way of serious business reporting.  For serious Business readers and students, I recommend going to alternative sources.And yes, I will let my subscription lapse this year.</review_text>
I subscribe to the online edition you can receive through email in PDF form. I was looking forward to reading reviews of the latest audiobooks and hearing what the reviewers thought about them. Frankly I was disappointed. The reviews are little more than 1 paragraph plot synopsis, (the same info which might be gleaned from looking up the title on amazon.com or reading the back of the book). Reviewers add about 1 sentence or so to the title and call it a review... Please. They are also fairly out of date. Most of the audio titles reviewed are older titles which have been out for a while. Some titles aren't available anywhere that I can figure. Whats the point in reviewing an audio title you can't find?My interest is primariy sci-fi, horror and romantic-horror. Most of the titles audiofile reviews are fiction. The articles aren't particularly interesting. Frankly I could care less what the narrator thinks or feels, as long as they have a good voice. There is also a sort of...Literay snob tone to audiofile. I get the feeling they like certain authors and certain titles and tend to overly focus on them.I'd really like to see audiofile have a 'coming soon' review column. It would be very useful to know what titles will be coming out in the future. I'd also like to see more romance, dark fantasy, and horror reviews, or at least make the section focusing on different genres a little more clear. I also think the sections focussing on children's titles and self-help are a little large.2 stars. If you must subscribe, get the online version. That way you can cancel anytime, and don't have to worry about subscription problems</review_text>
I ordered on 10/4/2005. As of March 27th, I still haven't received the first issue, I don't even want it now! How do I get credit for the payment made back in October</review_text>
I never received this magazine so how would I be able to rate it??  I cant even find a way to let them know I never received it</review_text>
I was a subscriber to the New Republic for several years, but in the waning years of the Clinton administration and the beginnings of the Bush II administration, the paper seemed to take a real rightward turn.  Now, I have no problem with so-called liberal hawks, but the magazine's slavish support for the war in Iraq in the face of questionable evidence did it for me.  In addition, the magazine spends more time bashing Democrats for not aligning themselves with the magazine's professed centrist/liberal slant than it does with presenting true progressives ideals that create thoughtful discourse among its readers.  The magazine has forgotten its roots of progressive intellectualism and dissent in favor of safe, "New Democrat" rhetoric.  There are better magazines our there</review_text>
The reviewers in this magazine sometimes hit the mark and write with style and insight, but also there are many shallow and cheap shot reviews that are very anemic wanna-be's of true cultural wits like Mencken and Updike. Some of the reviewers suppositions sound as though they are grad student interns, and havent yet lived long in the field of writing to form seasoned viewpoints that are supportable. I'd pass on this superficial pop culture mag, and save your money to buy books that nourish you.</review_text>
Change can be good; however, sometimes change can be very bad.  Earlier this year PC Mag decided to become a magazine for the masses instead of providing technical information for their longtime dedicated readers.  Before the change this was a magazine that I would keep for a year or so to refer back to the content; now I can skim it in 5 minutes and don't feel there is a reason to keep it for any length of time.  As a longtime subscriber (20 years) I will not be re-subscribing to the magazine.  I wish them luck, but I believe they have lost sight of their subscription base and are chasing a broader base of subscribers that might disappoint them</review_text>
This magazine took a radical change in direction earlier this year, meaning most reviews prior to April 2006 are essentially reviewing a different magazine.I was a subscriber since the early 90's and have recently cancelled.  This magazine had a mid (end of life?) crisis and now wants to cover just about anything that uses electricity.  And cars!  Why would I pick up PC Magazine to read a car review?  Their "improved" layout uses cartoonish hand drawn arrows and "cool" sayings to replace actual review content.  What is their market here?  12 year old geeks with an extra $80k laying around to drop on an SUV?  Get real.  Until this magazine makes another radical change in direction to get back on topic, it is best avoided</review_text>
Please see tj-mccarthy's review elsewhere here; he is, to borrow a phrase from across the pond, spot-on in his comments. Just this week I cancelled my 10-year subscription to PC Magazine. One thing not mentioned elsewhere is that the new editor, Jim Louderback, has dropped the old tagline on the front cover, "An Independent Guide to Technology". I conjecture that the reason for doing so is that this magazine is no longer independent and is, in fact, just a marketing vehicle for various products. If you are like me and you do not like stealth marketing, stay away from this publication</review_text>
I remember, not quite four years ago, when this magazine actually had PC substance and catered to a sophisticated PC-oriented market. Now, it's thin, hollow, interminably off-topic and ad-choked.</review_text>
I've been watching this magazine slide downhill for some time, but they've finally hit bottom.  The bulk of the April 25 2006 magazine was devoted to cars.  Yes, todays automobiles are becoming highly computerized, but the magazine is supposed to highlight the software and hardware that we use on our desktops.PC Mag has been drifting far afield, doing articles on Apple computers, gaming systems, and extensive reviews on cameras.  Instead of PCs, the subject seems to be anything that has a computer chip in it, or is in some way remotely related to computers.  The obvious inference is that there's nothing interesting going on in the PC world, so they have to keep stretching just to fill the pages.  I find that hard to believe; I think it's more likely that the staff has lost their focus, or they've hired people who are not interested in or qualified to write about PCs.  The lack of pertinent content makes the dwindling size of the magazine even more apparent.  What used to rival a small phone book is now about the size of Time magazine.They now have a "new look", and it's awful.  Their readership used to consist of well educated, technically sophisticated professionals.  These people don't need a dozen arrows pointing into every photograph, with cutesy "handwritten" notes belaboring the obvious.  That's more appropriate for the folks who had a hard time getting through high school and have short attention spans.  Compare this issue to the issues from a couple years ago, and it's obvious that they've "dumbed down" the entire magazine.I've subscribed to PC Magazine for years, and considered it a "must read" to keep up with the rapidly evolving hardware and software of the PC world.  But no more -- it's time to find one that has something useful to write on the subject of Personal Computers.</review_text>
I just cancelled my subscription and recommended that my daughter cancel the one I bought for my 14 year-old grandson.  For some reason Ziff-Davis marketers think that  full page ads selling sex videos are appropiate for PC magazine. (Dec 27, 2005, p 122 if you want to check it out).  Previous issues had partial page ads selling "sex pheremones" which I could almost overlook, but full pages scantily clad lap dancers is over the line.</review_text>
My subscription was for a year. But the subscription office stopped sending the magazines even before the subscription expired. I would suggest people subscribe to Good Housekeeping directly instead</review_text>
Good Housekeeping does not send a notice to the person receiving the subscription in a timly manner. It shouldn't take 2 to 3 weeks to receive notification</review_text>
My Dad bought this magazine for my mom and I usually pick up the copies to browse them.  That is all both my mom in her fifties and I in my twenties do browse it as it is a joke.  It is not that special it is chucked full of ads.  The cover stories are dull and boring and many of the articles you would want to read have about one paragraph good information.  I find this magazine a waste of our money.  It will not be getting renewed at the end of the subscription.  My mom has already stated that.</review_text>
The magazine is great!The problem is, I am not receiving them. I ordered a subscription in January and have received 3 issues only!!!All my other orders with amazon have been received, I have no idea what is happening with my magazine subscription. I wrote to amazon to ask if there was a way of tracking my order but haven't gotten a response</review_text>
I found Cat Fancy Magazine to be mostly advertisements and breeders advertisements than real meat of information for cat owners.  I'm also very unimpressed with their Cat Channel online board they advertise in Cat Fancy and cannot recommend it to others.  They seem to have poor management of their online board especially on weekends so inappropriate posts stay there for a long time and a professional magazine advertising their own online board in their magazine should have their online board perfected before offering it.  Also Cat Fancy pushes a ridiculous high renewal rate for their magazine, but if you go onto Amazon, you can get a renewal rate of almost half the Cat Fancy renewal price.  So I have come to the conclusion that between the Cat Fancy magazine, their poor online Cat Channel board and the high renewal rate Cat Fancy charges, they are not interested in keeping their readers or online members.</review_text>
I have yet to receive my first issue of Cat Fancy.......who do I contact to correct this problem??</review_text>
I have been a subscriber to TIME for over 15 years and before that a reader of my parents' subscription. It pains me to say that this magazine has forgotten what it is about. Frankly, the only issues worth their salt are those resulting from a major world event such as a natural disaster or a terror attack; such events seem to energize an otherwise listless staff of seemingly bored editors and newswriters.A newsweekly has the obligation to go beyond the newspapers--to use the extra couple days to provide a more balanced and analytical view. Unfortunately TIME fixes its editorial position at the beginning of a story--any future coverage is designed to prove TIME's initial position correct. The immediate taking of an editorial position is then carried into all future coverage of the event; stifling analysis and preventing any analytical development beyond the first few stories--"we told you so, we told you so." Even worse, the coverage of a lengthy story peters out until something sensational happens at which point the sensational event becomes the ultimate interpretation of the entire story. Can't the magazine occasionally admit it was wrong rather than turning its eye away from the story that continues to burn? Out of sight, out of mind is the mantra...In fact, I sometimes debate whether the decline of this magazine mirrors or outpaces the general decline in our media; newspapers are failing, television news can't seem to get away from the gory or sensationalistic, even academic journals have specialized themselves into irrelevance. We seem to have a greater appreciation for comedy than analysis.Neutrality is dead. Frankly, I don't care so much about any perceived editorial slant as I do about the fact that the magazine is increasingly boring and irrelevant. TIME used to have excellent coverage of trends and events outside of the United States--no more. Iran is building nuclear weapons but merits the occasional blurb on a world summary page. African states are making vast strides towards democracy, we get an article about Nigerian computer fraud. Russia is emerging from the turmoil of perestroika and its painful transition has much to teach about the costs and value of democracy, but we seem to focus only on the latest roadbomb in Iraq. Japan, one of the world's most influential cultures, in the week I originally wrote this review (see 12-month subscription) merited only a snippet regarding a royal marriage and an analysis of foreign intrusion into sumo wrestling. Somewhere in the wide world is a fascinating place or culture to which TIME could send a correspondent and bring the place and people alive to its readership, instead we get tabloid excrement in the nature of Joel Stein's puerile take on pornography and social deviants. But most damning is the fact that after reading TIME one asks: How in the hell did our world become boring?Can TIME try emulating The Economist rather than The Enquirer? Someone needs to step in and restore the proud tradition of complete and in-depth coverage--educate the reader about the world in which we live; don't wait until either natural disasters or internal politics shine the spotlight on any of the various cultures and countries in which real and interesting events take place every single week. TIME has the history and potential of being a five-star magazine, if only it would just focus on finding and reporting the news</review_text>
I liked Time magazine a lot until they named George Bush person of the year? Oh my god, where were all the educated editors/writers when they let this moron write this article</review_text>
Time Magazine named George Bush as Person of the Year, despite the economic, international and ecological damage he has done and will continue to do over the next four years. Speak and be heard. Cancel your subscription.</review_text>
TIME has long been increasingly superficial in its news coverage, and recent years have only accelerated this trend.  In the 60s and 70s, it was a somewhat serious magazine with a centrist bend (originally it was considered quite conservative), but as the years go by it's degenerated into more and more pop-culture fluff with little substance.As for its being part of the "liberal" media, this is inaccurate.  Recent coverage of the (2004) election has attempted to reduce the Democratic candidate to the status of a non-person.  The first debate between John Kerry and George W. Bush was not even covered, except for one very brief article listing a few "fact check" points.  Instead, the cover story wa about new products and movies, a kind of Sharper Image catalog Lite.TIME also gave no coverage whatsoever to the election in Afghanistan.  It was mentioned in passing in another article about the U.S. election, but I would imagine that conservatives would object to the magazine's ignoring a signficant world event that George W. Bush has pointed to as one of his accomplishments in office.In my view neither candidate received adequate and fair treatment.  The bias seems to be in favor of Mr. Bush, but it's still mostly bland and superficial.  Your money is better spent on the British magazine "The Economist" which is far more substantive.  While its editorial viewpoint is conservative, it's sound fiscal conservatism rather than the tent-revivalism that currently substitutes for conservatism in U.S. politics.  "The Economist" also provides a liberal viewpoint and is the closest I've found to a (dare I say it) fair-and-balanced approach to the news.TIME can still be entertaining to read, but I wouldn't take what they say too seriously.  They tend to bend with the political wind</review_text>
It is a shame but the reviewer that made the comment that this magazine does not have any balanced view of what is serious world news and what is fluff hit the nail on the head. It skims the surface and is 'pop'.Anyone reading this would be entertained but be none the wiser about what is going on in the real world.Again it is a shame if this is all people have to read on what is going on in the world (Newsweek is exactly the same)  especially in the United States.TIME magazine is from the same people that gave us CNN and is unfortunately symptomatic of the liberal media and the inexorable consolidation of all media particularly in the U.S. and the resulting blandness and lack of real choice.The other irritating thing about TIME is it's tone which is patronising and a little supercilious.Subscribe to the ECONOMIST, there are less pictures !</review_text>
I would like to rate this magazine with at least a good rating but that is not possible since I have never received my subscription. I have waited over 4 months since I first paid. I have called and was told I would get a call back telling me when I could expect to start getting it but never did get the call nor the magazine. That was 4 weeks ago. If you want to find out about this magazine go somewhere else. It is not here and no telling if it will ever be here</review_text>
Why endure the months wait. Get it from the source for the same price and you'll get a sample issue before you have top commit to a subscriptio</review_text>
I purchased a subscription as a gift last Feb. and the recipient never recieved it! Instead they got a gift certificate from Amazon and a vague explanation..</review_text>
It took four months to arrive and by then I was moving...</review_text>
This is a great magazine, but don't order it through Amazon.  They go through a third party (Snapse Magazine)that has terrible customer service.  I ordered this magazine in January and SIX months later... still no magazine.  I called Snapse twice and was told they had no record of the order (even though I received an email confirmation from Amazon and I have a 17 digit confirmation number).  They said they would research it and get back to me.  No one called or emailed me the status, so two weeks later I called them again.  They acted as if I had just placed the order and told me it takes 6 to 8 weeks to receive the first issue. I won't get my first issue until August.  Buyer beware... it could take SEVEN MONTHS before you receive your FIRST ISSUE.</review_text>
When you subscribe to the Wall Street Journal it's like getting two newspapers:  a good news reporting paper and an what at times seems like an editorial page written by sophmomores in the local Young Americans for Freedom college rag.  It's not that I mind right-wing editorials, I'm somewhat of a libertarian myself, it's just that its editorial page puts ideology ahead of reason far too often for my taste.  For a much better deal  -- business news, all the financial quotes, much better international coverage, and excellent and concise reporting -- choose the Financial Times.  At the moment an annual subscription is selling for $50.  It's a much better publication and on Saturday's has a very fine weekend section with good book reviews and arts and culture coverage.  Also because the FT is based out of London the editors are much more balanced and less cowed or ideologically obedient.  Even if they were similarly priced the FT would be the better deal.  As it is the FT costs a fraction of the price of the WSJ.</review_text>
This magazine was given to us as a gift subscription when our son was born, but both my wife and I quickly tired of it.  The previous review that pointed out their lack of scientific research in a good bulk of their advice and their tendency to misquote and distort studies is just plain irresponsible.  The magazine seems to be firmly stuck in a fantasy 'PC' world of lofty goals and ideals for your children that have very little real world application.Articles about disciplining your children that read along the lines of 'If your 2 year old hits his brothe rin the face with a soccer ball, look him straight in the face, make eye contact and tell him that it is not nice to hit'.Thanks for that pearl of wisdom.  ANyone with a 2 year old can atest to the futility of reasoning with them.  Never would parents magazine advocate something that might actually WORK like say taking all of his toys away and marching his butt to the corner where he gets to stand for say 9 years or until he is adopted by the neighbors :)Seriously, the magazine writes for a fantasy land scenario where June and Ward are the parents and the kids act like the munchkins on a Disney TV movie.  if you happen to be the cleavers, go for it..</review_text>
As a practicing photographer and not a collector, I've been very disappointed with B&W on the few occasions it's crossed my desk (I've never had a subscription, so I'm basing this on just the few issues I've seen).Quality wise, the last issue I received was poorly printed - it contained streaks through the images and rampant misregistration, among other things. The paper is unimpressive as is the printing itself - the line-screen looks quite course. In a full-colour magazine, it would be fine, but for one in which everything is in monochrome, I would expect that they would print stochastically or at a higher resolution etc.In terms of content, every time I've seen this magazine it has been filled with work which is typically very well-executed technically but un-innovative and un-inspirational, at least to me. Most of it is of the hobbyist/dedicated amateur variety, with few capital-A Artists or professionals. Stereotypical nature and bodyscape-style photos seem to dominate, with few examples of conceptual, thematic or `high art' work, and I've never seen any fashion or photo-journalism either.We could use more non-technical photography magazines, but B&W caters to an audience obsessed with traditionalism and the imitation of old masters such as Cartier-Bresson and Ansel Adams.PS: reading body copy set in Futura with tight leading is a real pain</review_text>
I ordered this magazine thru Amazon three months ago, and STILL haven't received a single issue.  I've emailed their subscription department to no avail.  They have my money, but i don't have a magazine</review_text>
Kissinger, Honorary Chairman of The National Interest, was going to head-up the 9/11 Whitewash Commission, but he begged off when families objected.  Dov Zakheim, the 2.3 trillion dollar missing and unaccounted for Pentagon funds Man, is on the journal's board.  One is better off reading Commentary Magazine, where at least  the "Neocon fascist madmen" (in Web Tarpley's phrase) state their case in clearer and more honest - if that's the word - prose.I remember reading one article in The National Interest which actually made the assertion that we, meaning the USA, will need to engage in terrorism on occassion.  I couldn't believe they would actually print something like that, but they did.This fundamentally dishonest journal is a waste of time, for the most part, because it is neither interesting (the statement described in the above paragraph notwithstanding) nor meant, in the main, really other than to fool the public .  Kissinger I have a strong suspicion knows what happened on 9/11 and so do I suspect does Zakheim (to put it mildly in the latter's case), and yet they pretend the official version is true.  Supporting this journal is supporting the Bad Guys</review_text>
this magazine is almost as bad as consumer reports. their comparison tests never adhere to their thesis about what the tests is measureing, for example a comparison test is said to be about quick acceleration and on point handling and then the car with the lack lust performance in handling and acceleration would be #1 in ranking. often, the car reviews are always mentioning information about a car that isn't relevant, or doesn't make sense, or the review isn't consistent with the posted viehicle stats. the magazine also seems to be biased. some vehicles are criticized with more irrelevant information than others to say its awful. after further reading of many issues, you would think they are playing favortism towards certain brands or recieving kick backs from manufacturers, for example, you will always see the domestic brand being referred to as basically "trash" and a japanese brand or a BMW is always the way to go, when once again the posted stats and sometimes photos say different.this is more noticeable when you can predict the out come of their reviews. ultimately, its a bad guide towards getting any  information on automobiles period. its the pat robertson of auto magazines. if it were possible, i woudln't even give this magazine 1 star.</review_text>
This magazine is not for the average car buyer.  They might as well call this the Robb Report.  They only test highend cars and the "best" ones are the ones that go 0-60mph the quickest, not ride nice or get good mpg</review_text>
I admit, they have some good recipes, but most of them are not simple and very time-consuming. There is always a million ingredients in each little recipe. If you are a stay-at-home housewife and absolutely LOVE to cook, buy this, but if you are just normal, you won't find many recipes in here for you. I suggest you consider 'Cuisine at Home' before you buy this one</review_text>
I have received this magazine from it's start and have always found it to be full of great recipies, however, the company that produces this magazine has horrible customer service.  I have battled with them for over a year about a billing mistake on their part and they still have yet to make it right.  I have cancelled all subscriptions with them and refuse to do business with them any longer.  If you subscribe be very cautious about ordering any books from them</review_text>
I have been a subscriber to TIME for over 15 years and before that a reader of my parents' subscription. It pains me to say that this magazine has forgotten what it is about. Frankly, the only issues worth their salt are those resulting from a major world event such as a natural disaster or a terror attack; such events seem to energize an otherwise listless staff of seemingly bored editors and newswriters.A newsweekly has the obligation to go beyond the newspapers--to use the extra couple days to provide a more balanced and analytical view. Unfortunately TIME fixes its editorial position at the beginning of a story--any future coverage is designed to prove TIME's initial position correct. The immediate taking of an editorial position is then carried into all future coverage of the event; stifling analysis and preventing any analytical development beyond the first few stories--"we told you so, we told you so." Even worse, the coverage of a lengthy story peters out until something sensational happens at which point the sensational event becomes the ultimate interpretation of the entire story. Can't the magazine occasionally admit it was wrong rather than turning its eye away from the story that continues to burn? Out of sight, out of mind is the mantra...In fact, I sometimes debate whether the decline of this magazine mirrors or outpaces the general decline in our media; newspapers are failing, television news can't seem to get away from the gory or sensationalistic, even academic journals have specialized themselves into irrelevance. We seem to have a greater appreciation for comedy than analysis.Neutrality is dead. Frankly, I don't care so much about any perceived editorial slant as I do about the fact that the magazine is increasingly boring and irrelevant. TIME used to have excellent coverage of trends and events outside of the United States--no more. Iran is building nuclear weapons but merits the occasional blurb on a world summary page. African states are making vast strides towards democracy, we get an article about Nigerian computer fraud. Russia is emerging from the turmoil of perestroika and its painful transition has much to teach about the costs and value of democracy, but we seem to focus only on the latest roadbomb in Iraq. Japan, one of the world's most influential cultures, in the week I originally wrote this review (see 12-month subscription) merited only a snippet regarding a royal marriage and an analysis of foreign intrusion into sumo wrestling. Somewhere in the wide world is a fascinating place or culture to which TIME could send a correspondent and bring the place and people alive to its readership, instead we get tabloid excrement in the nature of Joel Stein's puerile take on pornography and social deviants. But most damning is the fact that after reading TIME one asks: How in the hell did our world become boring?Can TIME try emulating The Economist rather than The Enquirer? Someone needs to step in and restore the proud tradition of complete and in-depth coverage--educate the reader about the world in which we live; don't wait until either natural disasters or internal politics shine the spotlight on any of the various cultures and countries in which real and interesting events take place every single week. TIME has the history and potential of being a five-star magazine, if only it would just focus on finding and reporting the news</review_text>
I liked Time magazine a lot until they named George Bush person of the year? Oh my god, where were all the educated editors/writers when they let this moron write this article</review_text>
Time Magazine named George Bush as Person of the Year, despite the economic, international and ecological damage he has done and will continue to do over the next four years. Speak and be heard. Cancel your subscription.</review_text>
TIME has long been increasingly superficial in its news coverage, and recent years have only accelerated this trend.  In the 60s and 70s, it was a somewhat serious magazine with a centrist bend (originally it was considered quite conservative), but as the years go by it's degenerated into more and more pop-culture fluff with little substance.As for its being part of the "liberal" media, this is inaccurate.  Recent coverage of the (2004) election has attempted to reduce the Democratic candidate to the status of a non-person.  The first debate between John Kerry and George W. Bush was not even covered, except for one very brief article listing a few "fact check" points.  Instead, the cover story wa about new products and movies, a kind of Sharper Image catalog Lite.TIME also gave no coverage whatsoever to the election in Afghanistan.  It was mentioned in passing in another article about the U.S. election, but I would imagine that conservatives would object to the magazine's ignoring a signficant world event that George W. Bush has pointed to as one of his accomplishments in office.In my view neither candidate received adequate and fair treatment.  The bias seems to be in favor of Mr. Bush, but it's still mostly bland and superficial.  Your money is better spent on the British magazine "The Economist" which is far more substantive.  While its editorial viewpoint is conservative, it's sound fiscal conservatism rather than the tent-revivalism that currently substitutes for conservatism in U.S. politics.  "The Economist" also provides a liberal viewpoint and is the closest I've found to a (dare I say it) fair-and-balanced approach to the news.TIME can still be entertaining to read, but I wouldn't take what they say too seriously.  They tend to bend with the political wind</review_text>
It is a shame but the reviewer that made the comment that this magazine does not have any balanced view of what is serious world news and what is fluff hit the nail on the head. It skims the surface and is 'pop'.Anyone reading this would be entertained but be none the wiser about what is going on in the real world.Again it is a shame if this is all people have to read on what is going on in the world (Newsweek is exactly the same)  especially in the United States.TIME magazine is from the same people that gave us CNN and is unfortunately symptomatic of the liberal media and the inexorable consolidation of all media particularly in the U.S. and the resulting blandness and lack of real choice.The other irritating thing about TIME is it's tone which is patronising and a little supercilious.Subscribe to the ECONOMIST, there are less pictures !</review_text>
Don't purchase subscriptions from Amazon or Magazine Express.The following are my experiences with a subscription to Hiragana Times from Amazon.What this page doesn't tell you is that the Japanese magazines subscribed to on Amazon are filled by a company called Magazine Express and are shipped SEAMAIL from Japan which mean you'll recieve every issue 8 to 10 after it's released.I placed my order in January and, to date, have not recieved a single issue. After several phone calls, the Magazine Express people (who fill the Amazon subscriptions) said they had to restart my subscription for the May issues which will take 8-10 weeks due to shipping issues. So after ordering in January, I will not receive a single issue of this uncancelable magazine until possibly in late July. Very poor service.This is unacceptable for a magazine that most US Japanese bookstores (fujisan is one) can get within a week or that you can order directly from the publisher for only a few dollars more. If I had known the shipping policy I would not have ordered and the magazine supplier, Magazine Express will not cancel the subscrition.I advise avoiding ALL Amazon magazine subsriptions due to their poorly stated policies.**Update, I wrote this review in June. It is now July 8th and I've just been informed I must wait until August 15th to see if an issue arrives. I ordered the magazine on January 9th and I have had no resolution from either Magazine Express or Amazon who provides no way to contact anyone within Amazon about magazine orders. I reiterate, buying magazines from Amazon if a poor idea</review_text>
Don't be fooled by the cover  and description, this is for a magazine only & "NO DVD included', or should I say for a magazine containing mainly adverts for components and games.Waste of time and mone</review_text>
I have been a subscriber to CGW for almost 10 years.  Sadly, I have to end the subscription now.  It was a very good magazine; but no more.  One reason is that more than half of the magazine are now ads.  The second reason is that the size of the magazine is getting smaller and smaller with the layout that is getting very hard to read.  And the reviews are bad. The reviews don't have a professional kind of feel anymore.  I can't totally blame the magazine. A big part is due to the gaming industry.  There is no good game anymore.  They are all FPS and MMORPG.  Just how many time you can review the same type of games?One positive thing about CGW is that it now comes with a DVD full of demo.  I think the DVD alone is worth the subscription.  But for me, it is done</review_text>
Well, imagine my surprise when I picked up the February 2004 issue, and found that things had drastically changed. Mainly in the Editor's letter. It used to be 1 page, now it's just a small little column now, that is exactly like other Ziff Davis game mags, Now the redesign isnt as bad as other ZD game mags, but the removal of the 1 page editor's letter, really steams me up. At least they didnt bother Executive Editor Robert Coffey's Scorched Earth column. It's still 1 page. It's on the last page usually. And yes the redesign is really bad in terms of readability. Most of the time they have a red or blue or yellow background, and it's really hard to read the text at times. Now at least their disc will auto-load, unlike PC Gamer. And what really pisses me off, is when a magazine has a Hot 100 section, or a best PC's or videocards, or peripherals section, and they hardly ever change the captions or descriptions come with it. I'm sorry if I got off track a lot, but I felt the need to. I hope this review helped you. EDIT: 5/8/2004 PC Gamer recently changed Editor's and the Editor-In-Chief was re-assigned to become the Editor-In-Chief of the Official Xbox Magazine. The new EIC of PCG is the former Executive Editor, and I hate him, so this is why I say CGW is now the best PC games magazine</review_text>
I ordered Kiplingers and US News on March 25 and was immediately charged for both subscriptions.  Today is October 12th and I've never received US News.  I've complained several times and been given a variety of excuses and promised a refund and free subsciption which of course I haven't received.  When I requested a refund of course I was given the wrong amount.  If you want to order magazines I agree with the last reviewer go to another site because while Amazon is great for books that haven't got the magazine business straight.  Also, the customer service phone numbers are wrong and this is a total mess.</review_text>
I ordered this magazine as a gift. I paid for it on Nov. 21 '05. It is now Feb. 19 '06, and my daughter has not yet recieved her Christmas present! I will never again place an order with Amazon! Barnes and Noble has proved to be very efficient and worthy of my business. I will at this point try to get my money back from this company, and my daughter can purchase the magazine and all the missed issues off the newsstand</review_text>
I got this magazine for a year and a half before I had to quit my subscription recently. I liked all the fashion tips and articles on how to dress for your body size and style, and that is why I subscribed to begin with. But I was not expecting the bombardment of amoral opinions forced on me. (not to mention an overload of advertising- which you will get in most fashion magazines anyway, so that's not a complaint). Sure there was a few lines here and there that were nonbiased (telling the facts of STDs and such), but 90% of the articles on sex, were opinion and not fact. Girls today are having sex with anyone and getting hurt emotionally and physically because of magazines like Seventeen who say that sex is good if you're ready (What 15 year old girl is ready to have sex and get an STD or a baby?? Please.), and that condoms are 100% effective. They are not, but that's what most teen girls believe because of stupid magazines like this. They need to take advice from their parents and doctors, not magazine articles. I was disgusted at the opinions presented as truth to basically promote teen girls doing whatever they want without consequences.</review_text>
When I first started reading this magazine back in 2003 I thought "Oooh what a cool mag!!" But clearly I was totally wrong. Since 2003 Seventeen has changed  from a girly sophisticated mag appealing to girls just barely in their teens to to a cheap,overated, cliche`, piece of crap!!! I'd like to know what happened!!!!! It's super boring now. It has no style. All the sections are about health garbage & boring global trash. HELLO? What about the stars, movies,.. the music section sucks! Nothing is good anymore! If you disagree with me your probably just as boring as it yourself. I hate it and I DO NOT recomend this magazine. Don't read it!! You'll be wasting your time</review_text>
Please read Naomi Jakobs' review for Relevant Magazine below. It captures so brilliantly and eloquently the heart of the Christian 'post-modern' kick. If you have to go out of your way to claim you're a celebrity, then you simply aren't a celebrity (Take "Fitness Celebrity" John Basedow for example). In the same way, if you have go out of your way to claim that the Post-modern Evangelical movement is relevant, then you're claim for relevancy is simply not credible. The Christian church has certainly played a vastly significant role in the past 2000 years. However pop-culturalizing Evangelical Christianity isn't causing it to be any more relevant than it was when Sandi Patty or Carmen ruled the Christian top 40. Does the fact that some Christians enjoy the latest musical fads make the concept of accepting a human blood-sacrifice for the pardon of sins more palatable</review_text>
Admittedly, I am slightly older than the "Relevant" demographic.  But I'm not 40 yet!  So there are a number of things here that do have some appeal to me.  And I applaud the magazine for attempting to address culturally important issues.Still, the magazine suffers from it's unrelenting fawning over the whole post-modern vibe and it's own sense of self-importance as a beacon for charismatic hipness. ("Hey, look out, world!  We Jesus Freaks have iPods too!") Usually, the more something or someone sweats to proclaim their own relevance, the more danger there is that they can become irrelevant.So, like it's spiritual cousin "Charisma," this magazine suffers from a somewhat shallow perspective on life and culture.  It trumpets its ability to ask "the tough questions," even as it follows a relatively safe, politically correct post-mod/charismatic/hipster wannabe party line.I mean, their idea of being cutting edge was to put Bono on  the cover.  If you want to be cutting edge, put the libertine Adam Clayton on the cover and ask him about Bono's faith.  Now, I would read that article!  (I am a major U2 and Bono fan.  I'm not knocking him; just the lack of imagination at "Relevant".)There's also way too much emulation of the world's perspective on generational heritage. "Hey, we're young, and we're smart, and we don't need to do anything the way our geezer parents did it."  I guess having a little gray hair or wrinkles doesn't cut it in today's Paris Hilton culture, but I'd like to think that it might be a little different in a culture shaped by biblical values.  Actually, "Relevant" seems to be a little afraid to say what "biblical values" are (beyond the obvious politically expedient ones); it all seems amorphous here.I've never been a fan of the whole "what's hot/what's not" ethos.  And, I'd like to give a little more respect to today's Christian young people to think they could handle something that didn't fall into that same faddish trap.I am hopeful that they may get it right yet with "Relevant".   At times, they seem tantilizingly close.  But it takes more than a slick hairdo, male earrings, chin stubble, idolization of youth, culture icon quotations, and psycobabble "cool dude" theological lingo to make one relevant</review_text>
I had not idea that you could order that magazine directly from them until I bought one from our local Super Market. I was surprised at the difference that I had already paid to order from Amazon and what it was there.  I canceled my order and ordered from them.Some items are much less on Amazon and some are much more. You just have to be careful.A magazine is a magazine no matter where it comes from.</review_text>
Why pay $34 when you can buy the magazine at a bookstore and order a subscription for $19.9</review_text>
First off, I subscribed to this magazine for a couple of years, and enjoyed it. But the "main guy" Robert Kennedy, is someone who offends me both personally and politically. He assumes that every girl/women reading that magazine is tiny. For his information, some of us work out 5-6 days a week and eat well, and are still heavy-set. His comments on heavy-set people are offensive, thoughtless, and sometimes even downright cruel. Nonetheless, the pictures/articles were inspiring to me, and it is a decent fitness magazine</review_text>
This is the worst magazine I have ever subscribed too.  I hated it so much after the first issue that when new ones came, I thru it right in the trash.  Here why:1- Ad after ad for dietary supplements (like dexatrim and stacker) which i think cheapins the creditablity of the magazine b/c true health doesnt come from a bottle.2- Many pics of overly built up women (think fitness competitions)...not something the average women can aspire too...and too me, is nasty looking.3-The information that was in it is general information that anyone with common sense already know!My advice to you, AVOID THIS MAGAZINE, unless you like body building or like looking at body builders</review_text>
Do NOT!! Order from this website! I purchased a subscription for Oxygen magazine on Jan. 30, 2006, and I still have not received the first issue. I am very dissapointed, to say the least!</review_text>
This magazine is chock full of supplement advertisements.  Advertisements in fashion magazines are annoying, but supplements can be unhealthy and dangerous.  These ads may have something to do with the target audience of the magazine...  It seems to be directed to women who are hard core about weightlifting and fitness, to the level of competition.  A recent article in the magazine was talking about what percentage of body fat was too low for women.  Some of the women had body fat below 10% - I'm trying to get mine below 30%.  It's just a different fitness/weightloss league completely.I like magazines like Fitness and Shape better because it sets more reasonable goals and provides more reasonable advice.  I can substitute toast with jam for bagels with cream cheese.  I can't drink protein shakes for breakfast and lunch, eat 10 servings of protein a day, and pop potentially dangerous pills.  I am very disappointed with this magazine..</review_text>
Was very dissapponted with this magazine.  They go unread and get thrown out.  Just waiting for our subscription to run out.It is really for older kids and of very little interest to younger kids</review_text>
Disney, just about the worst company on Earth, has many lines of magazines. This is just used to suck even more money, even though they already have so much money that they're kids drown to death in money. Then disney goes on to cancel Dave the Barbarian and Teacher's Pet, the only good Disney shows</review_text>
i was gonna make a point, but fabz made it for me  i was gonna say that nowadays an cd is considered tight just because it has a couple of hit singles  and Yayo's hit singles werent really hits  his songs were on the radio & tv for probably about a month or two  if thats what you call a hit then you crazy  the fact is it takes more than 4 good songs to make a good cd  he said that there were 4 hot songs on the album but failed to mention that there are 17 SONGS on the cd   a couple of good songs dont make it good cd  you want to see what other people think of the Yayo album read the reviews for it  and jeezy  please  he always been garbag</review_text>
!!!!!!!!!!DONT BUY!!!!NUFF SAI</review_text>
frst of all i kno nothin bout this magazine but wen i came across readin this kids review sayin tat yayos nd jeezys cd were garbage forced me to write a review...frst of all yayos cd has at least 4 hits on it..- So Seductive- Eastside Westside- Pimpin- Curious- I Know You Don't Love Me- Live By the GunAnd for Jeezy's album i admit there wasnt as many hits if any but the cd was one of the best albums tat came out this year w/ a new flow of southern rap and a lot of good songs....Trapstar..My Hood..Bang Ft T.I....Thug Motivation....And Then What...all good songs...im not sayin Jeezy is one of the best rappers or at the top not close..but if he comes up w/ a new album better than Thug Motivation 101 he will be up thea cuz of his new flow of souther rap and high energ</review_text>
This magazine fell apart so quick. They are no longer a unbias magazine. Instead they are a Interscope propaganda machine. Just look at the covers? Every year Shady/G-Unit gets a automatic 8 covers. Every album from that camp gets automatic XXL and XL ratings. Even the horrible Tony Yayo album got a XL maybe the most disgraful rating I've ever seen in hip hop. As a hip hop reader I can never take anything they write serious because they are tainted and corrupt. I suggest you search else where if you want a good hip hop mag</review_text>
Recently renewed my subscription after a three year hiatus and I couldn't believe my eyes.  The magazine is a skeleton of its former self, with slim stories and little science.  Bob Guccione Jr's mag is not even that fun to read.  On the happier side, the magazine appears to shun its earlier environmental preoccupations</review_text>
I used to enjoyed Discover, but the past several months of their radicals changes, got me to think a real dumbing down.Once in awhile, they would put together a good article - but not constantly.How can we enlighten ourselves and improve our intelligence on science etc in the world stage.There are still many of us that do not want to be glued to the computer for science as we would for the tv.Discover's editorial staff ought to get their magazine back on track or the circulation and subscriber base is going to go down the tube. Thank goodness Scientific American, Astronomy, Sky and Telescope, Science News havent fallen down.I am not renewing my subscription unless Discover 'rediscovers' itself.How dumb Americans are!</review_text>
I thought I detected some deterioration in the quality of Discover Magazine in recent months, so I went to the web to see if anyone else had the same notion. Indeed they have. Sad.</review_text>
For years Discover was the best magazine for the lay person or even scientists who wanted to keep track of the trends in other fields of science. Now with a new publisher it has become almost worthless. Very superficial articles are mixed with over blown headlines and poor science. After buying Discover since it's very inception I find it sad what has happened to this magazine. Check the dates and notice the glowing reviews for the old magazine but pay attention to the negative ones from the last 6 months</review_text>
I am also a longtime subscriber, and I am quite outraged at the new changes that have been made with the magazine. I have written a letter to the editor containing my list of grievances, if you will (I would hope they would be redressed but they will probably ignore me). Anyway, please read:I am a current subscriber, and was quite suprised by Discover's new look (to all reading this review on Amazon.com: Amazon.com does NOT display the updated version of what Discover currently looks like). I didn't quite care for it, but as long as the material stayed the same I was going to be allright with it. Unfortunately, the articles in Discover have degenerated into "Top 20 things you didn't know about..." lists, piles of trivia, some sexual humor and editorializing on recent news. Sure, reading about gay astronauts may be a little humorous. Is it appropriate for what Discover stood for or what I have expected from this magazine? I would disagree. Occasionally there is an intelligent article. The cover story still seems up to par with the stories from the Old Discover. I really did once enjoy this magazine and it was the most expected item to arrive in my mailbox. I've kept all my copies from the last five years in the best condition I possibly could because I truly did enjoy reading them, and still do. Maybe this new Discover is for a "new generation" or meant to lure in younger or less mature readers, but I think the change in articles has taken a turn for the worse. I think the ordinary person, the "lay man" if you will, would appreciate at least intelligent articles about new, interesting and groundbreaking discoveries in the scientific community. I remember the String Theory article (I forget which issue exactly) as one of the most well-written articles on that topic.It was very exciting, and most importantly it [i]got me interested in the science[/i]. I doubt I will ever see anything that good from Discover magazine again. I'd really hate to give up on this magazine: all I ask is for the old Discover back.</review_text>
I have subscribed to Discover magazine for years but have recently cancelled my subscription.  The magazine, which once served up well written news of present and future science has become a hack rag.  From juvenile sexual humor and associated photos couched under the guise of science to supposed factual articles that seem ripped from my local papers Op-Ed page, the whole magazine has degraded into a worthless pile of trash</review_text>
I know APR is supposed to be one of the better poetry magazines out there, and I think it has one of the highest circulations of any poetry magazine, but it's more of the National Enquirer of poetry magazines. It's a large, newspaper-style format that contains mostly bad poetry and dull articles. You'd be better off subscribing to Poetry, The Hudson Review, The Texas Review, Tar River Poetry, or any number of other journals</review_text>
I was so excited to receive my first issue of Art In America, and I was severly disappointed to see that it is mostly full-page ads for galleries in Europe.  There are very few articles or artist Bios.  The photos are beautiful, but don't get this if you were hoping to learn anything about American artists or galleries</review_text>
Haven't received this item.  It has been almost 2 months</review_text>
I was told this magazine was good to look at for design ideas. It isn't really, and there isn't really that much to this magazine.  It is just another tired old AOLTimeWarner publication, just like Time, People, or Teen People.  I looked at the August and September issues and the only things in those two that impressed me were the features on Elton John's Out of Africa fundraiser and the article on Julian McMahon.  The rest of it was ads, and not the classy type ads that make the advertising tolerable in Vogue magazine, but the same old ads you'll see anywhere else, and they are annoying.  There were several nonsense fashion articles with the likes of Kelly Ripa (post excessive Photoshop airbrushing tools-one of my professors would call it "plastic person syndrome") Mark Consuelos, waay too much on Jennifer Garner and her baby, and other weird things, such as the trend of designer cupcakes.  I wish I was kidding on the latter, but I am not, nor do I have $25 to spend on a glorified cupcake just because it is Jessica Alba's favorite.  There was entirely too much dress/act/eat/shop/play this way because the stars do it that way in here.  Despite the size of this magazine, there is very little to sink ones teeth into, just way too many photos of the same old same old, and tips for mimicking them.  I am NOT interested in becoming a Teri Hatcher clone, nor am I interested in seeing Vanessa Carlton's pad.  This magazine is for you if you like excessive ads, no diversity, a subscription that is actually not a year (it says that special issues count as regular issues in the magazine) and your life's ambition is to try a cupcake from a bakery in New York because some celebrity did.  This magazine is mediocre at best, and the worst part is, it has the exact same fashion advice as Vogue.  I went with Vogue because there is substance in their magazine, and the ads are classy and very chic.  Leave this one behind-it looks to me like another brain fluff read from the folks at AOL Time Warner.</review_text>
Playboy made a mark in its day about 40 years ago. Today it is a totally unneeded magazine.  Its concept of a mixture of quality articles mixed in with naked photos so that the reader "will not feel quilty looking at the photos because he wanted to read an interesting article" is actually quite goofy. The end result is that the articles and the photos are lukewarm</review_text>
I am completely frustrated and upset with the delivery, or lack thereof, of the magazine subscription I received as a gift of Romantic Homes.  This is my absolute favorite magazine and my husband purchased a year's subcription for me from Amazon.com for Christmas 2005!  I still haven't received ONE magazine (it's now July 2006).  Amazon assured me three times, over the past year, it was coming, it's now July and I still haven't received the magazine.  I am so disappointed at the lack of customer service.  I urge you to NEVER buy a magazine subscription from Amazon.com.  This has been a horrible experience and I cannot believe that it has somehow become okay to run a business in this matter.  I am tired of empty promises from Amazon.com while I am anxiously awaiting my magazine.  Not only have I not received my magazine, the "people" at Amazon have NEVER offered a refund, a renewed subscription, ANYTHING!  I realize it's a measly twenty-something dollars, but this business practice is horrible!  I am also tired of speaking to people that do not speak English and are trying to help me.  Please do better Amazon, this is terrible!  Shame on you!</review_text>
I bought into a subscription of this magazine sight unseen.  That was a bad decision.  After having received two issues, I continue to be disappointed.  The quality of the art & design, and products displayed overall are dreadfully amateurish and in most cases incredibly tacky. I would be hard pressed to think that anyone in pursuit of help with romanticing their home would be inspired by this magazine.</review_text>
I've had this magazine for the past year and have used several of the tips, activities, posters, etc.  However, I have also gotten endless emails from Mailbox promoting products and asking me to renew way in advance.  This continues though I asked them to stop.  For the last three or four weeks, they've been calling me on the telephone every day.  This continues though I asked them to stop.  The few good ideas in each $6 issue are nowhere near worth the trouble of dealing with this harassment</review_text>
I haven't received this product yet and I'm pretty upset about it.I've requested that someone contact me about this problem and I haven't been given an answer.  I think I'm deserving of some sort of discount or at least an answer.Where is the product I bought???</review_text>
I echo the same gripe that other reviewers have voiced here: The magazine covers the same handful of people week after week after boring week.  How many times is a reader going to see no talents such as Jessica Simpson, Lindsay Lohan, the Tom Cruise-Katie Holmes joke, and THE most overrated, overhyped people of all time Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie on the cover and not get tired of it?It's nice to know what's going on with certain celebrities once in a while but every single week?  Can you say "overkill?"I'm glad I never got a subscription to this magazine.  I picked it up every once in a while on the newsstand but stopped because I was so sick and tired of reading about overrated, overhyped and glorified B-movie "actors" and "actresses" who were lucky to be in one successful movie and haven't done anything of value since.I picked up a copy today and have sworn it off forever.  Don't waste your time or your money. - Donna Di Giacom</review_text>
People magazine is one of the worst expressions of American life.  Instead of makiing our own lives more meaningful and exciting - which is possible - People encourages us to oogle and fixate over people who are essentially images, people we will never meet, and in many cases people who have very little going for them. Does anyone really think that Britney Spears has anything to say about anything, or that Paris Hilton is barely  aware of her own existence?  Does it ever make a whit of difference to your life how many times J.Lo is engaged (in order to get on the cover of another magazine) or who Demi Moore is grinding with today or where Gweyneth gets her gowns</review_text>
This was kind of an impulse buy for me and I didn't get what I thought I would get. I thought it would be a clear and concise magazine on what is up and coming in TV and the Movies. Instead I got indepth ramblings on actors and directors. If you want to pick up a magazine and find out what is coming up without fluff and filler...this is not the mag for you.</review_text>
I suscribed to this magazine since I got a great offer on it from the company I get my other suscriptions from so I decided, why not??Its been a year and, although the previews of each week's prime-time programs are fun (2 pages worth) I was very dissapointed. The articles are empty, boring and some downright retarded; rehashing show's dialogues, requoteing newscomments - its a mistery to me how this magazine is still around.I realize this is an entertainment magazine, but still, the articles in People magazine seem like rocket science in comparison - gasp!!!Do yourself a favor and just buy a TV guide - MUCH more interestin</review_text>
I was one of Entertainment Weekly's charter subscribers way back in 1990. It started out great -- a different, intelligent and witty approach to entertainment coverage. But financially, things were shaky, so the magazine was dumbed down a bit to reach a wider audience. I couldn't blame the editors. It helped them reach the needed tipping point, and they gained their needed mass audience. EW remained better than any other publication with an entertainment focus, and I kept resubscribing.Until 2006. These last few months, EW has fallen off a cliff. It has become entirely superficial and shallow, with hardly any substance at all. The publication design has also been degraded into a teen magazine format. I can only imagine the editors have decided that anyone over 30 is no longer part of their target audience. So, I've let my subscription lapse -- reluctantly, mourning the enjoyable magazine that used to be</review_text>
This magazine is just page after page of Hollywood P.R. agencies releases. Unbelievable. Why didn't I think of it? I know all magazines look for editorial content from outside sources, but other than a few pages of VERY subjective movie/music/book reviews, this magazine just re-writes and prints Hollywood press release after Hollywood press release again and again and again. This magazine must not have a staff of writers, but must employ an army of copy editors manning a warehouse of dedicated fax machines or e-mail inboxes. The funniest thing about this magazine is how the first few pages may be dedicated to a typically obsequious press release provided by, say, Tom Cruise's management company/major film studio/hired PR flak fawning over Cruise or his newest movie - and then you turn to the movie review section where some clever, sassy, wanna-be hipster movie reviewer proceeds to tell you that the movie absolutely sucks. Uh, okay - wait, didn't you get the press release? If you Tivo EXTRA and have the theme to Entertainment Tonight as your ringtone, this magazine is right up your alley. Otherwise, don't waste a penny on this nonsense.</review_text>
I've been a subscriber to this for over 10 years and I've loved getting this, but it has undergone changes recently and NOT for the better. Specifically, I hate what they've done to the graphical design inside. Whereas they used to employ several different styles when it came to things like fonts and artwork for whatever subject was written about, now they've adopted a uniform style where nearly EVERYTHING looks the same. It looked better BEFORE. The writing isn't as witty or sharp (have longtime staff departed?), and there are "filler" pieces in the form of moronic sidebars and boxes - useless attempts at humor that simply don't work. The strength of the magazine continues to come from the critics, especially the movie and dvd section. Sadly, typically, when changes like this occur they almost never revert back so it looks like I'm going to have to consider letting my sub expire 'cos I don't let my mailbox fill with crap like this</review_text>
This magazine shows the negative side of black men. I find the magazine an embarrasement to the African-American community. It seems out of all the races of men in the world, black men seem to want to display their lack of self control, their love of  fancy cars, overpriced clothes, which in no way helps create wealth in our communities. And I am also offended that this magazine rarely shows black women on the front cover. Until, black men understand that this kind of pathetic display of supposed masculinity is stopped, they will always be stopped by the police, be passed over for employment, and looked down upon. I wish someone would create a magazine for black men which shows the positive side of being a black man such as being leaders in their community, showing respect and love for their women, and showing that everything is not hip hip!</review_text>
I ordered the Journal about a year ago and received 2 issues, andnever received another issue.I contacted customer service about the problem, used the problemreport forms(or whatever it's called) and NEVER heard from them again.I get this email today telling me to renew my subscription...(after I had almost forgotten about the whole incident)What nerve!!!I remember when I bought this a year ago, another person had written areview warning people that she had not received her subscription.Back then I just thought this would never happen to me..(the same thing happened with Vogue magazine)Boy was I wrong.The 2 issues that I did receive were pretty good though.I buy tons of stuff from Amazon but I would highly recommend gettingthis from another vendor or ebay(they're usally cheaper too)</review_text>
Simply stated,if you want a politically correct magazine that panders to the socialistic academic minority, buy the mag. I'll pass and go online to the authors ignored and enjoy reading about the real new horizons</review_text>
This magazine might be good if you were wealthy enough not to have to work, had time to work out four hours a day, had your own chef, could go on vacation six months out of the year, or could afford (or cared) about fashion. Otherwise don't bother. They sometimes have a decent or interesting article but they are so few and far between it is not worth it</review_text>
The pages of Men's Journal used to be an escapist   weekend getaway in themselves. They brought you to extreme parts of the globe with a literary style that disappeared after 9/11. Since that time, MJ has concentrated on telling its readers who their heros should be, which might have been fine for one issue. This is a magazine badly in need of a new editor and old ideas</review_text>
I subscribed to this magazine in January for my husband.  It took 5 months to get the first magazine, then I never recieved another one</review_text>
Don't get me wrong, occasionally there are issues I still read cover to cover, but it seems as though MJ has gone through a change lately.  Gone is the focus of travel and fantastic adventure writing.  Now the focus seems to be health, fitness and diet.  I used to buy Men's Health magazine for those topics.  If I wanted that focus I would continue to buy MH.  There is no longer a consistent reason to read MJ on a regular basis anymore.  Man, I miss the old MJ</review_text>
I have enjoyed reading Family Fun Magazine, but unfortunately have only received 2 issues.  I have not received any further magazines and am completely disappointed in the service.  I will not order another magazine from Amazon because of this poor service.  I tried to get a refund and have only gotten the run around.</review_text>
I have not yet recieved this magazine, how could it be reviewed</review_text>
I subscribed to this magazine in August and just received the SEPTEMBER issue now! Budget Travel's Customer service is terrible, I've complained several times but am still missing the August, October and November issues, have asked for a refund but have yet to have my account credited</review_text>
This magazine used to be very thorough, and it used to be very good at providing me with TONS of deals and tips that I never would have found on my own. It was great, and very opinionated. But last year sometime, they changed the look of it and now there's a lot less text. It's much more a style magazine now, and that's not what I want in a travel magazine that I have bought to tell me about money saving! Worse, except for the 40 Best Vacation Bargains, which are still okay, most of the articles forget to incluce a lot of money-saving tips and instead they too often suggest I do expensive things. Since when is a $225 a night hotel considered budget?? The headlines and captions are expecially smart-aalecky.  It's not as good with the expert advice as it used to be! I noticed that Arthur Frommer isn't editing it anymore which maybe is why--bring him back! My search for a true money-saving travel magazine has unfortunately resumed again</review_text>
If you're a teenage guitarist and want to learn Nickelback, Green Day, and nu-metal songs, then this magazine is for you. There's also some pretty good tips for beginners from time to time. But in the last several years the quality of the feature articles and interviews has gone steadily downhill, and there are far too many ads. As many people have said, sometimes it doesn't seem to be geared towards musicians at all anymore. The smarmy, "hipper than thou" Rolling Stone, Spin, Pitchfork Media style of writing seems to be taking over the mag.  And other styles of music such as blues, country, jazz, etc, are pretty much ignored.  But like I said, if you're a teenager and you see it on the newsstand and there's a song in it you would like to learn, pick it up, otherwise avoid this magazine</review_text>
I wish that when I purchased this subscription I would have read all of the reviews.  Unlike the description included on the Amazon website, the subsription does NOT include the CD-ROM, which costs an additional $1/issue.  And, if you want to purchase the CD-ROMs for past issues, they cost $4/disk.  Sometimes a bargain isn't really a bargain.  Buyer beware</review_text>
We received first issue of Guitar World and there was no bonus CD-ROM. Called the magazine and was told that since we purchased the subscription from Amazon at $19.95 that there would be no monthly CD-ROM. They charged us another $10 to have the monthly CD-ROM added to the subscription for the rest of the issues. But that CD-ROM is mentioned in Amazon's Editorial Review of the magazine. You get the impression that you are getting a deal on this magazine, but you are not because you don't get the bonus CD-ROM. It turns out to be the same rate as if you buy directly from the magazine</review_text>
I ordered my subscription 3 months ago and still have not received it.</review_text>
Two months after ordering the magazine I have yet to receive a single issue</review_text>
I subscribed to Forbes magazine for a year or two, and in general the content is good, but I cancelled my subscription for 3 reasons. (A) 33% of the pages are ALL advertisements - what a waste of space, (B) every magazine has 3 or 4 renewal postcards that fall out onto the floor as I read the magazine, and (B) the classifieds in the back are "not of interest" to any real business person. If you don't mind the ads and the fluff, then this magazine might be right for you! It's not for me. I give it 2 stars</review_text>
Forbes is a great magazine.  Amazon on the other hand, well they ought to get out of the magazine business.  Order said first issue would be in February.  Amazon "forgot", to place the order until I called in April to find out what happened.  Now they claim the first issue will be June 19.  Yeah right.  Funny how they don't forget to charge the credit card you place the order.Don't order magazines from Amazon</review_text>
I bought the magazin on november, and I don't recive it yet</review_text>
The title speaks for itself.I don't know how or why I was drawn to this magazine when I was 14. This magazine should be called J-4tweens. Ah. The title is very annoying. Like Twist, I only get this magazine when I'm really really desperate for something to read. I sure as hell wouldn't want my 12 year old daughter to wear mascara. If you have a tween and you want her to grow to become a pimpstress, get this. The only entertaining aspect of this magazine is the embarassing moments kinds of things (but of course). Other than that, no. They feature pretty bland fashion.All in all, this magazine is JUST like Twist.Therefore, the age reccomendation is just 11 & 12, but you're better off getting GL for even more years worth of goodness (10-15 yrs.) because no, it's NOT cool to steal your sister's damn boyfriend for pete's sake</review_text>
I ordered HOW for a graphic designer friend's birthday in January and it is near the end of March and she still has not received anything...so we have no idea how the product is... we have not seen it</review_text>
It took forever for this magazine to get to the address and it also is shipped a week to 2 weeks after the magazine is already on the stands.  What's the point of having a subscription if you get the magazine later than everyone else? I will never order a magazine from Amazon again, I'll go through the actual magazine company instead</review_text>
I haven't recieved a single copy so I can't really review it. All I can say is the amazom service is terrible</review_text>
The magazine is supposed to be for girls 8 and up... it is not. An 8 year old girl does not need to have information on contracting herpes, being sexually active and  kissing. I am dissapointed that society thinks 8 year olds are ready for this material and thinks getting this info from a magazine rather than a parent is appropriate</review_text>
but that's the lowest we're allowed to give.  This magazine is more for 16 year olds and up. Too much focus on getting a boyfriend and making out - every 10 year old's top priority right?  Plus my daughter found extremely crude language in the latest issue - magazine refused to discuss the matter when I emailed and called them! Says it's geared for girls 8 and up but that's a huge age span. Better off with American girl Magazine - this one's to mature for younger girls.</review_text>
not nearly as appealing as the other magazines I have read: motortrend, car and driver, automobile mag, sport compact.  I don't like any of the long racing articles and anything on old cars.  Car and drivers off topic articles tend to be more interesting and occasionally very funny</review_text>
The National Enquirer has gone off the deep end and beyond the point of common decency.  To now attack a sweet, wonderful, charitable guy like Clay Aiken is very very sad.  To go after celebrities whose lifestyles are sensationalized is one thing, but to go after a quiet humble guy like Clay is another.  And now what? Is he supposed to justify their existence and have to defend this garbage.  Their story is ludicrous and they owe Clay, his family, and all of his fans a big apology.  I will not buy this filthy rag or any American Media products ever again</review_text>
What is the National Enquirer, you ask?It's a phony as hell newspaper that provides all the latest gossip about celebirties but they come up with fake stories half the time.Avoid it like the plague</review_text>
I had heard good things about this magazine and so ordered a sample.  It is a lovely magazine, beautiful photos and it is interesting reading about "other coasts" (besides east and west).  But, at least with the most recent issue, in every article about families or couples and their coastal homes the people were all caucasian.  Even the advertisements had only white people (save for one about vacationing in Mexico that had some cute Mexican children in it).  While I doubt this is intentional, I would encourage the publishers of this magazine to put their attention on this issue.  There are plenty of people of color living on the coast who have interesting homes and lives that readers would enjoy learning about</review_text>
...because that's all this magazine is: an advertising vehicle aimed at kids who aren't old enough to discriminate between ads and actual content yet.Don't be fooled by the venerable "National Geographic" name: this publications pays only the briefest lip service to educational content. When my son received it as a gift I was shocked to see that the ads were virtually indistiguishable from the articles. And in fact, the ads were often much more visually interesting.The photos were excellent, I must admit. But the layout was jazzed up to the point of absurdity, as if designed to play to kids with minuscule attention spans. The science facts were sound, but again, the articles were cut absurdly short, more like squibs and factoids than actual articles, as if the editors believe that kids couldn't possibly focus on one topic long enough to actually read more than 250 words about it...or maybe because they didn't want to distract the kids from all that tantalizingly lucrative advertising stuffed onto every page.As an editor and a parent, I am appalled by this magazine and would not recommend it to anyone. National Geographic should be ashamed of itself for pushing this kind of junk on young readers. Avoid this publication like the plague.</review_text>
My family received this magazine for years, but recently we have decided not to re-new our subscription. This used to be a quality product but it has recently gone downhill with the inclusion of more and more advertising in each issue. At this point, nearly half of the magazine consists of advertisements--this isn't the real science magazine it claims to be, and is a waste of money.The content is not all that great. The articles are often extremely short, too short for even a pre-teen audience. My kids often wished that this magazine included more serious science topics, and not just shortened, dumbed-down material. Much of the magazine is full of "fluff"-- things like word searches and picture matching games, which didn't interest my children. The content might be okay for 7-8 year olds and children at slightly lower reading levels, but older children will be bored.All in all, I'd recommend that you simply get the regular, adult version of National Geographic. Though the articles might be too complex for children, the pictures will make up for what they can't read.If you're looking for more of a children's-oriented magazine, you're better off with MUSE, a high quality general science magazine that is published by the Smithsonian Museum in Washington, DC. However, Muse caters to a slightly older audience, perhaps ages 9 and up.</review_text>
FULL of ads, hardly any content at all. Not worth paying for it.</review_text>
I'm so glad we didn't buy a subscription to National Geographic Kids magazine without checking it out at the news stand first! It truly seemed like there were more pages of ads than of actual CONTENT in this magazine.If you're looking for a good kids' magazine about nature & wildlife, try one of the National Wildlife Federation's excellent publications. My kids enjoy Your Big Backyard (for ages 3-7) and Ranger Rick (for kids 7 & up), both of which are available through Amazon.com or [...]Kids Discover magazine (for 6-12 year olds) is another favorite with my children (and me) and contains great science & social studies articles without the commercials of NG Kids. You can subscribe through Amazon or [...</review_text>
After 1 month I haven't receive the product.  It's to give a good review until it arrives</review_text>
Unfortunately, there seemed to be no recourse after I ordered this for 2 newphews as a Christmas gift, and it did not arrive.  I tried to send an email to amazon.com but got bumped to someone else (distributor?) who never responded.  So disappointing since it was a gift for someone else.  Happened not once, but twice</review_text>
Truly this is the magazine of the warmongers, the neocons, who would gladly repopulate America completely with non-Europeans, except for the neocons themselves and their cohorts, who are of  "a race of the mind," as one wag put it, by and large.Pro-war and anti-American people (and certainly anti- Euro-American people), this magazine is truly one to be boycotted.  If you are an American of European descent THE AMERICAN CONSERVATIVE will more likely be for you.  If you are racially aware and don't wish to see your people vanish from the Earth, I would also recommend THE OCCIDENTAL QUARTERLY.To give the devil his due, TWS does carry some interesting book reviews at times.If you love your people, as long as they are not from "the race of the mind," do not buy this magazine, and if you already subscribe do the smart thing and cancel for a refund, as I did a few days ago.Highly recommended as antidotes to this warmongering propaganda are two outstanding collections, NEO-CONNED! and NEO-CONNED AGAIN</review_text>
This magazine is another part of the Murdoch empire.  Its worstsin is that its boring and not very conservative.   It wasfounded by William Kristol, John Podhoretz and Fred Barnes tobe a institutional conservative publication under tight controland with deep enough pockets to dwarf its smaller rivals.When conservativism was a living movement, it was bestcharacterized as a collection of independent voices whowhile they respected each other didn't always agree witheach other.  Now, following the Murdoch formula, its aboutgetting as many people whatever their ideology on thepayroll.  The price of being on the payroll is of coursenot rocking the boat.Reading conservative publications these days is like readingthe transcripts of someone engaging in a monologuein an echo chamber.  Its strange that there is so much"conservative" media today, but that most policy decisionsdon't get debated or even discussed among conservatives.They seem more interested in covering liberals than discussingideas or making proposals.  And for god's sake, no more articlesby those who are agnostics in their private life talkingabout how america needs more god this or god that.  If yourgoing to be religious, at least find someone who is sincere.And no more articles on the greatness of familyby childless unmarried women who are totally devoted to careersto the exclusion of anything else.</review_text>
The Weekly Standard is just more of the same.  It's not, strictly speaking, journalism.  But I imagine you'd like it if you enjoy reading articles that set out to promote a very conservative point of view.  If you like Rush or Fox News, you'd probably like it.  If you are looking for a serious media outlet, this is not it</review_text>
I can't imagine how many hours of my life I wasted worrying about ego-trippin' jocks.Although, I understand how I got hooked on this bad habit.  The rich folk who own our media do a great job of marketing this endless diversion to the masses.  So, instead of worrying about economic justice, environmental destruction, the well-being of children and so forth; the passion of a large segment of the general public is frittered away on watching one city's gladiators combat another city's gladiators.On top of that, with the us vs. them pattern of thinking that is encouraged, the anthem singing, and so many pro sports figures involved with right-wing politics (Bernie Kosar, John Elway, Steve Largent), I've come to realize how poltically-charged this so called "escape" actually is.  On top of that, I just got sick of all these sports announcers barking about this or that, wagging their finger in my face.  The ads in Sports Illustrated are also a bunch of macho [...].By the way, before he was killed by "friendly fire," Pat Tillman was reading Noam Chomsky and Howard Zinn books.  In fact, he had arranged to have a meeting with Chomsky after he returned from our war of terror.  Too bad he wasn't able to pursue that path.My interest in sports is now limited to badminton in my backyard, and books like "What's My Name Fool?" which is about how sports figures sometimes remember issues like peace and justice</review_text>
The thing I hate about this magazine is the letters to the editor section. Supposedly, they're written by real people. But after reading this magazine for the last few years, these letters all seem to have the same maudlin, soporific, sappy style of prose that reads to me like they've been EDITED that way. There's this condescending "athletes are supposed to behave like GOOD ladies and gentlemen and if they don't, then tsk tsk - WHAT WILL THE CHILDREN THINK?" mentality that I absolutely HATE. The good things about SI are the photography and whatever articles on the NBA they have any given week. And the swimsuit issue? I guess if you're a 13-14 year old it's exciting as all get out - I'll take the HARD STUFF any day over their annual fleshfest</review_text>
This is one of the worse magazines I have picked up in years.  If you have "money to burn" traveling, then it might be for you.  Loaded with advertising and little 'true' content</review_text>
I subscribed to T+L for one year.  My wife and I found the magazine to be uninformative and of little value when planning our travels.  Most of the magazine seems to be centered around places to go shopping and the photos that accompany the articles are artistic photos, usually of models wearing $1,000 outfits, instead of informative photos of the resorts or hotels.  The recommended travel products tend to focus on $1,200 designer duffels which, while perhaps within reach of the target demographic, are unlikely to survive many trips through a major airport.In addition, my subscription came with an unrequested automatic renewal.  I didn't enjoy the magazine and nearly every copy was in my recycle bin within 15 minutes of receiving it.  However T+L decided that I would somehow like a renewal although I certainly never requested one.  In my book, those are questionable and perhaps unethical business practices.</review_text>
I am utterly disappointed in the direction that Gamepro has taken over the past two years. I actually stopped my subscription for about 1 year, but came back to the 20 issues for $10 at their (10?) year anniversary.  I forget.  But the magazine is really bad.One thing I laugh is, the retro corner.  They have info about issues from 5 and 10 years before, and they always announce the number of pages from 10 years ago. I think the most recent issue, they said: 140 pages?  Huh?  I think my last issue was around 100.  And don't try to tell me they've lost 40 pages in advertising.Too bad on-line reviews and websites, are taking over the subscriptions of the hardcopy magazines. I'll stick with hardcopy until the end of my life. Or until the quality of these types of magazines gets so low, I can't stand it anymore.  Or until my subscription runs out on this craptacular effort.You guys were pretty good 5 years ago, but you've gone to pot these past two years!  I'm talkin' to you Watchdawg!!!You guys are suckin' lately!!!MC White said:  You guys are suckin'!!</review_text>
As you can tell by the title, I'm not enamored of this magazine. I've been playing video games since the early 80s, and have read many, many gaming magazines. My reasons for this negative review of Gamepro follow in no particular order: 1.) Their numerical rating system stinks. 1-5 points is just not accurate enough. Most mags/web sites have a 1-10 system with decimals. Not Gamepro. 2.) The written part of the reviews are way too short, and often are written borderline incoherantly. It's as if they hired the proverbial 1,000 monkeys to type them out. 3.) Often times they cram two or three reviews on one page. Screen shots provided with reviews are often the size of a postage stamp. 4.) The number of ads in relation to content is distinctly high. Once when I was bored, I counted all the ads in one issue. Out of around 110 pages there were 60+ pages of ads. 5.) Their article layouts are confusing, and occasionally they print on colored backgrounds that closely match the text color. Forget about reading it if you're colorblind. 6.) Their gaming tips are either so obvious that a brain dead chimpanzee could figure them out, or plain don't work. I suspect that the ones that do are ripped off from various web sites. 7.) Gamepro costs the same as better gaming mags, such as EGM and Game Informer. So, in closing... if you want a good gaming magazine, just about any magazine other than Gamepro would be an improvement. Many great gaming magazines have come and gone, why a turd like Gamepro continues is a mystery to me</review_text>
Just from picking up this mag in the store, and reading their spin-off "Pocket Gaming", I have concluded that this magazine is pure rubbish, I wouldn't waste my money subscribing</review_text>
I would have to agree with the preivous comments that state that this magazine isn't worthy of its title. I subscribed before reading review, I was hoping to find an affordable psychology-based read, though some stories are interesting I'm sure I'd be able to find them in other magazines like Vogue or Cosmo. and there is plenty of ads, probably more than stories. And much like other reviewers When I first ordered it, it took forever for the first issue to arrive, now its more regular but my subscription will soon end with no renewal of course</review_text>
The latest Pshycology Today had to be trashed. The clinic treats abused women and incest and rape victims....LUST didn't go over well</review_text>
Psychology Today is just another Glamour/Cosmo/People disguised as a magazine discussing issues in psychology. This magazine used to be well-written and had more scientific data.  However, since the appointment of the new editor, headlines became similar to that of tabloid magazines all over. If you are interested in scientific data and research, this is NOT the magazine for you. I used to subscibe to Psychology Today but stopped renewing since I took more psychology classes becuase I found out that the magazine had no new insights to offer in the field of psychology at all</review_text>
Psychology Today purports to deliver the latest trends in psychological studies to the layman, but what it really delivers is pop psychology and a whole lot of advertisements.  I give the magazine one star for a very snazzy layout, and a second star for hiring writers that don't insult the reader's intelligence by abusing alliteration (unlike another magazine supposedly aimed at intelligent adults).  However, the content is consistently concerned more with pop culture than with the lives of real people.  I have also noticed a bias against introverts in article after article that attacks shyness as a serious character defect, rather than simply a personality trait (so, introverts, if you want to avoid yet another lecture on how your way of relating to the world is intrinsically wrong, avoid this rag)</review_text>
This is probably the best music/movie magazine out today. However, you can go to Borders books or Barnes and Nobles and get it for $8.95 or something. This deal is BS</review_text>
A Great Magazine.  I had a subscription for 2 years that ended about 6-8 months ago.  I paid $104 for the 2 year subscription back then, but suddenly the price in the US has skyrocketed astronomically.I can go to any music store or a Borders/Barnes and Noble and buy each individual magazine for anywhere from $8/issue to $9/issue typically, and I have never seen it more than $9/issue.  However, suddenly the subscription they have is like $13 an issue, which is outrageous.  It's not amazon's doing either, I was a subscriber for 2 years and this same thing happened to me.  They asked me to come back at a lower rate (something like $99/year), which is still $8.25 an issue.  Sure that's might be a bit cheaper (About 25 cents an issue on the average price above) than buying each one in the store, but I doubt anyone would want every single issue individually, especially at tthat price.The upside is that UNCUT is far and away the best music/movie magazine in the world.  I'd say about 60-70% of the issues I would have bought in the store when I was a subscriber.  But until they begin printing the magazine in the states, it's just not worth a subscription.The writing of the magazine is superb.  Brilliant and varied writing throughout.  Each magazine is about as big as a small book too, and of them I'd read a good 80% of the magazine too (Even finding myself reading some articles about artists I could care less about, because the articles were so well written), but the price is way too high to subscribe.It's a shame too.  Rolling Stone is nowhere close to being as good as Uncut, and although Mojo and Q are strong, they can't hold the candle to it either.THe only blemish on the magazine itself (for all you who might want to buy a single issue) is that the covers tend to repeat every 3-4 months, and I mean how much Beatles can I read (and I'm in the upper 5% of Beatle freaks out there).Still the magazine is well worth it, the subscription price is too incredibly high though to recommend in any circumstances.  I would think this would be a great market to move into in the US if I was in that position.  I don't think Rolling Stone could compete anymore.If it would make things cheaper, I would do away with the "free cd" bonus too.  Aside from a few listens and the novelty of it all (the free CD was a good incentive to make me interested a few years back), the CD's get old quick, and after a while I would toss them out after a quick preview.Summary: Wait until/if the price drops, but don't subscribe.  It's too expensive, and much cheaper to buy each magazine individually.  The magazine itself though is 5 stars and almost always great</review_text>
Love to review History Today, but haven't seen a copy yet.  Any ideas</review_text>
I'de have never read Vibe in the first place, but i won a free years subscription in some online contest.  And i must also mention i'm a huge fan of hip-hop and hip-hop culture, so i'de think Vibe would be tight.....daamn, was i ever wrong.  First off, half the mag is Advertising....then what little reading there is....it's all bullsh**.  The interviews they have with artists are totally weak & watered down.  They never ask any worthwhile questions.  Vibe also contradicts itself constantly.  In one issue, they'll give an album a low rating & a poor review, then at the end of the year they name that same album one of the years best....what the f***?  Vibe has it's decent moments, but i def. won't be paying for it anytime soon.</review_text>
I started reciving Vibe magazine in the mail announced and unexpected. This wouldn't be the first time this happened, turns out my Grandmother bought me People magazine as a gift and the copies were sent to my house. I figured that somebody had got me this magazine as a gift. Next thing I know a charge for the magazine appears on my bank statement.I called Vibe immediately and asked them what had happened. They told me that there was nothing they could do and that their company didn't directly deal with the payment issues and subscription services. They gave me a toll free number that I was too call from an outside company that handled the payments. When I called this company, it was completely automated service, could not speak with an actual person regardless of what extension I used.I eventually had to go down to my bank and find out what I could do. Turns out Vibe had illegally gained my bank account number and had been charging me for months, but I had only just recently started to recieve the magazine. I had to close down my checking account and open up a new one, which resulted in me being charged by my gym and other other companies that had access to my account in order to subtract monthly bills. It was as if I had written them a bad check, something that I had never done in my life and now greatly questioned my credibility.Please do not support these people, they are theives and on top of that the magazine is terrible and uncredible. I seriously hope that my review will help deter any and all people from subscribing to this magazine</review_text>
If I could give it a zero or negative rating I would.  When VIBE was introduced, it was a relevant, interesting magazine that exposed me to new alternative, r&b and hip hop artists.  The mag featured all kinds of artists not just who's hot right now, it also featured hard hitting expose articles that were relevant to not only the hip hop community but the world.Lately I've noticed that it's nothing more than a fluffy version of The Source.  I hate a lot of new rap music that's out and didn't appreciate mags with rappers I dislike on the cover. And is it me or does it seem like since Mimi took over, all of the female r&b singers' covers and stories are HORRIBLE (we won't even discuss that disgusting Brandy cover)!This magazine SUCKS now and the only time I check it out is while I'm in line at the grocery store.  Yes, the subscription rates are cut to the bone now but that is because the quality is supremely lacking.  I'd advise the curious to check issues out at newstands or where ever before wasting your hard earned money on a subscription</review_text>
Where are the critiques? The articles lack any critical substance. Whoever is hot at the moment will get their behind kissed. It doesn't matter that the album is usually not worth all the hype, VIBE will go along with the flow. On top of that, there are more ADs now than ever before. Even articles that could have been decent are cut down to a page or so for the sake of saving advertising space.</review_text>
I ordered a subscription for my step-son and a gift for a niece at the same time.  They took my money and both of the ONE-YEAR subscriptions I paid for only resulted in ONE ISSUE to each child.  I couldn't get any more information on the magazine, as we never received any more informaiton until I got an e-mail from Amazon asking me to renew.I noticed another recent post with the same problem.  The magazine was really great, and my step-son and niece both waited and waited for their next issue which never showed.How disappointing.  I wouldn't take the chance if I were you.LD</review_text>
This magazine consistently encourages parents to spend more than $100 on babya outfits, etc.   It is not a magazine for most of America, but rather for the elite, or those who wish to pretend they are.   There are way too many ads, and insignificant articles.   Parents magazine is hands down the winner in this category.</review_text>
[...] I got a choice of a free subscription to either Parents or Child magazine. Since I already got Parents, I chose Child. I will not be renewing when my free subscription is up. The magazine is boring, the articles irrelevant and there are too many kids fashion pages. If you want a magazine about parenting/kids, go with Parents.</review_text>
I subscribe to Parents, Parenting and Child magazine and will renew all but the one to Child. It's full of ridiculous fashion spreads (like I'm going to spend $50 on a t-shirt for my 15-month old), useless travel information and near-advertising features on the newest, most expensive items I 'need' for my child. The actual articles are no better or worse than what's in the other mags, and I don't find there's nearly as much information in the magazine as in the others.As other reviewers have said, it is beautiful. However, it's thoroughly impractical unless you're one of those people who plan to shop at Neiman's for your child...not that there's anything wrong with that</review_text>
I bought the magazin on november, and I don't recive it yet</review_text>
During the 1960's, when my sister subscribed to AHMM, the stories mirrored the fantastic television show; the stories were primarily mysterious, creepy, and unique, with lots of murders and the twist endings that made the show so great.  Now, the majority of the stories in the magazine are plain, uninteresting "detective" stories.  I subscribed up until about the early 1980's, but stopped because of the same old boring "cops and robbers" material.  I tried to read a recent copy while waiting for my aunt at the beauty shop, but switched to one of the media rags instead when discovered that AHMM hadn't changed. Subscribe only if you are a fan of pure "police" fiction</review_text>
Sure I like a mystery- who doesn't? But when you a read a magazine like Hitchcock you end up losing faith in the short mystery story. The tales are hard-edged and lacking in style and substance. We seem to have a wealth of mystery writing talent but time and again Hitchcock Magazine is a disappointment. The value for money is horrible, the magazine is printed on newsprint paper and the ink just needs to be touched to smudge- Alfred Hitchcock would not be proud</review_text>
Let me first say I am one of Martha Stewart's biggest fans! I have enjoyed MSL magazine for years and loved the format of the "old" show (the new one is taking awhile to get used to). I jumped at Body and Soul when it first came out, but have been repeatedly disappointed in the obvious exclusion of anything "male" in the articles.  Not to mention, the articles on relationships and love have NEVER mentioned same sex partners which I find totally unacceptable, unforgivable, and just plain stupid from a marketing standpoint.  Why exclude men and gay people?  I have also noticed there are no ads from advertisers marketing to men either. Most if not all of the articles are nothing more than "new age" pablum, either "borrowed" or stolen from much better magazines such as Alternative Medicine.  Don't waste your time or money on this one.  This isn't even good enough to line my cat's litter box</review_text>
This is not the health magazine you'd expect from Martha Stewart -- it's extremely heavy on advertisements (45% at my rough count), and really cluttered, and just not "good". The recipes are interesting,  if you can find them among the aromatherapy and skin-hydration ads</review_text>
I found Cat Fancy Magazine to be mostly advertisements and breeders advertisements than real meat of information for cat owners.  I'm also very unimpressed with their Cat Channel online board they advertise in Cat Fancy and cannot recommend it to others.  They seem to have poor management of their online board especially on weekends so inappropriate posts stay there for a long time and a professional magazine advertising their own online board in their magazine should have their online board perfected before offering it.  Also Cat Fancy pushes a ridiculous high renewal rate for their magazine, but if you go onto Amazon, you can get a renewal rate of almost half the Cat Fancy renewal price.  So I have come to the conclusion that between the Cat Fancy magazine, their poor online Cat Channel board and the high renewal rate Cat Fancy charges, they are not interested in keeping their readers or online members.</review_text>
I have yet to receive my first issue of Cat Fancy.......who do I contact to correct this problem??</review_text>
I have been a subscriber to TIME for over 15 years and before that a reader of my parents' subscription. It pains me to say that this magazine has forgotten what it is about. Frankly, the only issues worth their salt are those resulting from a major world event such as a natural disaster or a terror attack; such events seem to energize an otherwise listless staff of seemingly bored editors and newswriters.A newsweekly has the obligation to go beyond the newspapers--to use the extra couple days to provide a more balanced and analytical view. Unfortunately TIME fixes its editorial position at the beginning of a story--any future coverage is designed to prove TIME's initial position correct. The immediate taking of an editorial position is then carried into all future coverage of the event; stifling analysis and preventing any analytical development beyond the first few stories--"we told you so, we told you so." Even worse, the coverage of a lengthy story peters out until something sensational happens at which point the sensational event becomes the ultimate interpretation of the entire story. Can't the magazine occasionally admit it was wrong rather than turning its eye away from the story that continues to burn? Out of sight, out of mind is the mantra...In fact, I sometimes debate whether the decline of this magazine mirrors or outpaces the general decline in our media; newspapers are failing, television news can't seem to get away from the gory or sensationalistic, even academic journals have specialized themselves into irrelevance. We seem to have a greater appreciation for comedy than analysis.Neutrality is dead. Frankly, I don't care so much about any perceived editorial slant as I do about the fact that the magazine is increasingly boring and irrelevant. TIME used to have excellent coverage of trends and events outside of the United States--no more. Iran is building nuclear weapons but merits the occasional blurb on a world summary page. African states are making vast strides towards democracy, we get an article about Nigerian computer fraud. Russia is emerging from the turmoil of perestroika and its painful transition has much to teach about the costs and value of democracy, but we seem to focus only on the latest roadbomb in Iraq. Japan, one of the world's most influential cultures, in the week I originally wrote this review (see 12-month subscription) merited only a snippet regarding a royal marriage and an analysis of foreign intrusion into sumo wrestling. Somewhere in the wide world is a fascinating place or culture to which TIME could send a correspondent and bring the place and people alive to its readership, instead we get tabloid excrement in the nature of Joel Stein's puerile take on pornography and social deviants. But most damning is the fact that after reading TIME one asks: How in the hell did our world become boring?Can TIME try emulating The Economist rather than The Enquirer? Someone needs to step in and restore the proud tradition of complete and in-depth coverage--educate the reader about the world in which we live; don't wait until either natural disasters or internal politics shine the spotlight on any of the various cultures and countries in which real and interesting events take place every single week. TIME has the history and potential of being a five-star magazine, if only it would just focus on finding and reporting the news</review_text>
I liked Time magazine a lot until they named George Bush person of the year? Oh my god, where were all the educated editors/writers when they let this moron write this article</review_text>
Time Magazine named George Bush as Person of the Year, despite the economic, international and ecological damage he has done and will continue to do over the next four years. Speak and be heard. Cancel your subscription.</review_text>
TIME has long been increasingly superficial in its news coverage, and recent years have only accelerated this trend.  In the 60s and 70s, it was a somewhat serious magazine with a centrist bend (originally it was considered quite conservative), but as the years go by it's degenerated into more and more pop-culture fluff with little substance.As for its being part of the "liberal" media, this is inaccurate.  Recent coverage of the (2004) election has attempted to reduce the Democratic candidate to the status of a non-person.  The first debate between John Kerry and George W. Bush was not even covered, except for one very brief article listing a few "fact check" points.  Instead, the cover story wa about new products and movies, a kind of Sharper Image catalog Lite.TIME also gave no coverage whatsoever to the election in Afghanistan.  It was mentioned in passing in another article about the U.S. election, but I would imagine that conservatives would object to the magazine's ignoring a signficant world event that George W. Bush has pointed to as one of his accomplishments in office.In my view neither candidate received adequate and fair treatment.  The bias seems to be in favor of Mr. Bush, but it's still mostly bland and superficial.  Your money is better spent on the British magazine "The Economist" which is far more substantive.  While its editorial viewpoint is conservative, it's sound fiscal conservatism rather than the tent-revivalism that currently substitutes for conservatism in U.S. politics.  "The Economist" also provides a liberal viewpoint and is the closest I've found to a (dare I say it) fair-and-balanced approach to the news.TIME can still be entertaining to read, but I wouldn't take what they say too seriously.  They tend to bend with the political wind</review_text>
It is a shame but the reviewer that made the comment that this magazine does not have any balanced view of what is serious world news and what is fluff hit the nail on the head. It skims the surface and is 'pop'.Anyone reading this would be entertained but be none the wiser about what is going on in the real world.Again it is a shame if this is all people have to read on what is going on in the world (Newsweek is exactly the same)  especially in the United States.TIME magazine is from the same people that gave us CNN and is unfortunately symptomatic of the liberal media and the inexorable consolidation of all media particularly in the U.S. and the resulting blandness and lack of real choice.The other irritating thing about TIME is it's tone which is patronising and a little supercilious.Subscribe to the ECONOMIST, there are less pictures !</review_text>
Great for filling the doctors office magazine selection - if it's free - but not worth your money to own. I bought if for gardening inspiration and there is really nothing about gardens or gardening in here. Oh, once in a while they remember to put a garden shot in the magazine, but not consistently. The home section isn't that inspirational either. Go for it if it's free, but if it's not, don't buy it</review_text>
This is a yuppie magazine for people with endless bank accounts and nothing to do with their money.  What's more is I didn't see a thing that had anything to do with actual gardens!</review_text>
I also bought this magazine sight-unseen and I wish I hadn't.  For re-decorating purposes, I found this magazine to be not useful at all.  The homes and gardens are pretty, but what they feature (furniture, wall and window coverings) just would not go with the middle-class home...way too opulent.  I was wanting more of a magazine that could give me a look that can be found in local or chain furniture stores... not that would try to make me get a one-of-a-kind table from XYZ Antique store in New York.  Also, I found this magazine text-heavy.  All in all, an OK magazine for a professional decorater maybe, but not for a average home-owner trying to redecorate</review_text>
I made the mistake of subscribing to this magazine sight unseen. I received a very good offer to subscribe, that I didn't want to turn down. I thought this was going to be like a Better Homes and Gardens, or Country Living but it wasn't. This appears to be a good choice for design professionals. I was just not very impressed</review_text>
It seemed like there were 2 articles &amp; 80 pages of advertisements</review_text>
I would like to rate this magazine with at least a good rating but that is not possible since I have never received my subscription. I have waited over 4 months since I first paid. I have called and was told I would get a call back telling me when I could expect to start getting it but never did get the call nor the magazine. That was 4 weeks ago. If you want to find out about this magazine go somewhere else. It is not here and no telling if it will ever be here</review_text>
All this new magazine is is a glossy ad for makeup and clothes. I can't even get my subscription delivered and there is no phone number ANYWHERE to contact customer service.  Don't waste your money unless you love Paris Hilton</review_text>
This is a tabloid, so most likely the stories you're reading are not true. Why would someone spend there hard earned money on a magazine that prints alot of unfounded rumors that alot times turns out to be just that, a rumor</review_text>
I ordered Star magazine in late December 2003 for my elderly homebound mother who loves the crosswords. She stopped receiving it in June, well before her 12 month subscription expired.</review_text>
First off, I usually just stick to rating & critiquing movies. But, every time I see an ad on this website for this Time/Warner (or whatever the hell the company calls itself this week) rag-mag I start to see red."Entertainment Weekly", which was once an interesting weekly deluge from the ho-hum of everyday life, has become just another rag crapped out weekly to stand on newstands week after week prostituting for your hard earned cash.Back in the summer of 89, "EW" was released and after I read a few issues, I decided to subscribe. I was instantly hooked (the new issue would arrive in my mailbox the Saturday before it would hit regular newstands) & I liked getting the latest news and reviews from movies, music, T.V., and video (that was later added in the mid-90's).The problem with the magazine started in the late 90's. I started to notice that "EW" would cover a big movie or event that hadn't yet been released and then the following week bash the hell out of it, or try to get some piece of dirt on it in order to generate more sales.I also hate the damn lists that "EW" comes up with. The latest entitled "The top 100 most memorable movie lines" was a joke. These lists have always annoyed me, because I feel they are truly not thought out and therefore not thought provoking.The other & most important thing I noticed was the absolute lack of an honest review.Case in point, a few weeks ago I picked up the latest issue in which the movie "Catwoman" had been reviewed (I wasn't to sure if it was Gleiberman or Shwarzbaum that critiqued it).I first logged onto "Rotten Tomatoes.com" to see what percentile "Catwoman" recieved from the nation's critics.Out of roughly 115 reviews "Catwoman" only got 10% of the good reviews while the rest trashed it (a film needs, at least, to get a grade of 60 - 65% in order to place it as a fresh or good movie). That makes "Catwoman" the worst reviewed film, so far, for 2004. Yet, "EW" gave the film a B. What erkes me even more is that "Catwoman" is released by "Warner Bros.", the same company that owns the rights to the "Harry Potter" films, "The Lord of the Rings" trilogy, & yes, the "WB" owns "Entertainment Weekly".Is "Warner Bros." trying to bribe or threaten its own critics at one of its most popular & lucrative magazine's?I'm not the only who has seen this developement. People have written in saying that there is favoritism among "Warner" products that are reviewed in the magazine. "EW", of course, hotly denies anything of the kind thumping there chests and standing behind there reviews, possibly in fear of being fired (they will deny that also).My only question to the reviewers at "Entertainment Weekly" is, "Whats it like to stand in your own pile of bull**it?"Or better yet, "What's it like to stand on a Democratic Podium?"</review_text>
I used to really like US magazine. I have been collecting every issue each week for several years now. But wait! Has anyone else noticed that this magazine has drastically changed since the beginning of this year? Where are all the interesting articles and info on the celebrities, movies and music? There's no more than a thumbnail's sketch of info on anything now. It's all photos and quickie hype. It has no more substance. What happened to this good magazine</review_text>
Why is it that Us Weekly can't get a copy to me weekly?  Sometimes three weeks will go by without an issue.  Then I'll receive three in one week.  Us Weekly assures me that everything is normal and that they ship them just as soon they come off the printing presses.  I'm not buying their story or the magazine again</review_text>
This is one of the many magazines that float around the school library, and it is the most common.  Maybe because not too many people read it.  All that is in it is pure celebrity gossip. There is really nothing else in here.  If you like blurry photos of Lindsay Lohan, Donald Trump, Paris Hilton, Simon Cowell, Paula Abdul and the like, (blurry so you can't see the zits and the flaws) then you should get this.  One article mentioned Britney Spears stomach, how it was coming back.  She was wearing a baggy t-shirt.  Baggy t-shirts are common among women wanting to hide a gut, not flaunt it.  This magazine makes it seem like celebrities lose weight like magic (they don't-not so far as I can tell).  If you want to read about the fact that Nichole Richie has acquired yet another Chloe Paddington, the fact that Donald Trump thinks his wife Melania looks hideous now that he has gotten her knocked up, or you would like to see photos of Victoria Beckham looking pissed off, then read this. This magazine is full of lies as well-for instance, one writer claims that young people like Lindsay Lohan can get higher car insurance rates for accidents they were not at fault in.  False!  You only get higher rates if you are at fault. This magazine is nothing more than an overpriced tabloid.  There is nothing of value in here. Half the time the insider is some anonymous friend, and half the time the facts aren't right. Avoid this thing at all costs, unless of course you are a celebrity worshipper. I've got better things to do than worship people who have too much money for their own good.  I'll stick to more intelligent fare, thankyouverymuch</review_text>
I have been subscribing to US Weekly for about a year and a half. In that time, I have never seen an issue without several pages of Jessica Simpson. I have to wonder; does Jessica donate money to this magazine? She seems to dominate the whole magazine, each and every week.I won't be renewing my subscription. I'm tired of Jessica and the untruths that US Weekly supplies</review_text>
I WORKED THERE BRIEFLY AND THEY'RE RUDE AND OBNOXIOUS AND HAVE NO CLASS. I WOULDN'T BE SURPRISED IF SOME OF THE STORIES THEY'RE ACCUSING OF MAKING UP ARE TRUE. THEY DESERVE TO BE SUED AND STOPPED. ALL OF THEM ARE REPULSIVE, I'M GLAD I GOT OUT WHEN I DID!</review_text>
I ordered this as a gift subscription on May 10.By July 20, it still had not arrived. I contacted Customer Service, and was told itwouldn't arrive until September!The description says it will take 6-10 weeks. It has now been 10 weeks,and I've been informed it will be another 6 weeks</review_text>
I purchaced this magazine thinking that it would be the next step from the amateur photo magazine level to the serious pro level.  In fact, it is not really either.</review_text>
Why endure the months wait. Get it from the source for the same price and you'll get a sample issue before you have top commit to a subscriptio</review_text>
I purchased a subscription as a gift last Feb. and the recipient never recieved it! Instead they got a gift certificate from Amazon and a vague explanation..</review_text>
It took four months to arrive and by then I was moving...</review_text>
This is a great magazine, but don't order it through Amazon.  They go through a third party (Snapse Magazine)that has terrible customer service.  I ordered this magazine in January and SIX months later... still no magazine.  I called Snapse twice and was told they had no record of the order (even though I received an email confirmation from Amazon and I have a 17 digit confirmation number).  They said they would research it and get back to me.  No one called or emailed me the status, so two weeks later I called them again.  They acted as if I had just placed the order and told me it takes 6 to 8 weeks to receive the first issue. I won't get my first issue until August.  Buyer beware... it could take SEVEN MONTHS before you receive your FIRST ISSUE.</review_text>
When you subscribe to the Wall Street Journal it's like getting two newspapers:  a good news reporting paper and an what at times seems like an editorial page written by sophmomores in the local Young Americans for Freedom college rag.  It's not that I mind right-wing editorials, I'm somewhat of a libertarian myself, it's just that its editorial page puts ideology ahead of reason far too often for my taste.  For a much better deal  -- business news, all the financial quotes, much better international coverage, and excellent and concise reporting -- choose the Financial Times.  At the moment an annual subscription is selling for $50.  It's a much better publication and on Saturday's has a very fine weekend section with good book reviews and arts and culture coverage.  Also because the FT is based out of London the editors are much more balanced and less cowed or ideologically obedient.  Even if they were similarly priced the FT would be the better deal.  As it is the FT costs a fraction of the price of the WSJ.</review_text>
This magazine was given to us as a gift subscription when our son was born, but both my wife and I quickly tired of it.  The previous review that pointed out their lack of scientific research in a good bulk of their advice and their tendency to misquote and distort studies is just plain irresponsible.  The magazine seems to be firmly stuck in a fantasy 'PC' world of lofty goals and ideals for your children that have very little real world application.Articles about disciplining your children that read along the lines of 'If your 2 year old hits his brothe rin the face with a soccer ball, look him straight in the face, make eye contact and tell him that it is not nice to hit'.Thanks for that pearl of wisdom.  ANyone with a 2 year old can atest to the futility of reasoning with them.  Never would parents magazine advocate something that might actually WORK like say taking all of his toys away and marching his butt to the corner where he gets to stand for say 9 years or until he is adopted by the neighbors :)Seriously, the magazine writes for a fantasy land scenario where June and Ward are the parents and the kids act like the munchkins on a Disney TV movie.  if you happen to be the cleavers, go for it..</review_text>
I flip through Time every now and again at the barber shop.  Sometimes there are good bits that they are using to keep the interest of people who want progressive social change, people who are sick of the power of the corporate elite and the violence of our militarists.For the most part, since Time receives most of its revenues from Big Business advertisements, it can't challenge the establishment as it needs to.So instead I read magazines like Z, Utne, Mother Jones, The Progressive, The Sun, Earth Island and the New Internationalist</review_text>
My sixth grader likes it.  It is extremely ordinary and easy to outgrow</review_text>
I am a Time person of the year 2003 (shared title - actively deployed U.S. servicemembers).  I must say that reading Time magazine is like reading the platform for the Democratic Party.  Actually it is even worse than that it is like reading John Dean's diary, filled more with fantasy and personal wishes than actual reality.  One of the latest from the online edition is that Realists have taken over Washington.  Give me a break.  A new set of hogs have come in to take over at the troff and that is it.  Anyone who believes Nancy Pelosi and her gang of political hacks is going to help America is a fool.  Best thing we can hope for is that they create so much gridlock that no one can spend any money in Washington.  Maybe then they will see that America improves on its own and politicians on both side make things awful.The sad thing is that people that read this publication actually think they walk away knowing something about the world.  This publication is so biased that it not only misinforms its readers it makes them look like fools when they try to repeat what they have "learned".If you want a truly useful weekly news publication then subscribe to the Economist.  It probably will not change your political affiliations but it will at least make you sound competent when you debate others.  The Economist is quite simply the best weekly news magazine in existence.  The articles are well written by people that know what they are talking about.Leaders from around the world read and contribute to the Economist.  This is something that Time, Newsweek and the rest of their ilk cannot claim.I am not affiliated with any political parties and do not consider myself political.  I look at things from an economic perspective and vote accordingly</review_text>
This was a gift for my daughter. Instead of receiving the New Yorker, she is receiving People. You need to fix this</review_text>
New York Magazine's articles and advertisements are too risque, always pushing the envelope.  Thanks, but NO Thanks</review_text>
it would be nice if i were writing about the magazine CONTENT here but since i never received a single copy of my subscription.all i can say is their customer service  SUCKS !!!! after repeated attempts to correct the delivery address or find out what happened the issue still hasn't been resolved.NOTE;i've had a number of delivery problems when ordering magazines  on amazon (there might be some glitch) .however the other magazines have quickly corrected  the problem soon after contact.</review_text>
I've been a loyal subscriber since 1998 and have always enjoyed the magazine. Something happened to them in early 2006 - they've either been bought or have hired a new editor / staff or something. This magazine is absolutely terrible now. All ads, fewer and fewer pictures of babes in each issue, and the hilarious articles are now long gone. My last two issues (Sept and Oct) were in the trash within minutes of pulling them from my mailbox. I'm canceling my subscription.</review_text>
Once upon a time this was a good magazine worth reading cover to cover.  Unfortunately they've slowly been replacing content with more and more advertising.  As the magazine currently stands you could probably finish reading the actual "content" in about an hour.  The rest is advertising and BS.  This magazine jumped the shark a long long time ago.  Just let it die already like it's supposed to</review_text>
...1) I can't;2) on second thought, it deserves at least one star for having some silly, funny stuff that you don't find in other magazines.That said, it is grossly overrated. How is it consistently in the top sellers list? Well, there are as many millions of folks with a below average IQ as there are above average. It's too bad they can't play up the silly humor a bit more while leaving the abhorrent juvenileness out. The images are generally trashy and sometimes airbrushed to the point that it looks fake and ridiculous--they could improve the quality of the photos a LOT.Admit it, you would probably hide an issue if you ran into anyone you actually respected. Doesn't that say it all? Reconsider the standards you are setting for yourself, and respect your own brain, too</review_text>
I certainly do hope one of these days that Maxim magazing will get women who are small-breasted equal time.That's all I have to say</review_text>
As a practicing photographer and not a collector, I've been very disappointed with B&W on the few occasions it's crossed my desk (I've never had a subscription, so I'm basing this on just the few issues I've seen).Quality wise, the last issue I received was poorly printed - it contained streaks through the images and rampant misregistration, among other things. The paper is unimpressive as is the printing itself - the line-screen looks quite course. In a full-colour magazine, it would be fine, but for one in which everything is in monochrome, I would expect that they would print stochastically or at a higher resolution etc.In terms of content, every time I've seen this magazine it has been filled with work which is typically very well-executed technically but un-innovative and un-inspirational, at least to me. Most of it is of the hobbyist/dedicated amateur variety, with few capital-A Artists or professionals. Stereotypical nature and bodyscape-style photos seem to dominate, with few examples of conceptual, thematic or `high art' work, and I've never seen any fashion or photo-journalism either.We could use more non-technical photography magazines, but B&W caters to an audience obsessed with traditionalism and the imitation of old masters such as Cartier-Bresson and Ansel Adams.PS: reading body copy set in Futura with tight leading is a real pain</review_text>
I ordered this magazine thru Amazon three months ago, and STILL haven't received a single issue.  I've emailed their subscription department to no avail.  They have my money, but i don't have a magazine</review_text>
Many of us who have contibuted years of creative expertise to our field feel quite insulted by publications of this sort that attempt to "take a ride" on the creativity of others. My advice: Do not purchase, read, or advertise in this third-rate publication. There is little more credibility or validity than watching "Jerry Springer". Please, do not embarass yourself or your clients! Save this one for the bottom of the cat box only</review_text>
amazon sells a one year subscription for $14 which includes a $5 amazon certificate that you get later.in the actual magazine, the subscription card is 6.99 for one year or 2 years for $10.00so use the card, save some money and also dont have to wait for your $5 back and then find something at amazon that you can use the $5 certificate on.</review_text>
For some strange reason, I began receiving this magazine in the mail. Never ordered. Never paid for. My conclusion based on reading the last three issues: You're kidding me. How can Time Inc. still publish this rag? What's the point</review_text>
Kissinger, Honorary Chairman of The National Interest, was going to head-up the 9/11 Whitewash Commission, but he begged off when families objected.  Dov Zakheim, the 2.3 trillion dollar missing and unaccounted for Pentagon funds Man, is on the journal's board.  One is better off reading Commentary Magazine, where at least  the "Neocon fascist madmen" (in Web Tarpley's phrase) state their case in clearer and more honest - if that's the word - prose.I remember reading one article in The National Interest which actually made the assertion that we, meaning the USA, will need to engage in terrorism on occassion.  I couldn't believe they would actually print something like that, but they did.This fundamentally dishonest journal is a waste of time, for the most part, because it is neither interesting (the statement described in the above paragraph notwithstanding) nor meant, in the main, really other than to fool the public .  Kissinger I have a strong suspicion knows what happened on 9/11 and so do I suspect does Zakheim (to put it mildly in the latter's case), and yet they pretend the official version is true.  Supporting this journal is supporting the Bad Guys</review_text>
The problem with Computer Shopper is, it's neither a serious trade magazine like PC Mag, or a shopper's paradise like its former self was.  If you want hardware tips, Maximum PC is way better.  You can find pretty much everything in Computer Shopper for free on the web ..</review_text>
i remember back in the middle '90s this magazine was think... probably anywhere between 1.5-2.5 inches... it contained Ads, reviews, supplier lists, benchmarks and sometimes trial software... Well i have picked one up sense them... and they are now a centimeter thick (if your lucky) they contain ... reviews that are well written or well read, and a whole lot of ads... my conclusion don't buy it... if you want reviews buy PC Magizine or PC World... and if you want ads... surf the internet</review_text>
They allowed me to try one issue before I paid for the subscription.  After I read the first issue, I decided to cancel.  There are a couple of good topics but the articles were poorly written, for example, you couldn't see clearly what the conclusions or recommendations are.  The rest of the magazines are all advertisements, which you can get for free from the internet (or just anywhere)</review_text>
I got a free one year sub. to another gaming mag. with purchase of a game at GameStop. After it ended, about 6 months later, i started receiving this magazine, and i thought it was the same one, some kind of mix-up. But I didn't get a magazine every month. It skipped a few. Finally I went on their site to complain, and they promised to send extra issues to make up for it. I told them that there must have been a mixup...Then I cancelled my supposed "subscription", only to receive an e-mail saying that now they wouldn't be sending me anything, even the extra issues promised. Stay AWAY from these people!These people are extremely unprofessional.Try Playstation mag instead if you have a PS - I was just reccommended it</review_text>
this magazine is almost as bad as consumer reports. their comparison tests never adhere to their thesis about what the tests is measureing, for example a comparison test is said to be about quick acceleration and on point handling and then the car with the lack lust performance in handling and acceleration would be #1 in ranking. often, the car reviews are always mentioning information about a car that isn't relevant, or doesn't make sense, or the review isn't consistent with the posted viehicle stats. the magazine also seems to be biased. some vehicles are criticized with more irrelevant information than others to say its awful. after further reading of many issues, you would think they are playing favortism towards certain brands or recieving kick backs from manufacturers, for example, you will always see the domestic brand being referred to as basically "trash" and a japanese brand or a BMW is always the way to go, when once again the posted stats and sometimes photos say different.this is more noticeable when you can predict the out come of their reviews. ultimately, its a bad guide towards getting any  information on automobiles period. its the pat robertson of auto magazines. if it were possible, i woudln't even give this magazine 1 star.</review_text>
This magazine is not for the average car buyer.  They might as well call this the Robb Report.  They only test highend cars and the "best" ones are the ones that go 0-60mph the quickest, not ride nice or get good mpg</review_text>
Was a subsciber for many years mainly due to extremely balanced reporting, indepth coverage, etc.  Then, starting about 1-2 years ago, the magazine started to take a "left" tilt.  (I do not consider myself "right wing", am registered as an independant, but do like fair balanced coverage in my news)  Since the beginning of this decline, the Atlantic has become more and more just another liberal magazine.  The bias has also led, as it always does, to less in-depth reporting, since they tend to now ignore any aspect of an issue that does not support the left bent.</review_text>
I was under the impression that this was a literary magazine that would be full of fiction, short stories, essays, book reviews, and literary criticism. Instead I received a magazine that discusses political issues. Does the magazine know what it wants to be? They recently released a special fiction issue on the newsstands. Why would they if they're becoming a political magazine?  Do they want to be a news/political magazines such as Time, U.S. News & World Report, and Newsweek or do they want to be a literary magazine?They're doing a poor job of establishing themselves and drawing the line of what they want to be. I regret subscribing because I felt mislead. Of course for The Atlantic staff, turning the magazine into a political direction will probably bring them more sales. I don't think that reading and literary magazines are dead by any means but the format needs to be revamped so that people will want to read it.</review_text>
I admit, they have some good recipes, but most of them are not simple and very time-consuming. There is always a million ingredients in each little recipe. If you are a stay-at-home housewife and absolutely LOVE to cook, buy this, but if you are just normal, you won't find many recipes in here for you. I suggest you consider 'Cuisine at Home' before you buy this one</review_text>
I have received this magazine from it's start and have always found it to be full of great recipies, however, the company that produces this magazine has horrible customer service.  I have battled with them for over a year about a billing mistake on their part and they still have yet to make it right.  I have cancelled all subscriptions with them and refuse to do business with them any longer.  If you subscribe be very cautious about ordering any books from them</review_text>
Reason once had two things going for it. It articulated principled libertarianism, and it was a consistently interesting magazine. Now its ideology is fuzzy; certainly not consistently libertarian. It is also dull and aimless, often badly written. Case in point: the current issue as I write includes a defense of the FDA by a writer who publically attacks prominent libertarians, and who works for an organization that supports a prohibition on the sale of nutritional supplements, as well as promoting state assaults on the tobacco industry. The "old" Reason would never have published such a piece.  Nor would Reason have previously published Ronald Bailey's article advocating mandatory health insurance. Bailey also supports the Iraq war and psychiatric coercion. A bright spot continues to be the writing of Jacob Sullum</review_text>
I never bought GQ back in my 20s because for one thing, I never thought of myself as a clothes-horse.  Also, I actually took the G in GQ to mean that it was actually for Gentlemen, ie, sipping Champagne on a Yacht pass me the the Caviar type Gentlemen.Well, after now having reached a "certain age" I find myself going back and forth between Esquire and GQ and find that in many cases, neither are exactly right for me.  However, I think I've bought my last episode of GQ.  The 2006 "interview" with Will Ferrel was interesting for the first three paragraphs, and then it became an excercise in self referentialism, disguised as an attempt at wit.Also, the Politics of the magazine are unabashedly anti-Bush Administration, which would be OK except for the fact that I'm not reading GQ for Political content.  There are plenty of magazines out there make this their specialty, and when I find it in GQ, its just tiresome.  Frequently, swipes at Bush and his policies just come out of nowhere in an article, as if the Editor decided that a jab at Bush and his policies might help the piece, regardless of its content.Not to mention - does anyone actually wear the clothing they put on display?  $800 tennis shoes?  I fear that I will be an Esquire reader - I can't bear to become a "Men's Best Life" subscriber just yet</review_text>
I first subscribed to GQ when it was still a quarterly...an issue only every 3 months.  Back then it was primarily a men's fashion magazine.  It was sophisticated, useful and classy filled with clothing men could actually wear and practical grooming tips, trends and style.  I suppose in many ways it resembled a Ralph Lauren print ad. Now fashion is relegated to a few pages in the back of the magazine with men wearing things they seem to have found at a local flea market.  Nothing seems to fit properly, patterns - plaids - stripes...anything goes.  It resembles homeless couture.  Odds and ends that nobody should actually wear.  Sure the world has changed.  But fashion, good taste, and quality are timeless despite tweaking and contemporary preferences.  The editors may feel that grunge, hopeless edginess for it's own sake and adolescent sloppiness sell issues.  But they might be surprised that there's a huge pent up demand for sophistication and real style, both formal and relaxed.  I hope someone else picks up the torch.</review_text>
I used to love Outburn magazine. I first discovered it when I came across the mag at a local mainstream bookstore chain. The first thing I saw on the cover was VNV Nation. I bought that issue and soon after that I ordered a subscription. What I loved about Outburn at the time was that the magazine covered artists and bands that aren't covered in the mainstream music magazines, namely those in the goth, EBM, synthpop, and industrial scene. Unfortunately within the next year and a half, the magazine started covering less of those types of bands and more death metal bands and hardcore punk bands, two genres I don't give a rat's behind about. I don't know WTF happened at the magazine but they stopped covering anything goth related and started covering more music I would much rather have my ears ripped off by pliers than listen to. Just like Alternative Press, Outburn started out as a cool mag but now they have become a joke and more about following than setting trends</review_text>
I have been a subscriber to TIME for over 15 years and before that a reader of my parents' subscription. It pains me to say that this magazine has forgotten what it is about. Frankly, the only issues worth their salt are those resulting from a major world event such as a natural disaster or a terror attack; such events seem to energize an otherwise listless staff of seemingly bored editors and newswriters.A newsweekly has the obligation to go beyond the newspapers--to use the extra couple days to provide a more balanced and analytical view. Unfortunately TIME fixes its editorial position at the beginning of a story--any future coverage is designed to prove TIME's initial position correct. The immediate taking of an editorial position is then carried into all future coverage of the event; stifling analysis and preventing any analytical development beyond the first few stories--"we told you so, we told you so." Even worse, the coverage of a lengthy story peters out until something sensational happens at which point the sensational event becomes the ultimate interpretation of the entire story. Can't the magazine occasionally admit it was wrong rather than turning its eye away from the story that continues to burn? Out of sight, out of mind is the mantra...In fact, I sometimes debate whether the decline of this magazine mirrors or outpaces the general decline in our media; newspapers are failing, television news can't seem to get away from the gory or sensationalistic, even academic journals have specialized themselves into irrelevance. We seem to have a greater appreciation for comedy than analysis.Neutrality is dead. Frankly, I don't care so much about any perceived editorial slant as I do about the fact that the magazine is increasingly boring and irrelevant. TIME used to have excellent coverage of trends and events outside of the United States--no more. Iran is building nuclear weapons but merits the occasional blurb on a world summary page. African states are making vast strides towards democracy, we get an article about Nigerian computer fraud. Russia is emerging from the turmoil of perestroika and its painful transition has much to teach about the costs and value of democracy, but we seem to focus only on the latest roadbomb in Iraq. Japan, one of the world's most influential cultures, in the week I originally wrote this review (see 12-month subscription) merited only a snippet regarding a royal marriage and an analysis of foreign intrusion into sumo wrestling. Somewhere in the wide world is a fascinating place or culture to which TIME could send a correspondent and bring the place and people alive to its readership, instead we get tabloid excrement in the nature of Joel Stein's puerile take on pornography and social deviants. But most damning is the fact that after reading TIME one asks: How in the hell did our world become boring?Can TIME try emulating The Economist rather than The Enquirer? Someone needs to step in and restore the proud tradition of complete and in-depth coverage--educate the reader about the world in which we live; don't wait until either natural disasters or internal politics shine the spotlight on any of the various cultures and countries in which real and interesting events take place every single week. TIME has the history and potential of being a five-star magazine, if only it would just focus on finding and reporting the news</review_text>
I liked Time magazine a lot until they named George Bush person of the year? Oh my god, where were all the educated editors/writers when they let this moron write this article</review_text>
Time Magazine named George Bush as Person of the Year, despite the economic, international and ecological damage he has done and will continue to do over the next four years. Speak and be heard. Cancel your subscription.</review_text>
TIME has long been increasingly superficial in its news coverage, and recent years have only accelerated this trend.  In the 60s and 70s, it was a somewhat serious magazine with a centrist bend (originally it was considered quite conservative), but as the years go by it's degenerated into more and more pop-culture fluff with little substance.As for its being part of the "liberal" media, this is inaccurate.  Recent coverage of the (2004) election has attempted to reduce the Democratic candidate to the status of a non-person.  The first debate between John Kerry and George W. Bush was not even covered, except for one very brief article listing a few "fact check" points.  Instead, the cover story wa about new products and movies, a kind of Sharper Image catalog Lite.TIME also gave no coverage whatsoever to the election in Afghanistan.  It was mentioned in passing in another article about the U.S. election, but I would imagine that conservatives would object to the magazine's ignoring a signficant world event that George W. Bush has pointed to as one of his accomplishments in office.In my view neither candidate received adequate and fair treatment.  The bias seems to be in favor of Mr. Bush, but it's still mostly bland and superficial.  Your money is better spent on the British magazine "The Economist" which is far more substantive.  While its editorial viewpoint is conservative, it's sound fiscal conservatism rather than the tent-revivalism that currently substitutes for conservatism in U.S. politics.  "The Economist" also provides a liberal viewpoint and is the closest I've found to a (dare I say it) fair-and-balanced approach to the news.TIME can still be entertaining to read, but I wouldn't take what they say too seriously.  They tend to bend with the political wind</review_text>
It is a shame but the reviewer that made the comment that this magazine does not have any balanced view of what is serious world news and what is fluff hit the nail on the head. It skims the surface and is 'pop'.Anyone reading this would be entertained but be none the wiser about what is going on in the real world.Again it is a shame if this is all people have to read on what is going on in the world (Newsweek is exactly the same)  especially in the United States.TIME magazine is from the same people that gave us CNN and is unfortunately symptomatic of the liberal media and the inexorable consolidation of all media particularly in the U.S. and the resulting blandness and lack of real choice.The other irritating thing about TIME is it's tone which is patronising and a little supercilious.Subscribe to the ECONOMIST, there are less pictures !</review_text>
I used to sell and fix Macs since the original Mac 128,I have owned 14 Macs over 21 years so I have seen it all.Mac Addict is OK but only because our choices are so slim. Mac User was always the best and I couldn't bother renewing MacWorld after they got nasty with my late payment after I bought it for almost 20 years.I quit buying MacAddict because of all the free disks. They were full of buggy freebies and Ii turned me off. To keep up with Macs, read the NY Times in the Circuits section and David Pogue's column, web site. Also. if you can afford the Wall St Journal, read Walt Mossberg for all Techy things. He gives a fair review and answers any questions he can, Mac Pc, Camera. The Wash Post on line has a good tech writer for Mac stuff.We reallt don't need a Magazine with the Web. Happy Mac-ing and order TIGER.I JUST GOT MY NEW IPOD PHOTO 60 gig and a 1gig Shuttle which I use every day in the gym. Buy Applecare and Apple will cover the (probably) 2 batteries. I have an original IPOD (10Gig in 01) and the battery still works and I abused it on many plane trips. It still runs and is my bedroom pod hooked up to my Bose Cd/Radio. yeah I love toys.Roger Taylo</review_text>
Where Macworld is bad, Addict is dreadful. It is dumbed down to the level of Teen Beat, and the "reviews" don't deserve the name. The extent to which it drools over Apple is embarassing, leaving no pretence of independence. Like its competitor, it exploits the crummy support that typifies the computer industry, so we get articles about the "secrets" of such and such product. A "secret" in the computer industry is a feature or defect that has not been properly documented by the manufacturer. This should be blasted, not applauded. But Addict is happy to exploit readers by selling them the information they should have gotten when they purchased the product</review_text>
If you want to do the same exercise over and over.. but with better make up and cuter outfit go ahead.If you want better exercises and articles look to Oxygen or Women's M&</review_text>
I use to subscribe to SHAPE several years ago, and then it was packed full of great work out routines, meal plans, etc for women at all levels of fitness.Well . . . my last few months of Shape have been a complete disappointment.  I found very few pages of good genuine fitness and healthy eating advice.  Instead, it ranks right up with Glamour in the category of magazines with the highest percentage of advertisements, nearly all of the excercise material is supposed "quick fix" fitness fluff which gives women very unrealistic expectations, and the healthy eating advise is absolutely elementary.There is no substance in here for women like me, the average working woman who desire to live a healthy life everyday and have limited time to commit to exercise.  I want a magazine that is inspiring with a focus on living a sustained healthy lifestyle, not a joke about getting flat abs in a week with illustrations of perfectly chiseled models who obviously do not face the body challenges of average women.  I'm sorry but most women are not going to look like "her" after two weeks, or many months of Shape's 10-30 minute a day routines, but they sure lead you to beleive so.I highly recommend "Her Sports"  it is THE magazine for women desiring to live an active, day-to-day healthy life</review_text>
While I rarely subscribe to magazines, I was looking for something to motivate me to exercise and so I signed up for a one year subscription to Shape. Before and during college I was a ballet dancer, but after entering the real, 9-5 working world half a year ago, exercise time became more difficult to find. Unfortunately, I found that Shape magazine was not really about exercise at all. It was about beauty products, fancy new-age spas and resorts, and trendy workout accessories. I was also shocked by the models on the magazine's covers and pages. Not only were they skinny but they usually sported next to nothing. I finally cancelled my subscription when a magazine came with a woman in a see-through, lacy top on the front of it, visible nipples and all. Workout wear? I think not! Trust me, the woman belonged in a porn magazine, not my exercise magazine</review_text>
This magazine recently (April 05) featured what they felt were the 100 greatest movie moments of all time.  Number 1 was the sing-along scene from MAGNOLIA.  Other moments in the top 10 included the credits from AUSTIN POWERS 3 and one of Eugene Levy's quotes from AMERICAN PIE.  Keep in mind, these are the 100 greatest movie moments of ALL TIME.This mag/rag is nothing more than the film section of FHM stretched out to full-issue length.  Utter trash</review_text>
Lucky is one of my frequent checkout pickups. Bright, fun, and not requiring any frontal lobe interference, it's the perfect pick-me-up for the early morning commuter train. I give it five fabulous stars!However, the actual subscription was very underhanded! Within the space of a week I was sent last month's issue (long gone from the stands), the issue just about to decirculate, and, finally, the actual current issue. So, two weeks after my order i am already 3 issues in to a 12 issue subscription, and none too happy about it. Cond Nast needs to be told that subscribers do not exist to let them clear out their unsold backlog</review_text>
Lucky Magazine makes me feel Not so Lucky.  It makes me sad that I can not afford all the items they put in their magazine.  One month they tell me round-toed shoes are in and show me 50 pictures of shoes that I would love to own of which 2 I can afford.  Then the following month Lucky tells me round-toed shoes are out and square-toed shoes are in and show me another 50 pictures.  You get the idea?  This magazine is based on trends and you will be broke if you try to keep up and feel bad if you can't afford all the great things it is showing.I did enjoy Lucky for it's profiles on upcoming designers, some great website links, and the one or two affordable items it does toss in each section.  I also got a few ideas on how to wear clothing in new and different ways.   Most of the time, though, I felt sad and envious after I finished reading it.  These are feelings I'd rather not encounter.  I think I would enjoy it more if it were more informative discussing the quality differences in the items they are showing, maybe testing them out in different situations to help me make the best choice in my purchases.</review_text>
Don't purchase subscriptions from Amazon or Magazine Express.The following are my experiences with a subscription to Hiragana Times from Amazon.What this page doesn't tell you is that the Japanese magazines subscribed to on Amazon are filled by a company called Magazine Express and are shipped SEAMAIL from Japan which mean you'll recieve every issue 8 to 10 after it's released.I placed my order in January and, to date, have not recieved a single issue. After several phone calls, the Magazine Express people (who fill the Amazon subscriptions) said they had to restart my subscription for the May issues which will take 8-10 weeks due to shipping issues. So after ordering in January, I will not receive a single issue of this uncancelable magazine until possibly in late July. Very poor service.This is unacceptable for a magazine that most US Japanese bookstores (fujisan is one) can get within a week or that you can order directly from the publisher for only a few dollars more. If I had known the shipping policy I would not have ordered and the magazine supplier, Magazine Express will not cancel the subscrition.I advise avoiding ALL Amazon magazine subsriptions due to their poorly stated policies.**Update, I wrote this review in June. It is now July 8th and I've just been informed I must wait until August 15th to see if an issue arrives. I ordered the magazine on January 9th and I have had no resolution from either Magazine Express or Amazon who provides no way to contact anyone within Amazon about magazine orders. I reiterate, buying magazines from Amazon if a poor idea</review_text>
Don't be fooled by the cover  and description, this is for a magazine only & "NO DVD included', or should I say for a magazine containing mainly adverts for components and games.Waste of time and mone</review_text>
I have been a subscriber to CGW for almost 10 years.  Sadly, I have to end the subscription now.  It was a very good magazine; but no more.  One reason is that more than half of the magazine are now ads.  The second reason is that the size of the magazine is getting smaller and smaller with the layout that is getting very hard to read.  And the reviews are bad. The reviews don't have a professional kind of feel anymore.  I can't totally blame the magazine. A big part is due to the gaming industry.  There is no good game anymore.  They are all FPS and MMORPG.  Just how many time you can review the same type of games?One positive thing about CGW is that it now comes with a DVD full of demo.  I think the DVD alone is worth the subscription.  But for me, it is done</review_text>
Well, imagine my surprise when I picked up the February 2004 issue, and found that things had drastically changed. Mainly in the Editor's letter. It used to be 1 page, now it's just a small little column now, that is exactly like other Ziff Davis game mags, Now the redesign isnt as bad as other ZD game mags, but the removal of the 1 page editor's letter, really steams me up. At least they didnt bother Executive Editor Robert Coffey's Scorched Earth column. It's still 1 page. It's on the last page usually. And yes the redesign is really bad in terms of readability. Most of the time they have a red or blue or yellow background, and it's really hard to read the text at times. Now at least their disc will auto-load, unlike PC Gamer. And what really pisses me off, is when a magazine has a Hot 100 section, or a best PC's or videocards, or peripherals section, and they hardly ever change the captions or descriptions come with it. I'm sorry if I got off track a lot, but I felt the need to. I hope this review helped you. EDIT: 5/8/2004 PC Gamer recently changed Editor's and the Editor-In-Chief was re-assigned to become the Editor-In-Chief of the Official Xbox Magazine. The new EIC of PCG is the former Executive Editor, and I hate him, so this is why I say CGW is now the best PC games magazine</review_text>
I ordered Kiplingers and US News on March 25 and was immediately charged for both subscriptions.  Today is October 12th and I've never received US News.  I've complained several times and been given a variety of excuses and promised a refund and free subsciption which of course I haven't received.  When I requested a refund of course I was given the wrong amount.  If you want to order magazines I agree with the last reviewer go to another site because while Amazon is great for books that haven't got the magazine business straight.  Also, the customer service phone numbers are wrong and this is a total mess.</review_text>
I ordered this magazine as a gift. I paid for it on Nov. 21 '05. It is now Feb. 19 '06, and my daughter has not yet recieved her Christmas present! I will never again place an order with Amazon! Barnes and Noble has proved to be very efficient and worthy of my business. I will at this point try to get my money back from this company, and my daughter can purchase the magazine and all the missed issues off the newsstand</review_text>
After falling in love with Gourmet's yellow cookbook, I subscribed to Gourmet, hoping for the same great classic recipes and commonsense commentary.  Wow, what a disappointment.  I have just received my second issue and, as another reviewer said, it is about 90% ads for high-end luxury goods like jewelry and cars.  The 6-page "Special Advertisement Section" stops being so special when there are 20 of them in one issue! What happened, Ruth Reichl?  The few recipes that one can find are unattractive and/or too difficult for even weekend cooking.For those cooks looking for a great cooking magazine, I highly recommend Bon Appetit over Gourmet: the majority of the magazine is recipes and cooking tips, with only interspersed ads.  I will be calling to see if I can get my subscription switched tomorrow.</review_text>
I would agree with previous reviewers, in that the burgeoning ads in this magazine over the past decade has made the magazine a chore to read.  The number of ads now easily exceed the number of pages devoted to articles.  It is also quite disturbing to note that many of those ads (possibly 50% or higher) pitch ultra high end products, such as Viking ranges, BMW's, Oceanna Cruises, trips to Bora Bora...WTF? Although I do enjoy I a luxury meal, I don't want to go into massive credit card debt purchasing products this magazine is selling.  Ocassionally, behind the clutter, I find a useful recipe; I rarely find an interesting article.I am going to let my subscription expire at the end of the current period</review_text>
I began subscribing to Gourmet in 1961, and continued to subscribe for about forty years. I also gifted family members with subscriprions.I discontinued my subscription because the magazine has deteriorated so much in the last several years: There are so many ads and tear-outs in the magazine that one can hardly find the recipes, at least half of the magazine, and sometimes more; also I object to the "political," and some downright offensive, articles. I am Catholic, and I was very offended by an outrageous article charging that, during the Nazi era,naked Jews were made to crawl through the streets on their knees by persons, which the article linked in some way to the Catholic Church. I think that the information was apochryphal; and, what does this have to do with food?</review_text>
First issue arrived today. After tearing up  8 or 9 insert ads which made it difficult to read the magazine, I sat back to enjoy. First article  was a lecture by Robert F. Kennedy Jr. on the danger of mercury in fresh water domestic fish. Perfectly safe to fish we are informed (well duh). Just don't eat what you catch. Expectant mothers should be extra careful as babies with high level of mercury have lower IQs. The net is full of peer-reviewed studies from major universities on the subject of mercury poisoning. Why buy a food magazine to read what an activist lawyer has to say about the subject?Next article was in: "Politics and the Plate". The controversy  here concerns local and season foods. Gourmet asks: "Are those who promote them sincere? Or is it just a come on for gullible diners?"  So who does Gourmet think is "gullible"? The reader? Implication seems to be the reader is too stupid to figure out that yes, vendors might promote locally grown products that aren't all that terrific. Nothing of substance in this article at all.Going back to the front, an editor of Gourmet recalls how her late father didn't appreciate health food stores (Aren't fathers stupid?).Three downer articles in a row. I gave up. This isn't the magazine I remember from 20 years ago. Even the format is annoying. It is difficult to know where ads end and articles begin (recall the most junked up website you've seen, that is the Gourmet model)If you do enjoy the politics and  the environmental stuff (on either side)  you can do better on the net for free. If you want entertaining, informative articles on food, Gourmet is not the place to look.Subscribed to Saveur at the same time as Gourmet. It is a pleasure to read.  No annoying ads, no political screeds. Great photographs. Interesting and exotic recipes. As good or better than Gourmet was decades ago.</review_text>
I've subscripted to Gourmet for years but I let my subscription run out.  The lifestyle articles keep pushing out the recipies.  As I read through food magazines I dog-ear the page with a recipe I want to try.  In the last year there were very few dog-eared pages and it wasn't worth continuing the subscription</review_text>
Today I purchased my first and probably last issue of Gourmet. While there were plenty of recipes (some of which I won't use but they were still cool to look at) there were TONS of ads.It makes you wonder either a) how much the people who make this magazine get paid or b) for all the ads why this isn't free.I can see the need for a few ads so that we the consumers don't have to pay a fortune for a good magazine. But I took out 33 pages of ads and figured there were about 140 full page ads. That's over half of the magazine which is 260 pages. That's really sad.Recipe wise, some of them look interesting and very gourmet, but there are things you need to have that I can't get in the middle of the U.S.And about three of the six articles were interesting to read - when you could find them slipped inbetween their plethora of ads.Fine Cooking is still the best one out there</review_text>
I got this magazine for a year and a half before I had to quit my subscription recently. I liked all the fashion tips and articles on how to dress for your body size and style, and that is why I subscribed to begin with. But I was not expecting the bombardment of amoral opinions forced on me. (not to mention an overload of advertising- which you will get in most fashion magazines anyway, so that's not a complaint). Sure there was a few lines here and there that were nonbiased (telling the facts of STDs and such), but 90% of the articles on sex, were opinion and not fact. Girls today are having sex with anyone and getting hurt emotionally and physically because of magazines like Seventeen who say that sex is good if you're ready (What 15 year old girl is ready to have sex and get an STD or a baby?? Please.), and that condoms are 100% effective. They are not, but that's what most teen girls believe because of stupid magazines like this. They need to take advice from their parents and doctors, not magazine articles. I was disgusted at the opinions presented as truth to basically promote teen girls doing whatever they want without consequences.</review_text>
When I first started reading this magazine back in 2003 I thought "Oooh what a cool mag!!" But clearly I was totally wrong. Since 2003 Seventeen has changed  from a girly sophisticated mag appealing to girls just barely in their teens to to a cheap,overated, cliche`, piece of crap!!! I'd like to know what happened!!!!! It's super boring now. It has no style. All the sections are about health garbage & boring global trash. HELLO? What about the stars, movies,.. the music section sucks! Nothing is good anymore! If you disagree with me your probably just as boring as it yourself. I hate it and I DO NOT recomend this magazine. Don't read it!! You'll be wasting your time</review_text>
Please read Naomi Jakobs' review for Relevant Magazine below. It captures so brilliantly and eloquently the heart of the Christian 'post-modern' kick. If you have to go out of your way to claim you're a celebrity, then you simply aren't a celebrity (Take "Fitness Celebrity" John Basedow for example). In the same way, if you have go out of your way to claim that the Post-modern Evangelical movement is relevant, then you're claim for relevancy is simply not credible. The Christian church has certainly played a vastly significant role in the past 2000 years. However pop-culturalizing Evangelical Christianity isn't causing it to be any more relevant than it was when Sandi Patty or Carmen ruled the Christian top 40. Does the fact that some Christians enjoy the latest musical fads make the concept of accepting a human blood-sacrifice for the pardon of sins more palatable</review_text>
Admittedly, I am slightly older than the "Relevant" demographic.  But I'm not 40 yet!  So there are a number of things here that do have some appeal to me.  And I applaud the magazine for attempting to address culturally important issues.Still, the magazine suffers from it's unrelenting fawning over the whole post-modern vibe and it's own sense of self-importance as a beacon for charismatic hipness. ("Hey, look out, world!  We Jesus Freaks have iPods too!") Usually, the more something or someone sweats to proclaim their own relevance, the more danger there is that they can become irrelevant.So, like it's spiritual cousin "Charisma," this magazine suffers from a somewhat shallow perspective on life and culture.  It trumpets its ability to ask "the tough questions," even as it follows a relatively safe, politically correct post-mod/charismatic/hipster wannabe party line.I mean, their idea of being cutting edge was to put Bono on  the cover.  If you want to be cutting edge, put the libertine Adam Clayton on the cover and ask him about Bono's faith.  Now, I would read that article!  (I am a major U2 and Bono fan.  I'm not knocking him; just the lack of imagination at "Relevant".)There's also way too much emulation of the world's perspective on generational heritage. "Hey, we're young, and we're smart, and we don't need to do anything the way our geezer parents did it."  I guess having a little gray hair or wrinkles doesn't cut it in today's Paris Hilton culture, but I'd like to think that it might be a little different in a culture shaped by biblical values.  Actually, "Relevant" seems to be a little afraid to say what "biblical values" are (beyond the obvious politically expedient ones); it all seems amorphous here.I've never been a fan of the whole "what's hot/what's not" ethos.  And, I'd like to give a little more respect to today's Christian young people to think they could handle something that didn't fall into that same faddish trap.I am hopeful that they may get it right yet with "Relevant".   At times, they seem tantilizingly close.  But it takes more than a slick hairdo, male earrings, chin stubble, idolization of youth, culture icon quotations, and psycobabble "cool dude" theological lingo to make one relevant</review_text>
I like to read Cook's Illustrated at the library.  Their magazine is much too expensive for the small amount of recipes included within. I like the tips sent in by readers, and some of the product reviews.I have found that most of their recipes are very involved--nitpicky, to be kind.  The lemon meringue pie recipe--which I tried from their "America's Test Kitchen" cookbook--calls for cooking cornstarch in water, cooling it, and then beating the solution into the meringue. Supposedly this keeps the meringue from destabilizing.  All that happened in my kitchen was I found little lumps of cornstarch glue at the bottom of my mixing bowl while scraping out the meringue.  I have made meringue before without cornstarch, and can't help thinking this is an extra step that isn't neccessary. Their "best" brownies are good, but I can make equally good brownies without all the extra steps involved in melting chocolate and cooling it, etc.If you're looking for easy, fool proof recipes, that don't take a gazillion steps and aren't fussy about exactly what ingredients you use, this isn't the magazine for you</review_text>
This is a good magazine for the home cook that wants to branch-out from the standard Family Circle or Good Housekeeping  no risk recipes.My BIG problem with this company is once they've got your contact information, you will receive more junk mail than you thought one company could generate; hawking every single publication they produce, relentlessly.I stopped subscribing and it took a year to stop receiving their snail spam; and there's no way to 'opt out' onlin</review_text>
I subscribed to Cooks Magazine some years ago, back when it  began publishing again.  I had problems with issues that failed to arrive, and wrote to them about it - never received a reply or any note of concern.Since that time, I occasionally glance through it at newsstands to see if there are any articles of interest.  Even by dint of casual glance, I've begun to tire of the formulaic articles in which some drone tirelessly adds or deletes ingredients in order to finally come up with the "perfect recipe" for something or other.  I now skip right to the "perfected" recipe, and decide whether its worth committing to memory.  Some of the explanations for the success or lack thereof of the inclusion or exclusion of a particular ingredient are hare-brained at best.There are also two other areas of this magazine that have disappointed me:1.  Product Reviews:  They range from just plain wrong to idiotic.The KitchenAid Pro 600 was hailed by Cook's as the best in its class for many mixing chores.  Yet, the Amazon reviews tell a different tale - one of a short lifespan when used to mix bread dough because of a plastic gear cover that deforms and finally comes apart, allowing the metal gears to separate.Christopher Kimball (the editor) once performed an evaluation of cookware in which he calculated the price of the cookware per pound of its weight.  No, I'm not joking.  In that evaluation, Le Creuset came out on top simply because it was heavy.  All-Clad, even though it conducts heat very evenly, suffered for not having as much heft, and therefore was judged pricey, on a pound weight basis.One issue of Cooks boasted on its cover "Unsweetened chocolate -supermarket brand beats others".  Apparently, Hershey's was designated best.  Not too many months later, Callebaut was recommended above all others, and Hershey's was judged barely acceptable.  Feeling manipulated yet?2.  Finally, there are those dreadful editorials by Mr. Kimball.  Rambling, painfully written, and punctuated with a picture of Mr. Kimball wearing a bow tie, and looking very much as if his head were being held on by it. Mr. Kimball is a humble man, with much to be humble about.  He writes as if he were chanelling Helen Gurley Brown, but in red and black flannel watch-plaid and without her sense of play.Time to re-vamp this magazine, folks</review_text>
Cook's Illustrated is the first cooking magazine that I'd found myself truly motivated to read cover-to-cover, even though they DO insert advertisements for their own products, which I suppose, to them, makes this an "ad-free" magazine, but I'm not surprised they've bent the rules with that claim. The one time I found it necessary to contact Cook's Illustrated about a customer service issue, I was simply floored by the treatment that I received... I'll simply leave it at that.I personally don't intend on re-subscribing ("Fine Cooking", here I come!). You, however, may find that this is the cooking magazine for you. And, as far as what they do goes, Cook's Illustrated IS good at what they do - I'll give them that.If you have not found this review to be helpful, I'm sorry if I haven't made the value in my warning apparent. Just know that there are those of us out there who HAVE had bad experiences, and are simply trying to prevent others from experiencing the same.</review_text>
I should preface this reveiw with the fact that I am an accomplished home cook.  I have been cooking for 25 years and own more than 500 cookbooks.  I do not buy commercially prepared products like breads, crackers, mayonnaise or salad dressings.  I make these items myself.  I suspect that I am not the target audience for this publication.The May/June 2006 issue is 32 pages in length in total.  Given that there are only 6 issues a year, I was expecting a little more than a mere 32 pages.The May/June 2006 issue contains the following information:Simplifying Moroccan ChickenBringing Home Fish and ChipsGrilled Tomato SalsaGrilled London BroilMain-dish Vegetable Stir-friesHow to cook pastaFoolproof Veal ScaloppiniA new Twist on Chicken SaladsGarlic and Olive Oil Mashed PotatoesUtimate Turtle BrowniesBest Strawberry Cream CakeThe Scoop on Vanilla Ice CreamA review of tongsIf you are an experienced cook their isn't much about cooking in this issue that will be new to you.  This issue contained not a single piece of new information for me about cooking.  However, I enjoyed the equipment reveiws and did find them informative and useful.This magazine would be helpful if someone is an inexperienced cook.  Bottom line, I will not be renewing my subscription unless future issues have a little "more meat" in their content.  I think that this magazine is overpriced for what you receive.  I would suggest saving the price of the subscription and buy their "Best of" cookbook instead.  It costs about the same amount, contains many more recipes, has many of their equipment reviews and is bound in a hard cover so that it will hold up longer.  Additionally, check out an issue of "Fine Cooking" which is another test kitchen type of publication, just with more depth.</review_text>
There are very few serious articles in this magazine-- just tons of tidbits (stats/facts/tips). By the time you get to the end it's difficult to recall anything from the magazine; it's that shallow.Occasionally there's a good recipe, but that's about it</review_text>
I started my first subscription to this one in 1980-81. It was EXCELLENT!! It had all kinds of great advice and help on real issues relating to "preventing" ailments/conditions.  Now it's a little advertising manual for drug users and fad dieters!  Wow...what a change now. I'm not interested in "paying" to read ads. I'll get my motivation and information on more reliable sources.  Besides, I got tired of all the little order forms that kept falling out on my lap while I rode the stationery bike!  What a waste of trees. :</review_text>
This magazine seems most interested in promoting books, etc. that it has a financial interest in--most notably lately the South Beach Diet. Prevention and it's website are now full of misleading banner ads promoting irresponsible dieting techniques and fads.  Too bad, because more than ever nowadays we could use a nice little magazine about nutrition, weight loss, exercise and natural remedies that isn't influenced by it's publishing partners and advertisers. Skip this one, and try Self or Health for a more well-rounded look at women's heath needs</review_text>
Back in the 1970's my grandmother subscribed to Prevention. At that time, it was a wonderful magazine, filled with informative articles aimed at the "Prevention" of illness and the promotion of wellness (as the founder of Prevention, J.I. Rodale had preached). Articles about the role of vitamins and nutrition were light years ahead of their time. (J.I. can be given a lot of credit for bringing vitamins and supplements to the mainstream). Over the years, and especially after the tragic death of Robert Rodale (J.I.'s son), and the takeover by his wife and daughter, it has unfortunately transformed into a fluffy, tabloid-like "women's magazine" with scantily clad women on the covers, and one- or two-page articles instructing women to get killer abs and burn the fat. I think J.I. Rodale is probably spinning in his grave to see what his descendents have done to butcher this magazine, which bears NO resemblence whatsoever to what it used to be. I flipped through a copy in disgust recently to note, as another reviewer has stated, plenty of ads for DRUGS which really seems to go against the idea of preventing illness in the first place (whereas the old Prevention sang the praises of vitamins and health foods). I don't know why the Rodale family doesn't just scrap the title and call it something else, but alas, they are a major corporation now and I have little hope that this magazine will improve any time soon</review_text>
This magazine comes with lots of advertisements - 70% or more. Plus, articles (less than 15 articles in every issue) in the magazines are not very useful.  I subscribed the magazine because it is inexpensive and it is rated high by other subscribers.  Now I realize I made a mistake.</review_text>
I was looking forward to a magazine that took a good look at different subjects than those covered in the mainstream media. What I received was a manual on how to think the "right" way. I've never delved deeply into politically labeling myself, but I vaguely considered myself a liberal. Man, was I wrong. Clearly, liberal means much the same as the demonized "conservative". This magazine has a single viewpoint, that of an ultraliberal ex-hippie who has found themselves wealthy in the 21st century. It is full of articles about "finding meaning" and "reassessing life" that seem to have been written by folks who drive Chevy Suburbans and pay too much for a cup of coffee. The magazine gives off a strong smell of covert superiority, and it made me nauseous</review_text>
How people can read and be fooled by the nonsense sprouted in ths rag is beyond me. All the usual suspects are found through out it's pages. This rag represents all those things that leftists are now notorious for: Polictal correctness, anti-capitalists, anti-gobalisers etc With all these -isms and ologies your in for a pain in the head. What's more the 'ideas' you'll find here have been tried, tested and more importantly failed. Ah well... some people are just too easy to fool</review_text>
I had not idea that you could order that magazine directly from them until I bought one from our local Super Market. I was surprised at the difference that I had already paid to order from Amazon and what it was there.  I canceled my order and ordered from them.Some items are much less on Amazon and some are much more. You just have to be careful.A magazine is a magazine no matter where it comes from.</review_text>
Why pay $34 when you can buy the magazine at a bookstore and order a subscription for $19.9</review_text>
I ordered this mag back in JUNE, now it's DECEMBER and I've yet to receive it. This equals a big fat ZERO in my book.</review_text>
First off, I subscribed to this magazine for a couple of years, and enjoyed it. But the "main guy" Robert Kennedy, is someone who offends me both personally and politically. He assumes that every girl/women reading that magazine is tiny. For his information, some of us work out 5-6 days a week and eat well, and are still heavy-set. His comments on heavy-set people are offensive, thoughtless, and sometimes even downright cruel. Nonetheless, the pictures/articles were inspiring to me, and it is a decent fitness magazine</review_text>
This is the worst magazine I have ever subscribed too.  I hated it so much after the first issue that when new ones came, I thru it right in the trash.  Here why:1- Ad after ad for dietary supplements (like dexatrim and stacker) which i think cheapins the creditablity of the magazine b/c true health doesnt come from a bottle.2- Many pics of overly built up women (think fitness competitions)...not something the average women can aspire too...and too me, is nasty looking.3-The information that was in it is general information that anyone with common sense already know!My advice to you, AVOID THIS MAGAZINE, unless you like body building or like looking at body builders</review_text>
Do NOT!! Order from this website! I purchased a subscription for Oxygen magazine on Jan. 30, 2006, and I still have not received the first issue. I am very dissapointed, to say the least!</review_text>
This magazine is chock full of supplement advertisements.  Advertisements in fashion magazines are annoying, but supplements can be unhealthy and dangerous.  These ads may have something to do with the target audience of the magazine...  It seems to be directed to women who are hard core about weightlifting and fitness, to the level of competition.  A recent article in the magazine was talking about what percentage of body fat was too low for women.  Some of the women had body fat below 10% - I'm trying to get mine below 30%.  It's just a different fitness/weightloss league completely.I like magazines like Fitness and Shape better because it sets more reasonable goals and provides more reasonable advice.  I can substitute toast with jam for bagels with cream cheese.  I can't drink protein shakes for breakfast and lunch, eat 10 servings of protein a day, and pop potentially dangerous pills.  I am very disappointed with this magazine..</review_text>
articles weren't anything new. mostly fluff and cosmetic/clothes ads. better info and exercises in Oxygen and Women's M&F.</review_text>
We subscribed to this for a school fundraiser. The first issue came November 13 with many useful  coupons, ONLY they expired in October 2006! I wish I could get my money back on a useless magazine filled with alot of advertising. If you want a decent health magazine, try PREVENTION. They have alot more to offer than this rag. Save your money, I wish I had!Take the time to search around. I hope this saves someone from making the mistake I had</review_text>
Occasionally when I go to the grocery store I pick up a magazine by the check out counter. So I bought an issue of Fitness magazine and then decided to get a subscription. I don't know what the heck I was thinking. Each time I got the issue I noticed there was always some skinny blond chick on the cover wearing a bikini.  There were NEVER any women of color on the cover. So when I was sent a letter, asking if I'd like to renew my subscription, I said he11 no. I'm not wasting my money on a so-called fitness magazine that doesn't feature women of color on its cover. There's just no way. I thought fitness was for everybody, not just for skinny blondes who wear bikinis. And just because your skinny doesn't make you `fit' either. Skip this if possible</review_text>
I subscribed to this magazine for a year and found it a waste of money. Every issue has a girl in a bikini on the front (can't a woman look sexy in anything but?) And every issue claims to have "the best ever exercise for...." ok..what about the last 10 issues that claimed to have the same thing..those exercises are no longer "best ever?" I didn't like the fashion sections, and I also don't like how there really aren't any articles. When I subscribe to a magazine I'd like to be able to read it, not just look at pictures. The only thing I liked about it were the success stories..and even those seemed repetitive...are we only allowed fruit and grilled chicken?</review_text>
Was very dissapponted with this magazine.  They go unread and get thrown out.  Just waiting for our subscription to run out.It is really for older kids and of very little interest to younger kids</review_text>
Disney, just about the worst company on Earth, has many lines of magazines. This is just used to suck even more money, even though they already have so much money that they're kids drown to death in money. Then disney goes on to cancel Dave the Barbarian and Teacher's Pet, the only good Disney shows</review_text>
I had hopes that this magazine would be a nice alternative to the others out there.  From the moment I opened it, it felt so smug.  I gave it a chance and read it cover to cover (the April issue).  But what finally did me in (after having read that I could buy an $800 blouse to make me feel pretty in that after pregnancy stage, that I could match my children's shoes to my Jimmy Choo's and finally that I could buy my child the latest $300 tricycle) was the article entitled "Normal" about a child who was misdiagnosed with Autism.  The article discussed how distraught the mother was after her child was diagnosed with Autism to the point that she tried to committ suicide.  The article ended with the fact that the child turned out to be a genius.  What was the point of this article?  To say thank God it wasn't true?  What about those parents out there who have an autistic child, how does this article make them feel? The article was painful and insensitive.  There are better ways to spend you $10 than on Cookie</review_text>
I have to agree with those who didn't care for it. the only thing I liked was one article written by a Dad who was skateboarding with his son. It was witty, insightful and inspirational. the rest of the mag just seemed totally irrelevent to my life. It is aimed at people who dry-clean their childrens clothes. Does anyone do that? I don't want my kids to be that concerned with clothes and money. the few issues I read made me mad and depressed. I've never written a review before but felt compelled to do so regarding this lame magazine. Give me break with that $400 cashmere hoodie for my son! my son likes his vilified character t-shirts and that is what matters. He is not a reflection of my style, he is a reflection of his own. Get over yourselves</review_text>
I was going to buy this and then stumbled on it in the doctor's office. I love InStyle, Lucky and other shopping mags, but the tone of this is mean and snooty. There are too many ads, and very little content. There's a Q&A section about sex after baby that's just mean, threatening that if you don't jump back in, "one of you will start sleeping with the girl in marketing..." Way to put an anti-feminist tone on sex after baby. Yuck.</review_text>
This was kind of an impulse buy for me and I didn't get what I thought I would get. I thought it would be a clear and concise magazine on what is up and coming in TV and the Movies. Instead I got indepth ramblings on actors and directors. If you want to pick up a magazine and find out what is coming up without fluff and filler...this is not the mag for you.</review_text>
I suscribed to this magazine since I got a great offer on it from the company I get my other suscriptions from so I decided, why not??Its been a year and, although the previews of each week's prime-time programs are fun (2 pages worth) I was very dissapointed. The articles are empty, boring and some downright retarded; rehashing show's dialogues, requoteing newscomments - its a mistery to me how this magazine is still around.I realize this is an entertainment magazine, but still, the articles in People magazine seem like rocket science in comparison - gasp!!!Do yourself a favor and just buy a TV guide - MUCH more interestin</review_text>
I was one of Entertainment Weekly's charter subscribers way back in 1990. It started out great -- a different, intelligent and witty approach to entertainment coverage. But financially, things were shaky, so the magazine was dumbed down a bit to reach a wider audience. I couldn't blame the editors. It helped them reach the needed tipping point, and they gained their needed mass audience. EW remained better than any other publication with an entertainment focus, and I kept resubscribing.Until 2006. These last few months, EW has fallen off a cliff. It has become entirely superficial and shallow, with hardly any substance at all. The publication design has also been degraded into a teen magazine format. I can only imagine the editors have decided that anyone over 30 is no longer part of their target audience. So, I've let my subscription lapse -- reluctantly, mourning the enjoyable magazine that used to be</review_text>
This magazine is just page after page of Hollywood P.R. agencies releases. Unbelievable. Why didn't I think of it? I know all magazines look for editorial content from outside sources, but other than a few pages of VERY subjective movie/music/book reviews, this magazine just re-writes and prints Hollywood press release after Hollywood press release again and again and again. This magazine must not have a staff of writers, but must employ an army of copy editors manning a warehouse of dedicated fax machines or e-mail inboxes. The funniest thing about this magazine is how the first few pages may be dedicated to a typically obsequious press release provided by, say, Tom Cruise's management company/major film studio/hired PR flak fawning over Cruise or his newest movie - and then you turn to the movie review section where some clever, sassy, wanna-be hipster movie reviewer proceeds to tell you that the movie absolutely sucks. Uh, okay - wait, didn't you get the press release? If you Tivo EXTRA and have the theme to Entertainment Tonight as your ringtone, this magazine is right up your alley. Otherwise, don't waste a penny on this nonsense.</review_text>
I have subscribed to this magazine for almost a year now and I have become very skeptical of much of its advice.  This advice seems to be heavily influenced by its paying advertisers e.g. the US Dairy Industry (there is always at least one of those annoying "got milk" ads) and not surprisingly, every issue there are several articles in the magazine that hype the supposed benefits of a diet high in dairy products (e.g. milk and cheese).  However having read many books on nutrition, it has become very clear to me that that the majority of current research shows that a diet high in dairy products can actually be very damaging to your health - for instance read the The China Study by Colin Campbell, an extremely comprehensive nutritional study that sheds a great deal of light on the US dairy industry and its shady methods of influencing the public's perception of the healthfulness of its products.  It is well known that there are many better ways of getting calcium etc into your diet than by dairy but this magazine is unfortunately blinded by its advertisers' paychecks.  The magazine also appears to be very similar to Prevention magazine which I also have subscribed to and I would make the same criticism of.  My advice is to stick to reliable sources on health like the excellent "Berkeley Wellness Letter" that are not supported or influenced by the advertisements of drugs companies or powerful industry groups like the US Dairy Industry</review_text>
I received two free trial issues in order to give the magazine a chance before subscribing. Boy, am I glad I didn't subscribe! The magazine is nothing but fluff - good only for people who mostly want to flip through and look at pictures - not for people who actually want informed articles and reports on health.</review_text>
I have been a reader of BusinessWeek for over 10 years.  I have noticed that it has had a significant change in focus over the last year.  While there are more articles on "Personal Business", the hard-core articles have gone the way of Newsweek, and U.S. News and World reports.  The nature of the articles are lightweight and do not reflect issues important to decision makers today.Like many others, I have noticed a political slant or agenda over the last year.  Specifically, their commentaries and economic analysis trend to the left.  Bob Kuttner is co-editor of the American Prospect and contributor to the Boston Globe.  Every one of his articles begins with the premise that the President's policies are bad and then is followed by a tortuous rational for that thesis, to include discussion of the days of gold backed currency.Andrea D'Andrea Tyson is better, but as a former Clinton advisor, is not objective in her analysis.  Alternative economic opinions are far and few between and what opinions they do tout, does not agree with the numbers stated in their own Figures of the Week.While BW has the potential for great reporting based on their resources, they have let their editorial priorities get in the way of serious business reporting.  For serious Business readers and students, I recommend going to alternative sources.And yes, I will let my subscription lapse this year.</review_text>
i was gonna make a point, but fabz made it for me  i was gonna say that nowadays an cd is considered tight just because it has a couple of hit singles  and Yayo's hit singles werent really hits  his songs were on the radio & tv for probably about a month or two  if thats what you call a hit then you crazy  the fact is it takes more than 4 good songs to make a good cd  he said that there were 4 hot songs on the album but failed to mention that there are 17 SONGS on the cd   a couple of good songs dont make it good cd  you want to see what other people think of the Yayo album read the reviews for it  and jeezy  please  he always been garbag</review_text>
!!!!!!!!!!DONT BUY!!!!NUFF SAI</review_text>
frst of all i kno nothin bout this magazine but wen i came across readin this kids review sayin tat yayos nd jeezys cd were garbage forced me to write a review...frst of all yayos cd has at least 4 hits on it..- So Seductive- Eastside Westside- Pimpin- Curious- I Know You Don't Love Me- Live By the GunAnd for Jeezy's album i admit there wasnt as many hits if any but the cd was one of the best albums tat came out this year w/ a new flow of southern rap and a lot of good songs....Trapstar..My Hood..Bang Ft T.I....Thug Motivation....And Then What...all good songs...im not sayin Jeezy is one of the best rappers or at the top not close..but if he comes up w/ a new album better than Thug Motivation 101 he will be up thea cuz of his new flow of souther rap and high energ</review_text>
This magazine fell apart so quick. They are no longer a unbias magazine. Instead they are a Interscope propaganda machine. Just look at the covers? Every year Shady/G-Unit gets a automatic 8 covers. Every album from that camp gets automatic XXL and XL ratings. Even the horrible Tony Yayo album got a XL maybe the most disgraful rating I've ever seen in hip hop. As a hip hop reader I can never take anything they write serious because they are tainted and corrupt. I suggest you search else where if you want a good hip hop mag</review_text>
I was a subscriber to the New Republic for several years, but in the waning years of the Clinton administration and the beginnings of the Bush II administration, the paper seemed to take a real rightward turn.  Now, I have no problem with so-called liberal hawks, but the magazine's slavish support for the war in Iraq in the face of questionable evidence did it for me.  In addition, the magazine spends more time bashing Democrats for not aligning themselves with the magazine's professed centrist/liberal slant than it does with presenting true progressives ideals that create thoughtful discourse among its readers.  The magazine has forgotten its roots of progressive intellectualism and dissent in favor of safe, "New Democrat" rhetoric.  There are better magazines our there</review_text>
My subscription was for a year. But the subscription office stopped sending the magazines even before the subscription expired. I would suggest people subscribe to Good Housekeeping directly instead</review_text>
Good Housekeeping does not send a notice to the person receiving the subscription in a timly manner. It shouldn't take 2 to 3 weeks to receive notification</review_text>
My Dad bought this magazine for my mom and I usually pick up the copies to browse them.  That is all both my mom in her fifties and I in my twenties do browse it as it is a joke.  It is not that special it is chucked full of ads.  The cover stories are dull and boring and many of the articles you would want to read have about one paragraph good information.  I find this magazine a waste of our money.  It will not be getting renewed at the end of the subscription.  My mom has already stated that.</review_text>
The magazine is great!The problem is, I am not receiving them. I ordered a subscription in January and have received 3 issues only!!!All my other orders with amazon have been received, I have no idea what is happening with my magazine subscription. I wrote to amazon to ask if there was a way of tracking my order but haven't gotten a response</review_text>
Even if you're a "conservative," you gotta admit that this is one of the worst magazines around. If you like good writing, don't even try this one. A "one star" is still too generous in my opinion.</review_text>
Oh those were the days, when I was in college, reading my first issues and then subscribing.  There were great things to be found in its pages, columns by Brian Crozier, Russell Kirk, Erik von Kuenhelt-Leddhin (sp?).  The great struggle with the Soviet Union was going into a critical stage.  It seemed NR was so on the right track.  And it was wonderful to read, at least from about 1979 to 1983.But then it became for a while duller.  It had some periods of recrudescence, such as under the editorship of John O'Sullivan.  But when Rich Lowry took over NR really began to dumb down (nothing personal Mr. Lowry).But what I've really discovered of late is how badly the neo-con agenda has sort have taken over the magazine.  We've got in the 50th Anniversary issue a call by Midge Dector to rally the country to our illegal and immoral war in Iraq.  Really something has happened to the magazine, a sinister force has entrenched itself there.  What is that force?  Well, go to come-and-hear.com and you will begin to learn part of the picture, especially when you read the material by Elizabeth Dilling.  I would also recommend Paul Findley's THEY DARE TO SPEAK OUT, which details the Israeli Lobby's domination of our Congress.NR was once a courageous conservative magazine, but now it has been heavily tainted by the influence of a terrible thing. WFB should know better, and maybe he does.  If he doesn't, then he should pick up NEO-CONNED! and NEO-CONNED AGAIN!, and then he should listen to Tony Martin's talk given to the IHR on a certain group's tactics deployed to suppress free speech.What has inspired me to write this review is WFB's recent column on the incarceration of David Irving.  It ends in a disgusting gloating.  WFB has fallen into an evil trap, and so has the magazine he used to run.  What has happened to the Christian faith of people like Buckley?  He now seems lost and terribly afraid of offending that supposedly saintly interest group...And you, Mr. Lowry, come on now: read widely and deeply and don't be afraid of reading the Talmud and about the Israeli lobby.  Once you do, maybe you'll develop the strength to think outside the box.  We're going to have to do that if we want anything but the bleakest future for mankind and the planet.</review_text>
If you want to keep yourself in delusions and in the dark about what's really going on in the world, read this magazine. National Review is for people who sympathize with Christian jihadists and white supremacists. Wouldn't want to be in that camp if I were you.  Read Time, Mother Jones, The Nation, or the American Prospect instead.</review_text>
I got this magazine as a gift, starting a few months back.  I really can't say I'm impressed.Admittedly, I'm much more left leaning than this conservative (sometimes very, very conservative) magazine.  Dispite my bias, I can still recognize good writing and well made points - this magazine generally lacks both.  This isn't to say that I've never seen a good point or anything, they're just fairly rare.  If you want to read a well-written, well-argued, conservative mag this isn't it</review_text>
When I first heard there was an American version of L'Uomo Vouge I was really excited.  I thought "finally an American men's fashion magazine that'll be edgy, risky, creative & original!"  I couldn't have been more wrong.  This magazine is virtually indistinguishable from lackluster Men's magazines GQ, Esquire & Details.  European men's fashion magazines are works of art with cutting edge photography, bold reporting & beautiful advertising.  You won't find any of this in Men's Vouge.  The editors of this magazine have greatly insulted the intelligence of American readers.  If I could I'd give this magazine a negative 5</review_text>
If you are looking for actual good workouts look to Oxygen or Womens M&F</review_text>
I haven't received this item.  It has been almost two months</review_text>
Self what? The entire magazine now pushes product on every inch of every page. Their product placements went from "convenient and subtle" to obviously pandering to their revenue sources. Plus the stories and tips are so far out of reality that anyone over 25 with half of a brain couldn't relate. I once enjoyed Self and their monthly self-help plans. Their core message has gotten lost in the sea of product pushing</review_text>
I've subscribed to Self on-and-off for about 15 years, but have recently been feeling like I've outgrown the magazine. The articles seem to focus on issues facing single women who are just starting their careers.  Fine, but not for me anymore!  Also, their subscription department is terrible!  My most recent subscription has been plagued with missed issues, double issues and late issues -- and a customer service department that can't quite pull themselves together.</review_text>
Recently renewed my subscription after a three year hiatus and I couldn't believe my eyes.  The magazine is a skeleton of its former self, with slim stories and little science.  Bob Guccione Jr's mag is not even that fun to read.  On the happier side, the magazine appears to shun its earlier environmental preoccupations</review_text>
I used to enjoyed Discover, but the past several months of their radicals changes, got me to think a real dumbing down.Once in awhile, they would put together a good article - but not constantly.How can we enlighten ourselves and improve our intelligence on science etc in the world stage.There are still many of us that do not want to be glued to the computer for science as we would for the tv.Discover's editorial staff ought to get their magazine back on track or the circulation and subscriber base is going to go down the tube. Thank goodness Scientific American, Astronomy, Sky and Telescope, Science News havent fallen down.I am not renewing my subscription unless Discover 'rediscovers' itself.How dumb Americans are!</review_text>
I thought I detected some deterioration in the quality of Discover Magazine in recent months, so I went to the web to see if anyone else had the same notion. Indeed they have. Sad.</review_text>
For years Discover was the best magazine for the lay person or even scientists who wanted to keep track of the trends in other fields of science. Now with a new publisher it has become almost worthless. Very superficial articles are mixed with over blown headlines and poor science. After buying Discover since it's very inception I find it sad what has happened to this magazine. Check the dates and notice the glowing reviews for the old magazine but pay attention to the negative ones from the last 6 months</review_text>
I am also a longtime subscriber, and I am quite outraged at the new changes that have been made with the magazine. I have written a letter to the editor containing my list of grievances, if you will (I would hope they would be redressed but they will probably ignore me). Anyway, please read:I am a current subscriber, and was quite suprised by Discover's new look (to all reading this review on Amazon.com: Amazon.com does NOT display the updated version of what Discover currently looks like). I didn't quite care for it, but as long as the material stayed the same I was going to be allright with it. Unfortunately, the articles in Discover have degenerated into "Top 20 things you didn't know about..." lists, piles of trivia, some sexual humor and editorializing on recent news. Sure, reading about gay astronauts may be a little humorous. Is it appropriate for what Discover stood for or what I have expected from this magazine? I would disagree. Occasionally there is an intelligent article. The cover story still seems up to par with the stories from the Old Discover. I really did once enjoy this magazine and it was the most expected item to arrive in my mailbox. I've kept all my copies from the last five years in the best condition I possibly could because I truly did enjoy reading them, and still do. Maybe this new Discover is for a "new generation" or meant to lure in younger or less mature readers, but I think the change in articles has taken a turn for the worse. I think the ordinary person, the "lay man" if you will, would appreciate at least intelligent articles about new, interesting and groundbreaking discoveries in the scientific community. I remember the String Theory article (I forget which issue exactly) as one of the most well-written articles on that topic.It was very exciting, and most importantly it [i]got me interested in the science[/i]. I doubt I will ever see anything that good from Discover magazine again. I'd really hate to give up on this magazine: all I ask is for the old Discover back.</review_text>
I have subscribed to Discover magazine for years but have recently cancelled my subscription.  The magazine, which once served up well written news of present and future science has become a hack rag.  From juvenile sexual humor and associated photos couched under the guise of science to supposed factual articles that seem ripped from my local papers Op-Ed page, the whole magazine has degraded into a worthless pile of trash</review_text>
I know APR is supposed to be one of the better poetry magazines out there, and I think it has one of the highest circulations of any poetry magazine, but it's more of the National Enquirer of poetry magazines. It's a large, newspaper-style format that contains mostly bad poetry and dull articles. You'd be better off subscribing to Poetry, The Hudson Review, The Texas Review, Tar River Poetry, or any number of other journals</review_text>
Can't give a review on Maximum PC.  Never received the magazine.  Instead I was sent the men's magazine FHM.  Please send my Maximum PC</review_text>
I subscribed in late May to MaximumPC and PCGamer. Early July I started getting PCGamer.  Still nothing from MaximumPC.  I called customer service and they said they had recieved my order June 2nd and to expect my first issue in late September. Thats nearly four months! That is an unreasonable wait relative to the industry standard and clearly outside the stated wait on the order form. I gave one star because the magazine is a good magazine. But at a $8.99 news stand price it is too expensive... so I am left with the choice of spending almost $35 to get the four months worth before my subscription starts (more than the subscription itself) or just missing out on those issue.  Very poor customer service.</review_text>
The magazines ordered through amazon take an ETERNITY to be delivered.  The estimated time for my delivery was April after I had placed the order in Feb.  That's a long enough wait as it is---I ended up receiving it the the end of June!  And when I called to complain...the customer service rep explained to me that it was technically within the estimated allowed time for delivery.  so bottom line...if you have an urge to order a magazine that may take half a year or so to get to you...then this is the ONE FOR YOU-hands down.  I plan on never ordering a single magazine through Amazon again.  Definitely don't send a subscription to anyone as a birthday gift- it'll maybe make it in time for the FOLLOWING birthday year..so plan years in advance</review_text>
This mag is for people who think they are computer experts because they can change out a video card or follow directions on changing an OS setting.Shallow coverage, and some of the lamest humor you will ever come across.It is nothing more then a rehash of what is freely and easily available on the internet. There is nothing original in this mag, ever. Also it tends to copy and paste much of the issue from 12 months earlier. All the main articles are nearly the same every 12 months. Don't believe me? Take two magazines that are 12 months apart and compare them.The reviews are also weak. nearly every month you will see: THE FASTEST SYSTEM WE EVER TESTED!!!!! YAAAAAWWWWWWNNNNN. Who cares? Anyone who knows even the slightest about computers knows that speed is not the most important attribute, even for gamers. Besides, does it really matter that system y is .00005% faster on their poor testing system then computer z?The second star is for Mr Halfhills column. It is the only part that is consistantly interesting and the only person there with real technical know-how.Read toms hardware and whatever tech news you want, learn how to use search engines, and skip this pointless mag</review_text>
I was so excited to receive my first issue of Art In America, and I was severly disappointed to see that it is mostly full-page ads for galleries in Europe.  There are very few articles or artist Bios.  The photos are beautiful, but don't get this if you were hoping to learn anything about American artists or galleries</review_text>
Haven't received this item.  It has been almost 2 months</review_text>
I was told this magazine was good to look at for design ideas. It isn't really, and there isn't really that much to this magazine.  It is just another tired old AOLTimeWarner publication, just like Time, People, or Teen People.  I looked at the August and September issues and the only things in those two that impressed me were the features on Elton John's Out of Africa fundraiser and the article on Julian McMahon.  The rest of it was ads, and not the classy type ads that make the advertising tolerable in Vogue magazine, but the same old ads you'll see anywhere else, and they are annoying.  There were several nonsense fashion articles with the likes of Kelly Ripa (post excessive Photoshop airbrushing tools-one of my professors would call it "plastic person syndrome") Mark Consuelos, waay too much on Jennifer Garner and her baby, and other weird things, such as the trend of designer cupcakes.  I wish I was kidding on the latter, but I am not, nor do I have $25 to spend on a glorified cupcake just because it is Jessica Alba's favorite.  There was entirely too much dress/act/eat/shop/play this way because the stars do it that way in here.  Despite the size of this magazine, there is very little to sink ones teeth into, just way too many photos of the same old same old, and tips for mimicking them.  I am NOT interested in becoming a Teri Hatcher clone, nor am I interested in seeing Vanessa Carlton's pad.  This magazine is for you if you like excessive ads, no diversity, a subscription that is actually not a year (it says that special issues count as regular issues in the magazine) and your life's ambition is to try a cupcake from a bakery in New York because some celebrity did.  This magazine is mediocre at best, and the worst part is, it has the exact same fashion advice as Vogue.  I went with Vogue because there is substance in their magazine, and the ads are classy and very chic.  Leave this one behind-it looks to me like another brain fluff read from the folks at AOL Time Warner.</review_text>
Amazon must think we are fools. It's $4 cheaper directly from Stewart's website.On the other hand, there appear to be a lot of fools here</review_text>
I was ecstatic when I received this magazine subscription as as gift. Two issues into my subscription it stopped. I was really anticipating the December issue because I had many guests coming and could use some of Martha's helpful advice, however it never came and neither did January or February. I have called Martha Stewart Living magazine twice and while they are very nice and apologetic, I still have not received another issue. When I asked to cancel for a refund I was given a phone number with an automated system that uses a credit card account look up - being that it was a gift this is useless. Very clever for Martha and very frustrating for the giftee/consumer</review_text>
The amazon ad said next day shipping. Took over a month for the first magazine to arrive.DO NOT BUY THIS FROM AMAZO</review_text>
I read rolling stone for the music and those who make it, not for some guilt ridden, agenda blasting editorial team that feels their politics (and guilt at being so much the establishment they wish they could hate) is something we should all read about at nauseum. when they stick to music, it's good, when they parade their shreiking political views, it's boring.</review_text>
Anyone with a good taste in music will hate this magazine, as it only rates bad bands from bad genres good reviews and whatever good bands are listed, are often given bad reviews.  Its all pretentious pop-culture drivel for the conformist, weak-willed mainstream American.The worst part of Rolling Stone is the 100 Greatest Guitarists of All time list; as they highly rate Kirk Hammett, Kurt Cobain, and Tom Morello (all extremely overrated guitarists) while rating Eddie Van Halen at a very lowly #70 and not even mentioning these awesome guitarists; Kerry King/Jeff Hanneman (Slayer), John Petrucci (Dream Theater), Trey Azagthoth/Erik Rutan (Morbid Angel), Jeff Loomis (Nevermore), Steve Vai, and Joe Satriani.  If you know anything about good guitarists, those eight guitarists I just mentioned DESTROY Kirk, Kurt, and Tom.Don't read this if you're trying to decide what good music is, YOU decide what good music is.  Think for yourself, don't let MTV and Rolling Stone think for you</review_text>
More and more, all the industry wants to do is tell you what it is you are supposed to like, and ridicule anything we might consider to be a guilty pleasure, and if you indulge in such a thing, you are 'shallow'.Music has evolved past this attitude, and no one believes in this naked emperor anymore. And oh yeah, their politics is so mixed up, they don't even know what they believe anymore. I was a subscriber for eleven years, my renewal notice came, and I couldn't come up with one good reason to send it in</review_text>
I have been a subscriber for 15 years and still enjoy the magazine.  No, its not the best magazine for music, but it is one of the best for for general pop culture news and I still occassionally find new artists because of the magazine, though I tend to find more new movies now.However, if you ever have a problem with customer service, forget it.  I never got my copy of the 1,000 issue, and when I asked for a replacement, I was told they were out of that issue, but would extend my subscription by one issue.  I pointed out that it was a double issue AND that they are still selling back issues on their web site for $20.  If they don't resolve it quick, I might just cancel my subscription, I'm so disgusted.</review_text>
Oh Lord!! Does anyone still read this?? I was a subscriber back in the early 70's,when it was a folded up, newspaper.By and large, Jann Wenner let people run it, that knew how to. It is now, and has been nothing more than an Ad choked,gossiping Teen slick.Right, like they are the ones with the money!! I wonder what they still pay Raoul Duke, to do??!! Ralph Gleason has to be turning over in the grave</review_text>
This used to be a pretty decent music magazine.  Not the best that was out there, but still decent.  However, Rolling Stone has taken a huge nose-dive in the past ten or so years.  I'm not sure I'd even really call it a music magazine anymore.  It's more a pop-culture magazine that panders to teeny-boppers.  A music magazine's main focus should be music, but RS has over the years started including more and more articles on TV shows, movies, politics, etc and less and less on music...especially less and less on good music.  If you want a magazine on pop-culture go with Entertainment Weekly.  It, at least, has a bit of taste here and there and doesn't spout off about politics.  If I want politics, I'll read the newspaper or watch CNN.  I don't buy music magazines for politics.  I buy them for music.  If you want a good music magazine, this isn't the place to look anymore.</review_text>
Our library has just finished its magazine usage count, and to my surprise the American Spectator came dribbling in with only a couple of hits, measured by current copies left on the table and check outs of older issues. And yet our patronage here is very conservative. Perhaps people who once read this sort of thing no longer read at all, or maybe, as a couple of reviewers suggested, with Bill Clinton out of office, it no longer has the same appeal.You can change my rating to five stars if you like, for the sake of ideology, but you still won't read the thing. Just like I don't read the Nation anymore</review_text>
The recipes included are good, but this is not a "cooking" magazine. This is a women's fitness magazine in disguise. While I am all for a magazine that focuses on overall health and fitness, it shouldn't advertise itself as a cooking magazine. There is way too much other junk. If I wanted a makeover or an exercise routine, I don't expect to go to my cooking magazine to get that.</review_text>
I wanted more recipes and this magazine has too much other junk in it.  Will not renew, not what I wanted</review_text>
I ordered this magazine without really knowing anything about it.  I was very disappointed.  Not enough recipes.  The recipes that are included are not really ones that I would use.</review_text>
This is my favorite magazine in the universe and the only one to which I have ever subscribed. However, after this, my second subscription is over, I plan to call it quits. The magazine never gets delivered unless I send several angry e-mails every month reminding them and demanding delivery. When the issues come they are often 2-3 months behind. The current issue is over three weeks late and who knows when and if I will ever see it. In the end, although this is a brilliant publication, it simply isn't worth the headache. Photo, if you're out there, please forward me the June issue.... and while you're at it get a head start on July and August and maybe they'll make it on time</review_text>
Hi, I am writing this review in an attempt to help you save $10. This magazine is an embarrassment in every angle. It is full of pictures of "sexy" boys/men dressed in cloths no guy with self esteem would ever wear. And pictures is all there is, for you that think there will be something interesting to read, read this: THERE IS NOTHING IN THIS MAGAZINE TO READ!!! The latest issue contains of 48 (forty-eight) pages before you get to this issues contents. The first "article" starts on page 126 (!) and is about "why a man would like to slice of his testicles"! Totally the magazine contains of 260 pages and there is text (letters that forms sentences) on about 40 of them. Besides this, the magazine also has a huge dilemma of being a gay magazine or not.Well I can go on and on but I won't. Unfortunately I have a subscription and I am going to see if I can get it canceled, I don't even need my money back. Take your $10 and run them in the disposal, it will be more fun to clean out the disposal than "read" this magazine</review_text>
Ordered 11/27 - Never received a single copy.  Not very fast is it?  SLOW COMPANY may be a better description.  Can I have my money back</review_text>
all you manager types.you know who you areyou read 'who moved the cheese' and jesus ceo,this is the mag for youlame, triteand oh so self importen</review_text>
The legend goes that there was a time a few decades ago when "The Gramophone" was the unquestioned authority for reviews of recordings of classical music.Whether or not that legend is true (I'm too young to know), Gramophone's time has definitely passed. Today there is a multitude of sources of free information on classical music on the internet, from newsgroups to websites. Some of it is less well-informed than Gramophone's criticism, but some of it is more well-informed. What is undeniable is that, for the price of a few mouse-clicks, it is possible to find a far greater range of reviews of recordings on the Internet than Gramophone (with its British-based critics) can offer.What is more, Gramophone is tied to a business-model for the classical music industry that is fast becoming obsolete. Historically, the most important classical recordings were issued by a few so-called "major" companies such as EMI, Deutsche Grammophon and CBS (later Sony). These "majors" would buy lavish advertising spreads in Gramophone and so finance the magazine. In return, Gramophone would devote lengthy reviews to the majors' new releases and would produce pages of fluffy interviews with musicians under contract to the majors.Today the situation is different. The most interesting new release is more likely to appear as a MP3 on an obscure Russian website than on a new CD from Sony. Small companies, dedicated solely to classical music recordings, produce great results on shoestring budgets while the "major" corporations have virtually abandoned new classical recordings.This development causes problems for Gramophone's business model. The new players in the classical music industry don't have the publicity budgets to fund a glossy magazine like Gramophone through advertising. With Gramophone's implicit bargain: "advertise with us or we won't review your recordings", the magazine seems to be becoming more and more irrelevant.If you want to subscribe to a classical music periodical, I recommend "International Record Review" or "Fanfare". Both offer substantially more reviews per month than Gramophone. But most of all, I suggest checking out the huge range of classical music information available for free on the web and usenet</review_text>
I bought the magazin on november, and I don't recive it yet</review_text>
As a member of a Southern family who treasured this magazine, it is with a heavy heart and a sense of loss that I have decided not to renew my subscription this year.  Yes, I've always given the brides in our family a subscription as a gift, and waited eagerly for my issue to come in the mail.  But those days are past.  Southern Living Magazine has been offered to all states for some time now, and I believe this has caused the editors to try to appeal to a broader readership.  This, in turn, has changed the recipe section into something one can find in any other magazine.  Honestly, I do love all sorts of different cuisines, but in a magazine called "Southern Living", I expect to find wonderful and traditional Southern recipes!  This magazine needs to go back to it's roots.  From now on, I'll be giving new brides a subscription to Southern Lady Magazine, and that's what I'll be reading myself!  I will miss the Christmas book, though.</review_text>
At one time, Southern Living was truly a source in our family for cooking ideas.  Over the past few years, it has become a collection of new things to do with canned and boxed food, in a sad attempt to re-arrange the same old thing for people who do not know how to cook.  Only the Christmas book seems to actually embrace cooking now.  We cannot speak to its information on gardening, just the cooking part.  If it were not my mother's habit of reading Southern Living, we would have cancelled this long ago.  If you are a serious cook, get the cookbooks from years ago.  The current magazine is well beneath you</review_text>
To be honest, I do pick up this Mag from the Newstand 4 to 5 times a year, but I can hardly call myself a fan. If you are looking for a solid computer or tech mag, Wired is not for you, It tries too hard to be hip and trendy, but it's group of Left/Lib Nerds too often come off as being lame and borish.  Wired needs to be "ReWired" to meet the needs of the modern tech community</review_text>
First off, I'm a huge geek.  I love programming and computers and the internet.  You'd think Wired would be like some great magazine for me.  But the whole thing is just so whiney and worried about all this "bad" stuff in the world, it makes you sick.  For every cool article about Japanese robots, you have to wade through like 10 articles about "how America is doomed".  Whatever...  they need to man up</review_text>
I was very disappointed with this magazine.  The tech reviews have absolutely no depth to them.  Most articles are rather pretentious and boring.  In the 5 issues I have received so far only the May 2006 issue had any thing interesting.  And it only had two articles which were worth it.  The first was "Robbed Blind" which was about RFID chips and the second article was "DIY ways to go green"</review_text>
Wired Magazine has proven to me something it had never even occurred to me to imagine: That there is a level of cynical, style-whoring, inaccurate, myopic snarkiness that goes beyond merely "trading substance for style." Wired is consistently behind the curve these days, but that doesn't stop the publication from spinning every article like a golden truth you were too lame to know. In articles about controversial subjects, one side is routinely saddled with straw man arguments that are so blatant and artless that I find them offensive even when I disagree with the parties who have been set up for a fall. Just as often, features which don't discuss a contentious topic still have an edge to them, making fun of a person, group, or idea in a way that isn't enlightening or even humorous, let alone warranted by the subject matter.Generally, Wired is as mean-spirited as it is self-congratulatory. This attitude appeals primarily to the demographic of tech wonks and IT industry tourists professionally and personally deflated by the bubble burst, desperately trying to assert their relevance and relive their high-flying, know-it-all glory. Any content is easily outweighed by the sheer volume of half-truths, shoddy reasoning, and straight-up falsehoods which could easily be revealed and corrected by a casual investigation of the subjects treated in pages choked between high gloss, Yuppie/GenXer-targeted corporate mind-poison (advertising).Isn't the world of technology interesting and magical enough without mixing the spin, double-talk, and factual misrepresentation of a presidential debate with the impotent, absurd bravado of Battle Bot pre-match trash talk? People know little enough about how tech rules the world and how it can, quite plausibly, save it. This magazine could evangelize for technology's promise and educate about its current and future potential. Instead it concentrates on one-shots written in a style that passes for "hip" that forwards an attitude rather than a message, with an emphasis on sensationalism over accuracy, having more in common with advertising than edification</review_text>
I am a low income disabled person and require copious amounts of bathroom reading material, 'Wired' is even too tedious to fill that need. Its sponsors tend to run the lengthy ads reminiscent of old picture filled National Geographics of questionable scientific value. On the other hand the articles, for example in the latest issue, 'Are Higher Gas Prices Good for Us'(paraphrase of title) offer little information and if I had time to do the research this one is particularly like a sheaf of 1970 Nixon press releases in conjunction with the announced Operation Independance. The intention at the time was to free the U.S. from dependance on foriegn oil.Oh we of short memory, condemned to sacrifice our sons and now daughters!Of interest may be the dumb means by which I obtained an unending subscription to this and some other almost as pointless magazines, Playstation Magazine - now X Box Magazine, the completely amoral Men's Health, Garden Club, Cooking. I simply check the highest income level on every form I fill out on the internet and everything else short of a tax form or loan application.Typical of something recieved for nothing  Wired  is not a publication for which I would recommend laying  out any money or time. Including bathroom time.</review_text>
I AM STILL NOT RECEIVING THIS MAGAZINE.  AND I HAD A GIFT SUBSCRIPTION ON THAT ORDER, TOO.  I'VE BEEN MEANING TO GET IN TOUCH.  THOUGHT IT HAD BEEN MORE THAN LONG ENOUGH FOR SUBSCRIPTION TO START</review_text>
Regardless of the quality of the magazine, it is really annoying to see Oprah on every single cover! and to make it worst, she does not pick "regular Oprah shots", instead you look at every issue's front cover and ask yourself "How did they take that picture? She doesn't even look like her!" It's as if Oprah is telling all of us "See how I can look like?" Every month is just a new testimony from Oprah, that money does do wonders.On the top of that, Oprah's personal thoughts, things, favorites, ideas, even more pictures are all over the few pages that are not advertisement.I still gave it 2 stars because from time to time you can find a good article, but the bottom line is the question: Is this a magazine or a show off ?</review_text>
I am sure this will be a great magazine, but I have not received my first issue yet</review_text>
I can not review something that i have not received.  I thought I would have received my first issue by now but have not.If and when i receive the magazien i order i will be happy to review</review_text>
I have yet to see a PW review of anything that was not vetted by the PC Police, not to mention utterly stupid. When they want to pan a book, they apparently have a list of criticisms they pick from at random, such as "non sequitur" or "murky argument" or "reductionist". They pick them by throwing darts at the list and writing down whatever phrases the darts hit, in ways that prove that they don't actually have any understanding of what the terms mean. It's especially annoying because even when it's a book I like, I can easily see criticisms that someone with a different worldview could make that would be valid, but they don't make them; that would require work.The reviews are so shoddy and wildly inaccurate that I thought about asking Amazon.com to stop using them for the product info pages, but then it occurred to me that any book PW pans is guaranteed to be good, so they are useful in a backwards way. Anytime PW praises a book, I don't bother with it, but if they attack it, I know it's going to be great</review_text>
Order placed early June. First issue of subscription not yet received. This is service</review_text>
I cancelled my subscription to this magazine 6 months ago with a letter to the editor stating that I loved to see nude woman, but subscribed to learn from the masters about photography.  I cannot tell you how disappointed I was when I resubscribed after not taking the magazine for years... it used to be a wonderful magazine chock full of insightful articles, lighting techniques, studio setup diagrams, lots of great stuff... I subscribed to a 2 year deal through an online subscriber and asked them to quit sending it after only 6 months and to keep the money.Not worth the paper it is printed on- period.  Apeture I hear is pretty good, and I also hear Popular Photography has gotten much better and now only 95% about advertising and product reviews and at least 5% helpful tips and tricks..</review_text>
American Photo began as a magazine devoted more to photography than to gear, as an alternative to the gear obsessed magazines like Pop Photo and Photographic. It has evolved into a magazine that divides its pages between equipment obsession and cheesy &quot;glamour&quot; photography that tries for art and delivers soft core porn. No stars</review_text>
I ordered this magazine as a gift for my brother almost 5 months ago and he still has not received an issue. I cannot get a straight answer from anyone about what is happening and I have not even been able to get my money back.  I would not recommend anyone wasting their money with this magazine unless they can find a legitimate web site to get it from.Kerr</review_text>
CT is quick to call the collection agency.  They require written &quot;opt-out&quot; notification from the subscriber that the subscription is to be terminated.  Beware, these guys are a credit risk.  Too much trouble for what is otherwise a good magazine</review_text>
Ordered my wife a subscription last christmas.Recieved 2 issues, never got the rest of them.I'll never order magazines through Amazon again.</review_text>
About two years ago, Vanity Fair was not only the best magazine of the year, but maybe all time.  I would read it from cover to cover.Now, sadly, it is a bunch of fluff.  The quality has really gone downhill.  I am going to let my subscription run out.  I really miss the old days</review_text>
I'd always heard about interesting articles in this magazine. But the mess of ads and People magazine gossip that lands (with a big, heavy thud) on my doorstep every month is the most worthless magazine I've ever made the mistake of purchasing. It's pretentious tripe aimed at a small group of NYC media insiders, self-regarding movie celebs, and those people who'd like to be part of that world. Even when they occasionally hit on a compelling subject, the writers are so narcissistic as to be truly repellent. It'd be more accurate simply to cut "Fair" out of the title</review_text>
A self absorbed mag that likes to pat itself on the back for feeling pity for the lower 'folks.' They named Cindy Sheehan in their January 2006 Best of the Best issue for 'best stand!' They are so diluded they think that 'nut'is making an honorable stand-only by using her son's honorable death to serve her ego! Secondly, open the edition Tom Ford and you will be discusted with his self-gloating, and sexist photography of women. I don't mind nude pictures, but he only uses women-like sex objects. Reese Witherspoon (highest paid actress in Hollywood) is showed holding a doll by it's arm with an empty stare into the lens.the men are portrayed in sexual positions with the women, and the African actors portrayed are dressed in animal skins!Revolting</review_text>
I TRASHED THE ISSUE WHEN I SAW THE SHOT OF TRASHY PARIS HILTON.  THERE IS ENOUGH NUDITY ALREADY IN YOUR PUBLICATION AND SEEING THAT SAD PIECE OF WORK (HER) ON THE COVER JUST TURNED ME OFF COMPLETELY.  SORRY YOU THOUGHT HER 'COVER WORTHY'.  PROBABLY MISSED SOME FINE ARTICLES.  SINCERELY: DEANE EVERETT</review_text>
I am completely frustrated and upset with the delivery, or lack thereof, of the magazine subscription I received as a gift of Romantic Homes.  This is my absolute favorite magazine and my husband purchased a year's subcription for me from Amazon.com for Christmas 2005!  I still haven't received ONE magazine (it's now July 2006).  Amazon assured me three times, over the past year, it was coming, it's now July and I still haven't received the magazine.  I am so disappointed at the lack of customer service.  I urge you to NEVER buy a magazine subscription from Amazon.com.  This has been a horrible experience and I cannot believe that it has somehow become okay to run a business in this matter.  I am tired of empty promises from Amazon.com while I am anxiously awaiting my magazine.  Not only have I not received my magazine, the "people" at Amazon have NEVER offered a refund, a renewed subscription, ANYTHING!  I realize it's a measly twenty-something dollars, but this business practice is horrible!  I am also tired of speaking to people that do not speak English and are trying to help me.  Please do better Amazon, this is terrible!  Shame on you!</review_text>
I bought into a subscription of this magazine sight unseen.  That was a bad decision.  After having received two issues, I continue to be disappointed.  The quality of the art & design, and products displayed overall are dreadfully amateurish and in most cases incredibly tacky. I would be hard pressed to think that anyone in pursuit of help with romanticing their home would be inspired by this magazine.</review_text>
I've had this magazine for the past year and have used several of the tips, activities, posters, etc.  However, I have also gotten endless emails from Mailbox promoting products and asking me to renew way in advance.  This continues though I asked them to stop.  For the last three or four weeks, they've been calling me on the telephone every day.  This continues though I asked them to stop.  The few good ideas in each $6 issue are nowhere near worth the trouble of dealing with this harassment</review_text>
I haven't received this product yet and I'm pretty upset about it.I've requested that someone contact me about this problem and I haven't been given an answer.  I think I'm deserving of some sort of discount or at least an answer.Where is the product I bought???</review_text>
I echo the same gripe that other reviewers have voiced here: The magazine covers the same handful of people week after week after boring week.  How many times is a reader going to see no talents such as Jessica Simpson, Lindsay Lohan, the Tom Cruise-Katie Holmes joke, and THE most overrated, overhyped people of all time Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie on the cover and not get tired of it?It's nice to know what's going on with certain celebrities once in a while but every single week?  Can you say "overkill?"I'm glad I never got a subscription to this magazine.  I picked it up every once in a while on the newsstand but stopped because I was so sick and tired of reading about overrated, overhyped and glorified B-movie "actors" and "actresses" who were lucky to be in one successful movie and haven't done anything of value since.I picked up a copy today and have sworn it off forever.  Don't waste your time or your money. - Donna Di Giacom</review_text>
People magazine is one of the worst expressions of American life.  Instead of makiing our own lives more meaningful and exciting - which is possible - People encourages us to oogle and fixate over people who are essentially images, people we will never meet, and in many cases people who have very little going for them. Does anyone really think that Britney Spears has anything to say about anything, or that Paris Hilton is barely  aware of her own existence?  Does it ever make a whit of difference to your life how many times J.Lo is engaged (in order to get on the cover of another magazine) or who Demi Moore is grinding with today or where Gweyneth gets her gowns</review_text>
This was kind of an impulse buy for me and I didn't get what I thought I would get. I thought it would be a clear and concise magazine on what is up and coming in TV and the Movies. Instead I got indepth ramblings on actors and directors. If you want to pick up a magazine and find out what is coming up without fluff and filler...this is not the mag for you.</review_text>
I suscribed to this magazine since I got a great offer on it from the company I get my other suscriptions from so I decided, why not??Its been a year and, although the previews of each week's prime-time programs are fun (2 pages worth) I was very dissapointed. The articles are empty, boring and some downright retarded; rehashing show's dialogues, requoteing newscomments - its a mistery to me how this magazine is still around.I realize this is an entertainment magazine, but still, the articles in People magazine seem like rocket science in comparison - gasp!!!Do yourself a favor and just buy a TV guide - MUCH more interestin</review_text>
I was one of Entertainment Weekly's charter subscribers way back in 1990. It started out great -- a different, intelligent and witty approach to entertainment coverage. But financially, things were shaky, so the magazine was dumbed down a bit to reach a wider audience. I couldn't blame the editors. It helped them reach the needed tipping point, and they gained their needed mass audience. EW remained better than any other publication with an entertainment focus, and I kept resubscribing.Until 2006. These last few months, EW has fallen off a cliff. It has become entirely superficial and shallow, with hardly any substance at all. The publication design has also been degraded into a teen magazine format. I can only imagine the editors have decided that anyone over 30 is no longer part of their target audience. So, I've let my subscription lapse -- reluctantly, mourning the enjoyable magazine that used to be</review_text>
This magazine is just page after page of Hollywood P.R. agencies releases. Unbelievable. Why didn't I think of it? I know all magazines look for editorial content from outside sources, but other than a few pages of VERY subjective movie/music/book reviews, this magazine just re-writes and prints Hollywood press release after Hollywood press release again and again and again. This magazine must not have a staff of writers, but must employ an army of copy editors manning a warehouse of dedicated fax machines or e-mail inboxes. The funniest thing about this magazine is how the first few pages may be dedicated to a typically obsequious press release provided by, say, Tom Cruise's management company/major film studio/hired PR flak fawning over Cruise or his newest movie - and then you turn to the movie review section where some clever, sassy, wanna-be hipster movie reviewer proceeds to tell you that the movie absolutely sucks. Uh, okay - wait, didn't you get the press release? If you Tivo EXTRA and have the theme to Entertainment Tonight as your ringtone, this magazine is right up your alley. Otherwise, don't waste a penny on this nonsense.</review_text>
This magazine shows the negative side of black men. I find the magazine an embarrasement to the African-American community. It seems out of all the races of men in the world, black men seem to want to display their lack of self control, their love of  fancy cars, overpriced clothes, which in no way helps create wealth in our communities. And I am also offended that this magazine rarely shows black women on the front cover. Until, black men understand that this kind of pathetic display of supposed masculinity is stopped, they will always be stopped by the police, be passed over for employment, and looked down upon. I wish someone would create a magazine for black men which shows the positive side of being a black man such as being leaders in their community, showing respect and love for their women, and showing that everything is not hip hip!</review_text>
I ordered the Journal about a year ago and received 2 issues, andnever received another issue.I contacted customer service about the problem, used the problemreport forms(or whatever it's called) and NEVER heard from them again.I get this email today telling me to renew my subscription...(after I had almost forgotten about the whole incident)What nerve!!!I remember when I bought this a year ago, another person had written areview warning people that she had not received her subscription.Back then I just thought this would never happen to me..(the same thing happened with Vogue magazine)Boy was I wrong.The 2 issues that I did receive were pretty good though.I buy tons of stuff from Amazon but I would highly recommend gettingthis from another vendor or ebay(they're usally cheaper too)</review_text>
Simply stated,if you want a politically correct magazine that panders to the socialistic academic minority, buy the mag. I'll pass and go online to the authors ignored and enjoy reading about the real new horizons</review_text>
This magazine might be good if you were wealthy enough not to have to work, had time to work out four hours a day, had your own chef, could go on vacation six months out of the year, or could afford (or cared) about fashion. Otherwise don't bother. They sometimes have a decent or interesting article but they are so few and far between it is not worth it</review_text>
The pages of Men's Journal used to be an escapist   weekend getaway in themselves. They brought you to extreme parts of the globe with a literary style that disappeared after 9/11. Since that time, MJ has concentrated on telling its readers who their heros should be, which might have been fine for one issue. This is a magazine badly in need of a new editor and old ideas</review_text>
I subscribed to this magazine in January for my husband.  It took 5 months to get the first magazine, then I never recieved another one</review_text>
Don't get me wrong, occasionally there are issues I still read cover to cover, but it seems as though MJ has gone through a change lately.  Gone is the focus of travel and fantastic adventure writing.  Now the focus seems to be health, fitness and diet.  I used to buy Men's Health magazine for those topics.  If I wanted that focus I would continue to buy MH.  There is no longer a consistent reason to read MJ on a regular basis anymore.  Man, I miss the old MJ</review_text>
Gee, I guess I really can't rate it.  I ordered it on August 9th, and still have not recieved it as of November 3rd.  Guess I'll know better then to order through Amazon again</review_text>
I've been a People subscriber for 2 years now & I quite agree with the majority of reviewers... Same Celebrities, different week. If it isn't Tomkat/kitten, it's Branjelina or Benifer 2. Oh, and we cannot forget "Mrs. Oops, I Did It Again" Spears-Federline. Very little on real people/human interest stories anymore, very little...As for the actual magazine, it seems I've become, through no choice of my own, one of People's Quality Control employees. After subscribing, I informed Customer Service of my allergy to their scented inserts. I was told a note would be made to my account and I would no longer receive inserts in my magazine. Here is where my job of QC employee came in, with my having to remove these inserts several times the first year, then again the second year in which I made another call to Customer Service. They apologized. Stated there was a note on my account regarding my request then they offered to extend my subscription for two more weeks.Next problem and part of my "new" job requirements... reassembling my magazine. I received at least 4 or 5 issues of People put together either backwards, upside down or with half of the magazine in the front & the other half flipped over in back. In order to read and enjoy these issues, I had to remove the staples, try and rearrange the pages & then line the pages up by the staple holes to reinsert the staples. Again I called Customer Service to complain. Again they apologized then offered to extend my subscription another 2 weeks.I've since written to cancel my subscription. I've not heard a word back from People Inc., regarding this. We'll see how it turns out</review_text>
I started ordering Glamour 2 months ago, and honestly it is a huge disappointment to me. There are so many ads in this magazine its unbelievable. Ladies, my advice is to save your money for a different magazine..I dont recommend Glamour at all.</review_text>
This publication has no business calling itself a "magazine"; published by San Diego book distributor American Marketing Servies, this is nothing more than a fluffy info-mercial for its clients and publishers they want to woo. Don't waste your money</review_text>
This publication has no business calling itself a "magazine"; published by San Diego book distributor American Marketing Servies, this is nothing more than a fluffy info-mercial for its clients and publishers they want to woo. Don't waste your money</review_text>
This magazine reads like an inflight magazine: something airlines, careful to not stir any scary adreneline rushes, put out to lull their readers to sleep. Not controversy here. No thought-provocation. Don't you wish someone out there would publish a really good magazine about books? One that featured meaty stories and well-written reviews? Well, alas, this one ain't it. It is dull and bland. Occasionally it offers up a conservative book review by neocon writer Catherine Seipp, who is about as enlightening as Bill O'Reilly (that is, entertaining and offensive and laughably stupid) so this can sometimes cut the dull. But someone here said bland and I agree. Avoid this one if you have an IQ above 90. Pick up The New Yorker, The Atlantic Monthly or Harper's if you like to read intelligent writing. Or, if you like romance novels, mysteries and other badly written pieces of fluff--which is all this magazine covers--this might just be the thing for you. I want my money back</review_text>
The reviewers in this magazine sometimes hit the mark and write with style and insight, but also there are many shallow and cheap shot reviews that are very anemic wanna-be's of true cultural wits like Mencken and Updike. Some of the reviewers suppositions sound as though they are grad student interns, and havent yet lived long in the field of writing to form seasoned viewpoints that are supportable. I'd pass on this superficial pop culture mag, and save your money to buy books that nourish you.</review_text>
I have enjoyed reading Family Fun Magazine, but unfortunately have only received 2 issues.  I have not received any further magazines and am completely disappointed in the service.  I will not order another magazine from Amazon because of this poor service.  I tried to get a refund and have only gotten the run around.</review_text>
I have not yet recieved this magazine, how could it be reviewed</review_text>
I subscribed to this magazine in August and just received the SEPTEMBER issue now! Budget Travel's Customer service is terrible, I've complained several times but am still missing the August, October and November issues, have asked for a refund but have yet to have my account credited</review_text>
This magazine used to be very thorough, and it used to be very good at providing me with TONS of deals and tips that I never would have found on my own. It was great, and very opinionated. But last year sometime, they changed the look of it and now there's a lot less text. It's much more a style magazine now, and that's not what I want in a travel magazine that I have bought to tell me about money saving! Worse, except for the 40 Best Vacation Bargains, which are still okay, most of the articles forget to incluce a lot of money-saving tips and instead they too often suggest I do expensive things. Since when is a $225 a night hotel considered budget?? The headlines and captions are expecially smart-aalecky.  It's not as good with the expert advice as it used to be! I noticed that Arthur Frommer isn't editing it anymore which maybe is why--bring him back! My search for a true money-saving travel magazine has unfortunately resumed again</review_text>
AWFUL!!!  This is just page after page after page of ads for grotesque jewelry - mostly gaudy watches and necklace sets - and clothing.  There were two "articles" at the very end of the magazine, and they were awful.  One, on Christmas in the English countryside, should have been beautiful.  Instead, it contained just a few pics and very little text.  What a disappointment.Don't waste your money.  First pick up a copy in the supermarket before you waste money on a subscription.  Once you see how really ridiculous this magazine full of nothing but ads really is, you won't waste your money on a subscription.</review_text>
This magazine just dares people to pick the most boring, pretentious, or ostentatious feature within any given issue. "Town & Country" is an extremely old money venture, and while it does have some good and useful articles (and lovely advertisements for things that virtually nobody can afford,) much of the magazine is essentially centered on a very elitist worldview that grows very tiresome rather quickly."Town & Country" was initially recommended to me because of ostensibly good coverage of travel and architecture, two areas I have great interest in. As an applicable aside, when I read a list of tips in the offshoot "Town & Country Travel" publication on ways to ease the stress of long range flights, I realized there was a reality check due when one of the first tips was to always fly in first class, ignoring the fact that the vast majority of readers would rather buy a car with what a typical first class ticket to Europe or Asia costs.As I mentioned, there are some good articles, and there are occasionally better and more useful offshoot publications like "Town & Country Travel" that are eminently more readable (although they still insist on advertising things like seven million dollar vacation homes on the coast, etc.) I will say that the photography is always good, and you can believe that if it appears here that it is the finest and most fashionable available: Hyacinth Bucket would, no doubt, like to be seen reading this magazine.Despite having occasionally worthwhile features, I find "Town & Country" to be excessively pompous, therefore I recommend finding another publication focused on whatever area of interest you have, whether it is fashion, society, or travel.</review_text>
I received this subscription as a trial, and found it one of the most boring publications that I have ever read.  By the last few issues that I got, I wasn't even looking at the pictures anymore.  There are drawn-out descriptions of their views of the finer things in life, which were very materialistic.  At the end of every issue there were pictures of &quot;real-life&quot; wedding announcements.  Perhaps this is fitting for your local newspaper, but it struck me as out of place in a magazine</review_text>
I found this magazine very unrealistic in terms of fashion (not clothing you would actually see people wearing on a daily basis and definitely not clothing that most people can afford).  The whole magazine is one big ad.  If I wanted that, I could just turn on the tv</review_text>
Elle used to be a great fashion magazine, but no longer. Ofcourse, there are too many adds (but then, that's what pays for the mag). I just wish that Elle and many other fashion mags would quit presenting all these articles (the hard hitting type) on serious subjects that do not belong in a fashion periodical. I buy Elle for "the fashion/beauty advice" NOT to read some pseudo intellectual writer's hard hitting political agenda. For hard hitting news items I read the Wall Street Journal, Atlantic Monthly, and watch Fox News.</review_text>
the articles are "good" but the articles are wordy and doesnt get to the point. Too many annoying ads. If u want something to "read" this isnt the magazine for yo</review_text>
I had always suspected and recently found out that Elle uses a different kind of (at least) paper for the cover of the editions it mails to us subscribers. While the Elle magazines in bookstores, supermarket etc. have thick, glossy, high quality paper for their covers, the managazines I received in my mailbox has a dull and thin cover. I guess the company wanted to cut cost, because to remain competitve, they were forced to offer subscribers a deep discount. Still, it's cheating</review_text>
Although I found the magazine itself to be interesting and colorful, with a good series of articles on marriage and relationships, I found that customer service was very dissapointing. I missed an issue back in October, and have contacted customer service 3 times to have them resend the issue I missed. It is now March, and I still haven't received my replacement. Just a heads up!</review_text>
I received my first "issue" of Modern Bride in the mail yesterday.  It was just the cover of the magazine, nothing else!Now I'll have to go through the trouble of ordering a replacement.Do yourself a favor and just go to a news stand and buy one</review_text>
I ordered the magazine and immediately received my first issue, but unfortunately over the course of the year I only received a total of THREE issues! The magazine is great, but I wonder what the problem is. I have no received much help from amazon or Modern Bride. Guess I learned my lesson not to subscribe online anymore.</review_text>
I subscribed to Modern Bride as a gift to my fiance.  Aside from not receiving our first issue until 3 months after the subscription, I only received about 3 issues total.  Months went by without anything being delivered.  While customer service at Modern Bride was very accomodating and helpful, nothing happens immediately.  When planning a wedding, each and every month is precious.  Especially during the initial stages of wedding planning.  To have finally gotten this subscription problem under control was exhausting.  Plus, by this time most of the wedding details were finalized, the magazines I received became useless.  If you're under 12 months to your wedding date, you should strongly consider if now is a good time to begin a subscription with Modern Bride</review_text>
I Love the Mag, but sister never recieved the order I gave her as a gift!!!</review_text>
If you're a teenage guitarist and want to learn Nickelback, Green Day, and nu-metal songs, then this magazine is for you. There's also some pretty good tips for beginners from time to time. But in the last several years the quality of the feature articles and interviews has gone steadily downhill, and there are far too many ads. As many people have said, sometimes it doesn't seem to be geared towards musicians at all anymore. The smarmy, "hipper than thou" Rolling Stone, Spin, Pitchfork Media style of writing seems to be taking over the mag.  And other styles of music such as blues, country, jazz, etc, are pretty much ignored.  But like I said, if you're a teenager and you see it on the newsstand and there's a song in it you would like to learn, pick it up, otherwise avoid this magazine</review_text>
I wish that when I purchased this subscription I would have read all of the reviews.  Unlike the description included on the Amazon website, the subsription does NOT include the CD-ROM, which costs an additional $1/issue.  And, if you want to purchase the CD-ROMs for past issues, they cost $4/disk.  Sometimes a bargain isn't really a bargain.  Buyer beware</review_text>
We received first issue of Guitar World and there was no bonus CD-ROM. Called the magazine and was told that since we purchased the subscription from Amazon at $19.95 that there would be no monthly CD-ROM. They charged us another $10 to have the monthly CD-ROM added to the subscription for the rest of the issues. But that CD-ROM is mentioned in Amazon's Editorial Review of the magazine. You get the impression that you are getting a deal on this magazine, but you are not because you don't get the bonus CD-ROM. It turns out to be the same rate as if you buy directly from the magazine</review_text>
Okay, so In Touch has never claimed to be anything other than what it is: A glossy tabloid.  But just when you didn't think it was possible for the American tabloid press to dumb down any further, along came In Touch Weekly and US Weekly.All In Touch really is is a bunch of photographs.  Their writing is slop, fit for second graders, and it doesn't go into much detail (and we all know how amazingly "accurate" these tabloids are, anyway).Want a quality tabloid?  Read Hello! magazine (from England). - Donna Di Giacom</review_text>
I HAVE YET TO RECEIVE EVEN ONE ISSUE. I LOOKED ON THE IN TOUCH MAGAZINE SIGHT AND IT SAID THAT I HAVE ALREADY RECEIVED 6 ISSUES. I WILL NEVER ORDER A MAGAZINE SUBSCRIPTION THROUGH THIS COMPANY OR THROUGH AMAZON AGAIN</review_text>
I have subscribed to "In Touch" since September last year and it's time to renew, but I'm not goint to....because this megazine is never arrived on time (at least 5 of them just failed to arrive), I don't know wether i should wait for it or call customer service. I would go to the store and buy it instead because the megazine itself is very entertaining.</review_text>
I ordered my subscription 3 months ago and still have not received it.</review_text>
Two months after ordering the magazine I have yet to receive a single issue</review_text>
I subscribed to Forbes magazine for a year or two, and in general the content is good, but I cancelled my subscription for 3 reasons. (A) 33% of the pages are ALL advertisements - what a waste of space, (B) every magazine has 3 or 4 renewal postcards that fall out onto the floor as I read the magazine, and (B) the classifieds in the back are "not of interest" to any real business person. If you don't mind the ads and the fluff, then this magazine might be right for you! It's not for me. I give it 2 stars</review_text>
Forbes is a great magazine.  Amazon on the other hand, well they ought to get out of the magazine business.  Order said first issue would be in February.  Amazon "forgot", to place the order until I called in April to find out what happened.  Now they claim the first issue will be June 19.  Yeah right.  Funny how they don't forget to charge the credit card you place the order.Don't order magazines from Amazon</review_text>
I bought the magazin on november, and I don't recive it yet</review_text>
2 months after ordering, i have year to get my first issue.  i'm sure i'll like it...if i ever get it</review_text>
The heft and page quality of this magazine is impressive, but it's mostly advertising.  Very disappointing.  It does have some useful info and I do enjoy reading it (which is why it got 2 stars from me), but I definitely won't be renewing my subscription</review_text>
Home Business Magazine is a publication aimed at those members of the general populace who either already own a home based business or who have an active interest in the subject and would like to pursue it further. This magazine contains articles relating to all facets of home business ownership from the initial setup all the way through to the payment of taxes at year end.I read several different business magazines and many of them have to do with entrepreneurship. Home Business is the only one I read that is specifically devoted to starting a business in the home and, unfortunately, it has many flaws that prevent it from being the enjoyable and informative read that it otherwise could be. Probably the most annoying feature of this magazine is the articles themselves and their tendency to be written in a list- type format rather than in a user- friendly way. I realize that people like lists but Home Business takes this a little too far. It makes the magazine seem callous and unfriendly- something you would consult in the same way you would an almanac. For example, it is common to find a one page article with a title like "Effective Ways to Design a Newspaper Ad", or "How to Obtain Quick Financing". In each instance, these articles will have a short opening consisting of a paragraph or two followed by a numbered listing of different methods/suggestions to solve the problem or answer the question. This makes the magazine read more like a reference guide than a piece of reading material.Another thing that is annoying about this magazine is the endless advertising. Not only does it get out of hand, it also includes all sorts of ads that emphasize money- making schemes and other similar material. Advertisements with titles like "Really Lazy Guy's Incredible Little Secret Idea Can Make You Rich", "Free $9.95 Report Shows You How to Make a Fortune", and "Six Figures in Six Months" clutter the pages of this magazine with get- rich quick garbage that everyone knows is unlikely to return even the cost of the introductory package.Some parts of this magazine are more bearable than others and it's this handful of positive attributes that prevent me from giving this magazine a one- star rating. I like some of the success stories because they depict ordinary people who have succeeded at making a living with a home- based business. But even here, the stories are inconsistent. Some are educational in nature while others have little valuable information to share. And to make matters worse, they are far too short- usually covering only one- half page each with a large advertisement taking up the space at the bottom of each page.Speaking of the advertising, this magazine wrote the book on advertisement excess. Advertisements cover about 75 percent of the pages in each issue and it is rare to see even two pages in a row without some sort of advertisement. The ads are posted everywhere, often right in the middle of an article, and they distract greatly from the already limited enjoyment of the magazine.This magazine is assembled together in such a way that it reads like a collection of articles taken from people in different parts of the country that were shuffled around and published in one magazine. In other words, this magazine has no continuity to it. It's like taking short articles from different business newspapers around the USA and then piecing them together into one magazine.Starting a home- based business is a goal that many people set for themselves and there is always a need for some good, timely information when you find yourself in this situation. Home Business, unfortunately, doesn't perform its mission very well. If you dig deeply enough you can find a few good articles. But the majority is too impersonal and too shallow (not to mention smothered in advertisements) to make this magazine worth the trouble.</review_text>
I wish I had something good to say but I ordered this Barron's subscription back in August 06. I've had this newspaper before and do enjoy it.  It is now November and I'm still waiting.  I called customer service and Amazon promised to resolve but that was several weeks ago. My next call will be to ask for my money back. Hopefully this isn't happening to other Subscribers.  I've ordered several other magazines from Amazon and always received them on a timely basis.</review_text>
If I could give this no stars I would. I bought this magazine because Nickelodeon programs are my sons favorite to watch. I bet they were banking on that when they made this sorry exuse of a children's magazine. Not even HALF of the magazine is ad free!!!! I bought this to keep my son busy on a flight, and he looked at it maybe two minutes. I wondered why, since he loves everything else Nick, so I looked inside for myself. Boy was I dissapointed. Instead of the quality children's material I had hoped for, it was just ad after ad. I'm glad I only bought one issue in the airport, instead of being one of the unfortunate people to purchase an entire subscription before seeing it's lack of content. If you want a great children's magazine, go for Ladybug for younger children and Cricket for older children. They are both high quality and they aren't stuffed full of advertisements like Nick</review_text>
When you watch commercial children's television, you have to accept the commercials because, after all, the programs are "free". But when you pay to subscribe to Nickelodeon magazine, I don't expect for it so be so full of alluring ads targeting children. These ads appear similar to the editorial content. It seems like 50% of the pages are advertisements!I was disappointed and won't be renewing our subscription. Better to look at something from the Highlights magazine series.</review_text>
I was looking forward to another Oprah magazine with great joy.  Unfortunately, the pomp and circumstance within "O at Home"'s pages is a real turnoff for me, an average, middle-class American living, as they say in "middle America".Although I hesitate to say this in print, it's been in my head for ahile now.  I am a faithful 20-year Oprah viewer but something has begun to change in her attitude and it is evidenced in this new magazine.Is it possible that Oprah has not only forgotten her roots, but has now skipped over all the stages in between her roots and now living in a gazillion-square-foot house in Malibu?  Is it possible that she has forgotten the 90% of us who live somewhere in between?  If this magazine is an indication, then sadly, she has</review_text>
Have a one year subscription to this magazine and will not renew it. Simply because its vulgar materialism to the extreme.  They say we Americans are obese in body, but magazines like this show to many are also obese when it comes to materialism.  Page after page of glossy ads for things we do NOT need.  And rooms to full of what amounts to dust collections.  Sure they make pretty pictures, but who wants all that 'junk' that probably has no real sentimental value but is more what someone else has told us we need to feel whole or successful.  I recommend the magazine Dwell which has a more holistic approach to a place to live that also wont mean hours cleaning.  For someone who professes to be so concerned about the down trodden, Oprah would do better to set a better example of living simply. And how many homes does one American need, when so many Americans cannot afford even one</review_text>
Like "Where's Waldo", it seems every issue must have at least one, if not several Mies van der Rohe daybeds.  While this is admitedly a classic piece of furniture, one gets the impression that there are a gaggle of designers telling their clients, "You have to have one of these, they're what's IN!"  Most of the features in Metropolitan Home suffer from the same fate; dreary antiseptic homes with the same dreary interiors that obviously were foisted upon gullible, uninformed clients by designers who know how to make an easy buck.  "Modern" equals, of course, a Mies van der Rohe daybed (notice how many times it shows up in this review?), otherwise you get month after month of 1970's florals, faux Louis the Whatever tables.  Even using feature extraction, wading through the dreck and finding something useable for your own purposes, it's painful to look through this magazine.  If you really want ideas for making your house reflect you, trust yourself and what YOU like, and if you do like Mies van der Rohe daybeds, by all means get one.  Just don't plunk one in your sun room because you were told it's trendy. If you like the Modern style, look up the works of Hans Wegner and Peter Hvidt and go from there; their furniture still looks stylish after 50 years of hard use by real families and is sturdy as well.  Maybe you want a house where nobody is allowed to set foot in any of the rooms and amounts to a bad hodge-podge of styles that all seem a bit busy and bumpy.  For everyone else, think about the things you'd like to see if you walked into a room, save your money and skip this magazine</review_text>
This magazine should be free, since there are so many advertisements.  Also, it is strictly modern decorating, unlike the editor's claims.  If you like extreme, modern style, try it out; otherwise invest in something else</review_text>
I haven't received this product yet and I'm pretty upset about it.I've requested that someone contact me about this problem and I haven't been given an answer.  I think I'm deserving of some sort of discount or at least an answer.Where is the product I bought???</review_text>
I echo the same gripe that other reviewers have voiced here: The magazine covers the same handful of people week after week after boring week.  How many times is a reader going to see no talents such as Jessica Simpson, Lindsay Lohan, the Tom Cruise-Katie Holmes joke, and THE most overrated, overhyped people of all time Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie on the cover and not get tired of it?It's nice to know what's going on with certain celebrities once in a while but every single week?  Can you say "overkill?"I'm glad I never got a subscription to this magazine.  I picked it up every once in a while on the newsstand but stopped because I was so sick and tired of reading about overrated, overhyped and glorified B-movie "actors" and "actresses" who were lucky to be in one successful movie and haven't done anything of value since.I picked up a copy today and have sworn it off forever.  Don't waste your time or your money. - Donna Di Giacom</review_text>
People magazine is one of the worst expressions of American life.  Instead of makiing our own lives more meaningful and exciting - which is possible - People encourages us to oogle and fixate over people who are essentially images, people we will never meet, and in many cases people who have very little going for them. Does anyone really think that Britney Spears has anything to say about anything, or that Paris Hilton is barely  aware of her own existence?  Does it ever make a whit of difference to your life how many times J.Lo is engaged (in order to get on the cover of another magazine) or who Demi Moore is grinding with today or where Gweyneth gets her gowns</review_text>
Laptop Magazine focuses on laptops, PDAs, and wireless computing.  Laptop Magazine seems like it's trying to be both technical and exciting; however it lacks the objectivity of PC Magazine and the deep enthusiasm of Wired.  Thus, it reads like a series of infomercials where each &quot;article&quot; paints a rose-colored view of each technology and the vendors products followed by paid ads of the same vendors portrayed so happily in the text.  Their conclusions all seem predetermined: new technology is better</review_text>
Laptop Mag can be best described negatively: it's not a really serious computer magazine.  It's more or less like Consumer Guide, which is basically paid advertising.  This means you can't really trust the article here because you don't know if they are not written by unbiased writers.  In the end, I feel this is a waste of money.  Besides, you can get all the info for free on the web, from CNET or ZDNET, anyway</review_text>
Liked this magazine enough to order it but it gets one star for wasting my money. Thought it'd be simple enough to order it from amazon like i do everything else. But instead i've paid and never received it. I haven't been able to log a compaint with amazon cause every time i do it links me somewhere else, so this is the first chance i've had to even say i've been ripped off. They may eventually send it but it's not likely at this point, it's been a couple months now</review_text>
I don't know what the heck is going on with your subscription service.  I bought this magazine for my nephew back on July 9th, and HE STILL HASN'T RECIEVED AN ISSUE!!!!  I am extremely disappointed with your service.  It should not take this long to get a magazine</review_text>
This magazine is all puff-- if you're looking for honest and insightful reviews, this is not your read.  However, if you already know all the artists they profile and just like pretty pictures of them, this magazine is worth buying for the sampler disc included with every issue</review_text>
Lots of lovely photos, great ideas, deco tips and food</review_text>
The title speaks for itself.I don't know how or why I was drawn to this magazine when I was 14. This magazine should be called J-4tweens. Ah. The title is very annoying. Like Twist, I only get this magazine when I'm really really desperate for something to read. I sure as hell wouldn't want my 12 year old daughter to wear mascara. If you have a tween and you want her to grow to become a pimpstress, get this. The only entertaining aspect of this magazine is the embarassing moments kinds of things (but of course). Other than that, no. They feature pretty bland fashion.All in all, this magazine is JUST like Twist.Therefore, the age reccomendation is just 11 & 12, but you're better off getting GL for even more years worth of goodness (10-15 yrs.) because no, it's NOT cool to steal your sister's damn boyfriend for pete's sake</review_text>
Interview is definitely a different type of magazine for me- someone who usually reads business and travel mags- and it's not quite what I expected. With a title like "Interview" I read my first copy of this magazine anticipating pages and pages of nothing but interviews. It turns out that interviewing is the main focus of the magazine, but it's not the only one. There is substantial space given to fashion, movies, and other areas, too. Some of these columns are worth an occasional look, but they failed to grab my attention. The writers seem to play it safe, and that includes the interview section. They don't ask many daring or controversial questions. They keep it simple, asking questions about an entertainer's latest album or movie, without delving much into their personal lives.Interview has many general annoyances. My greatest complaint is the advertising and the arrangement of the contents. About half of the pages in each issue are covered with ads, with fashion, liquor, beer, and hair care items providing the bulk of the advertising revenue. The ads are everywhere, with the majority in the front pages of each issue. The table of contents is buried, and I find this very frustrating. The contents starts with the interviews for that specific issue on one page, then a few pages later, proceeds to the remainder of the contents, which is the regular monthly features. What's annoying is that you have to search for the table of contents. It varies from one issue to the next, falling somewhere in the first half.Interview also varies greatly in length. Some issues are as short as 80 pages while others are more than 200 pages long. The shorter issues use staples for binding while the longer issues are bound in a more professional way, minus any metal.This magazine centers on entertainers, fashion, music, and the like. You won't find any interviews with politicians, businessmen, etc. Interview sticks strictly to entertainers, and that includes the regular monthly columns. You won't find a column about the business side of the music industry or film industry. You will find only articles about the stars themselves.Interview's only saving grace is the photography. It would make a nice gift for those who enjoy fashion and who like looking at pages and pages of men and women modeling fancy clothing. But in many ways, the photos are overemphasized and there isn't enough substance to the magazine. The articles are very shallow with more eye candy than reading material.Overall, Interview is sloppy and cluttered with too many ads to make it worthwhile reading material. My subscription was free, and I'm thankful that it was. Besides a few nice photos for clothing, there isn't much to make this magazine worth the cost.</review_text>
I bought this magazine as reading material for my flight home from Ruzyne Airport in Prague to NYC. This was the first time I ever purchased this magazine.Terrible choice. First of all this magazine was not worth the $10+ USD I paid for it. It was way too large to do anything with on the airplane and the content was for the lack of a better word BORING!Every other page was some chic ad. Who buys this magazine?Well I will not be buying it again</review_text>
I subscibe to this magazine.  Will not renew it either!  Maybe I am too old to appreciate this periodical.  It is way overpriced even with the Amazom, and others discount</review_text>
I ordered HOW for a graphic designer friend's birthday in January and it is near the end of March and she still has not received anything...so we have no idea how the product is... we have not seen it</review_text>
I cannot review this item because a month later, I still have not received the first issue of my subscription. SorryFrank Caldero</review_text>
Flipping through the pages of Writer's Digest at a local bookstore, I found some of its content to be particularly useful and interesting, especially those on the trade of writing that could benefit the novice writer. So I decided to subscribe to the magazine and it was only then that I realise that problems do persist in this seemmingly wholesome and helpful magazine.Since I have subscribed online directly through WD's website in Jan 2005, I have received only a few issues. In the first few months for almost half a year, I received no issues at all. It was only later then when I e-mailed them did they manage to get some issues through to me. The annoying thing is that even though I have e-mailed WD a few times on this problem, they would reply apologetically saying that they will extend my subsription. How does this tackle the root of the problem? If they could not have assured its overseas subscribers a consistent service, they should not have offered an 'overseas subscribers' option. Ironically, I received their letter asking for a renewal of my subscription recently with my home address clearly printed on the front of the letter.Logistic problems aside, the magazine does have its plus points. In the issues, there are useful tips for writers not simply on the craft of writing, but also on the business and spiritual aspect of the writing process as well. Occasional issues also features insights into the lives of authors to give us an idea of how and where they work, their opinions on life and the areas from which they derive their inspiration. All this from a range of authors from a range of genres. Essentially, the business of writing is also not left out.However, the magazine is not one fraught without problems. The problem with WD is that the information presented to readers is too limited and scattered. Each article though containing valuable tips on writing, does not have enough depth to really improve the work of authors if they are really implemented. In addition, because of its range, it also does not provide what some writers really want consistently, which can be a waste of time for them to read if they are subscribers. Sometimes, it does seem that the magazine is purposely limiting the information that they give to readers in order to encourage further buying of future issues. This for example, can be seen in the amount of publishers' addresses that they offer. At most, each specific article on a particular topic contains on average 7-10 addresses. There is nothing wrong with this, but why would an author want to waste his time to have bits and pieces of such information when he can just purchase a Writer's market collection of publishers(and agencies) addresses collected into one? And ironically again, the same company does publish a 'Writer's Market' collection which is of excellent quality annually.That said, the same problem - the lack of information and depth, is also seen in the advice and tips it gives as well. To make matters worse, every issue is usually cluttered with a plethora of advertisements that can be frustrating to readers at times. Writers want to organise their time and information, not add on to it.If you want are thinking of subscribing to WD, do consider the alternatives that are currently available. Writing is a craft that requires more common sense and acumen than many would like to think. However, if you are not particularly concerned with little information fed to you in slower dozes or are not too worried about a little more untidiness in your life, than this magazine might be for you. But do your research first</review_text>
Writer's Digest puts out a lot of great resources for writers. The magazine ain't one of them, however.For starters about half of the magazine is ads - mostly for other Writer's Digest products. One you get past paying $19.95 a year for what's essentially a brochure, you'll notice that most of the articles don't apply to you. Most writers stick to one genre, yet the magazine focuses on all aspects of writing - fiction, poetry, business writing, editing, non-fiction, etc. If you're working on a biography of J. Edgar Hoover, do you need to look at an article on poetry in the stlye of ee cummings? I'll take "no" for $600, Alex.So, now you're down to about 10 pages that might be relevant. Well, let's start chipping away at that:The letters about grammar questions are a waste: if you have a question about affect versus effect, would you write to a magazine and wait a month or two or would you pick up your style guide and have an answer in less time than it took for you to read this sentence? Thought so. (Furthermore the idea that someone would write to a magazine with a question like that is so incredulous one has to wonder if the questions aren't just submitted by staff members in an attempt to fill space, like I used to do when I was the news editor at my college paper.)Writer's Digest does review software and other technology that might be useful to writers. My favorite was when it reviewed Microsoft Word. Thanks - I'm sure most readers had no idea about the monopolistic word-processing program. To be fair, some of the reviews are useful, although you can get better information just by looking up the product on Amazon.com and reading the reviews there.If you're going to Writer's Digest for market information, you'd be better served elsewhere: the annual Writer's Market publication has all the markets and is more thorough, whilst the Writer's Market website has all that information and is up-to-date. Your money would be better spent on those two products.About the only articles I have found useful are the profiles on authors and how they have succeeded. There you have it: two or three pages an issue that are useful.If you're trying to get your work published, Writer's Digest has several other products that are a better investment than its magazine: go with the annual Writer's Market book, the website, and pick up a style manual of your choosing (Chicago is the best). Don't waste your money on this magazine</review_text>
While waiting for my daughter in an orthodontic office last month (July 2005), I read through what I thought would be the familiar Redbook magazine of the past. Instead, I was shocked to come across a new sexual advice section in which the explicit techniques for giving your man satisfying oral sex without tiring yourself out was described. Another article within this section explained how a taller man can have sex with a shorter female partner while both standing.I felt embarrassed and outraged that this magazine was out on the tables in the waiting room for any age group to read. I am age 48, college educated and the mother of 2 teenagers. I would not want my 13 year-old daughter to consider this light reading or helpful advice, nor do I think it appropriate for a magazine such as Redbook.Parents please seriously consider whether you want this magazine on the end tables in your homes. IT HAS CHANGED</review_text>
It took forever for this magazine to get to the address and it also is shipped a week to 2 weeks after the magazine is already on the stands.  What's the point of having a subscription if you get the magazine later than everyone else? I will never order a magazine from Amazon again, I'll go through the actual magazine company instead</review_text>
I haven't recieved a single copy so I can't really review it. All I can say is the amazom service is terrible</review_text>
The magazine is supposed to be for girls 8 and up... it is not. An 8 year old girl does not need to have information on contracting herpes, being sexually active and  kissing. I am dissapointed that society thinks 8 year olds are ready for this material and thinks getting this info from a magazine rather than a parent is appropriate</review_text>
but that's the lowest we're allowed to give.  This magazine is more for 16 year olds and up. Too much focus on getting a boyfriend and making out - every 10 year old's top priority right?  Plus my daughter found extremely crude language in the latest issue - magazine refused to discuss the matter when I emailed and called them! Says it's geared for girls 8 and up but that's a huge age span. Better off with American girl Magazine - this one's to mature for younger girls.</review_text>
not nearly as appealing as the other magazines I have read: motortrend, car and driver, automobile mag, sport compact.  I don't like any of the long racing articles and anything on old cars.  Car and drivers off topic articles tend to be more interesting and occasionally very funny</review_text>
I hate this magazine.  I subscribed sight-unseen based on the good reviews, and find the recipes are for food that no one in my house would ever eat...way too exotic.  If you like good ol' American fare, don't buy this one</review_text>
If I see another picture of a blurred waterfall or creek I am going to puke...I have not seen one truly imaginative, artistic image in this magazine. Everything is run of the mill, boring, standard outdoor photography.  Lots of sunsets, flower fields.  No different angles or perspectives, colors, nothing new.  The articles are geared toward inexperienced photographers and really repetitive.  I think I clipped one interesting article in a year worth of magazines..</review_text>
I was a charter subscriber to this magazine when it started up publication.  It was a breath of fresh air in a stagnant field of almost universally wretched photography magazines.  Over the years things changed.  Columnists died or moved on.  Editorial directions were switched.  Articles that once inspired now only offered consumerist bullfeathers.  When digital photography became dominant in the marketplace, "Outdoor Photographer" was in the vanguard, pushing every gadget and Photoshop manipulation plug-in that popped up.  The magazine became a wasteland of promises of better pictures if you just buy _____ (fill in the blank with whatever the current trend might be).  What I thought was ironic at the time was that the best photographs they printed were being done by photographers using the least sophisticated equipment.  Photographers using film (!?), a lot of large format guys, occasionally some black and white and stuff made with cameras just about any serious hobbist already owned.  But these portfolios began to dwindle from occasional to rare to almost non-existent.At some point, my interest in this garbage lapsed before my subscription.  The magazine made a once monthly trip from the mailbox to the trashcan without even opening it until they finally stopped sending it."Outdoor Photographer" impresses people who measure quality photography by whether or not the equipment used in production cost the equivalent of the gross national product of small third world countries.  It offers little in the way of nutrition to a hungry mind.  It's empty calories, just making you want more and more while starving your potential.  It truly is wretched.</review_text>
I have only received the paper for 2 weeks.Where is it? why did it stop comin</review_text>
The National Enquirer has gone off the deep end and beyond the point of common decency.  To now attack a sweet, wonderful, charitable guy like Clay Aiken is very very sad.  To go after celebrities whose lifestyles are sensationalized is one thing, but to go after a quiet humble guy like Clay is another.  And now what? Is he supposed to justify their existence and have to defend this garbage.  Their story is ludicrous and they owe Clay, his family, and all of his fans a big apology.  I will not buy this filthy rag or any American Media products ever again</review_text>
What is the National Enquirer, you ask?It's a phony as hell newspaper that provides all the latest gossip about celebirties but they come up with fake stories half the time.Avoid it like the plague</review_text>
dO not order MENtle floss Magazin.  it preetends to be sMart but It's just a teaz.  Covers intersting toppics, aks good qestions but the ansers are lackng.  Each issu has half a page of corections frm the preevius issu.  whats the point of reeding a mag whitch promises to mak you smarter if its not so clevver itself?  Like ths revue, it dosn't live upto it's claims.</review_text>
I had heard good things about this magazine and so ordered a sample.  It is a lovely magazine, beautiful photos and it is interesting reading about "other coasts" (besides east and west).  But, at least with the most recent issue, in every article about families or couples and their coastal homes the people were all caucasian.  Even the advertisements had only white people (save for one about vacationing in Mexico that had some cute Mexican children in it).  While I doubt this is intentional, I would encourage the publishers of this magazine to put their attention on this issue.  There are plenty of people of color living on the coast who have interesting homes and lives that readers would enjoy learning about</review_text>
for ads only pretty much. there is not much to read or learn for the common reader. it seems like it's mailing for the fashion elite not for everyone.</review_text>
...because that's all this magazine is: an advertising vehicle aimed at kids who aren't old enough to discriminate between ads and actual content yet.Don't be fooled by the venerable "National Geographic" name: this publications pays only the briefest lip service to educational content. When my son received it as a gift I was shocked to see that the ads were virtually indistiguishable from the articles. And in fact, the ads were often much more visually interesting.The photos were excellent, I must admit. But the layout was jazzed up to the point of absurdity, as if designed to play to kids with minuscule attention spans. The science facts were sound, but again, the articles were cut absurdly short, more like squibs and factoids than actual articles, as if the editors believe that kids couldn't possibly focus on one topic long enough to actually read more than 250 words about it...or maybe because they didn't want to distract the kids from all that tantalizingly lucrative advertising stuffed onto every page.As an editor and a parent, I am appalled by this magazine and would not recommend it to anyone. National Geographic should be ashamed of itself for pushing this kind of junk on young readers. Avoid this publication like the plague.</review_text>
My family received this magazine for years, but recently we have decided not to re-new our subscription. This used to be a quality product but it has recently gone downhill with the inclusion of more and more advertising in each issue. At this point, nearly half of the magazine consists of advertisements--this isn't the real science magazine it claims to be, and is a waste of money.The content is not all that great. The articles are often extremely short, too short for even a pre-teen audience. My kids often wished that this magazine included more serious science topics, and not just shortened, dumbed-down material. Much of the magazine is full of "fluff"-- things like word searches and picture matching games, which didn't interest my children. The content might be okay for 7-8 year olds and children at slightly lower reading levels, but older children will be bored.All in all, I'd recommend that you simply get the regular, adult version of National Geographic. Though the articles might be too complex for children, the pictures will make up for what they can't read.If you're looking for more of a children's-oriented magazine, you're better off with MUSE, a high quality general science magazine that is published by the Smithsonian Museum in Washington, DC. However, Muse caters to a slightly older audience, perhaps ages 9 and up.</review_text>
FULL of ads, hardly any content at all. Not worth paying for it.</review_text>
I'm so glad we didn't buy a subscription to National Geographic Kids magazine without checking it out at the news stand first! It truly seemed like there were more pages of ads than of actual CONTENT in this magazine.If you're looking for a good kids' magazine about nature & wildlife, try one of the National Wildlife Federation's excellent publications. My kids enjoy Your Big Backyard (for ages 3-7) and Ranger Rick (for kids 7 & up), both of which are available through Amazon.com or [...]Kids Discover magazine (for 6-12 year olds) is another favorite with my children (and me) and contains great science & social studies articles without the commercials of NG Kids. You can subscribe through Amazon or [...</review_text>
I subscribed to this publication expecting to read reviews of various fiction/non-fiction books - what it turns out to be is a series of editorials, premised around virtually all non-fiction.  All very high-brow and frankly, quite boring.  The one item worthwhile is the classifieds.  I think I'll ask to cancel my subscription and obtain a refund.  I anticipated something that would help me in finding great books to read but after 4 issues, I haven't seen anything of interest</review_text>
A friend of mine got me a subscription to this magazine because I like Cooks Illustrated.  This magazine is nothing but ads for snazzy expensive foods and restaurants.  There are so few recipies in it I wouldn't call it a 'cooking' magazine.  What few recipies they do have don't explain why they chose the ingredients used or give much detail at all.If you consider yourself a 'foodie' who likes to go to fancy restaurants and likes to know what's hip on the latest gourmet food and wine, then this magazine might be for you.  If, however, you like to cook and know what you are doing and why you are doing it, try Cooks Illustrated instead.</review_text>
If you are into high brow interior design then this is for you.  But my problem is not so much with the magazine as it is about their customer service at Veranda and the subscription department's ability to read.  They are by far the worst</review_text>
2 months after ordering, i have year to get my first issue.  i'm sure i'll like it...if i ever get it</review_text>
The heft and page quality of this magazine is impressive, but it's mostly advertising.  Very disappointing.  It does have some useful info and I do enjoy reading it (which is why it got 2 stars from me), but I definitely won't be renewing my subscription</review_text>
After 1 month I haven't receive the product.  It's to give a good review until it arrives</review_text>
Unfortunately, there seemed to be no recourse after I ordered this for 2 newphews as a Christmas gift, and it did not arrive.  I tried to send an email to amazon.com but got bumped to someone else (distributor?) who never responded.  So disappointing since it was a gift for someone else.  Happened not once, but twice</review_text>
Truly this is the magazine of the warmongers, the neocons, who would gladly repopulate America completely with non-Europeans, except for the neocons themselves and their cohorts, who are of  "a race of the mind," as one wag put it, by and large.Pro-war and anti-American people (and certainly anti- Euro-American people), this magazine is truly one to be boycotted.  If you are an American of European descent THE AMERICAN CONSERVATIVE will more likely be for you.  If you are racially aware and don't wish to see your people vanish from the Earth, I would also recommend THE OCCIDENTAL QUARTERLY.To give the devil his due, TWS does carry some interesting book reviews at times.If you love your people, as long as they are not from "the race of the mind," do not buy this magazine, and if you already subscribe do the smart thing and cancel for a refund, as I did a few days ago.Highly recommended as antidotes to this warmongering propaganda are two outstanding collections, NEO-CONNED! and NEO-CONNED AGAIN</review_text>
This magazine is another part of the Murdoch empire.  Its worstsin is that its boring and not very conservative.   It wasfounded by William Kristol, John Podhoretz and Fred Barnes tobe a institutional conservative publication under tight controland with deep enough pockets to dwarf its smaller rivals.When conservativism was a living movement, it was bestcharacterized as a collection of independent voices whowhile they respected each other didn't always agree witheach other.  Now, following the Murdoch formula, its aboutgetting as many people whatever their ideology on thepayroll.  The price of being on the payroll is of coursenot rocking the boat.Reading conservative publications these days is like readingthe transcripts of someone engaging in a monologuein an echo chamber.  Its strange that there is so much"conservative" media today, but that most policy decisionsdon't get debated or even discussed among conservatives.They seem more interested in covering liberals than discussingideas or making proposals.  And for god's sake, no more articlesby those who are agnostics in their private life talkingabout how america needs more god this or god that.  If yourgoing to be religious, at least find someone who is sincere.And no more articles on the greatness of familyby childless unmarried women who are totally devoted to careersto the exclusion of anything else.</review_text>
The Weekly Standard is just more of the same.  It's not, strictly speaking, journalism.  But I imagine you'd like it if you enjoy reading articles that set out to promote a very conservative point of view.  If you like Rush or Fox News, you'd probably like it.  If you are looking for a serious media outlet, this is not it</review_text>
I found this magazine to be helpful for an introduction to advanced computing.  That's about it.  This mag seems to be biased towards certain products &amp; manufacturers.  They neglected to open my eyes wider.  The reviews/articles that are published seem to favor big money companies (microsoft, dell, etc). They don't give credit to smaller, better, less-well-known companies and technologies.  All the info is pretty basic for intro users, but if that's what you are interested in... then this is a great non-comlicated publication</review_text>
I paid I never received magazine at all even though I received all four of the other magazines that were ordered at the same time</review_text>
I can't imagine how many hours of my life I wasted worrying about ego-trippin' jocks.Although, I understand how I got hooked on this bad habit.  The rich folk who own our media do a great job of marketing this endless diversion to the masses.  So, instead of worrying about economic justice, environmental destruction, the well-being of children and so forth; the passion of a large segment of the general public is frittered away on watching one city's gladiators combat another city's gladiators.On top of that, with the us vs. them pattern of thinking that is encouraged, the anthem singing, and so many pro sports figures involved with right-wing politics (Bernie Kosar, John Elway, Steve Largent), I've come to realize how poltically-charged this so called "escape" actually is.  On top of that, I just got sick of all these sports announcers barking about this or that, wagging their finger in my face.  The ads in Sports Illustrated are also a bunch of macho [...].By the way, before he was killed by "friendly fire," Pat Tillman was reading Noam Chomsky and Howard Zinn books.  In fact, he had arranged to have a meeting with Chomsky after he returned from our war of terror.  Too bad he wasn't able to pursue that path.My interest in sports is now limited to badminton in my backyard, and books like "What's My Name Fool?" which is about how sports figures sometimes remember issues like peace and justice</review_text>
The thing I hate about this magazine is the letters to the editor section. Supposedly, they're written by real people. But after reading this magazine for the last few years, these letters all seem to have the same maudlin, soporific, sappy style of prose that reads to me like they've been EDITED that way. There's this condescending "athletes are supposed to behave like GOOD ladies and gentlemen and if they don't, then tsk tsk - WHAT WILL THE CHILDREN THINK?" mentality that I absolutely HATE. The good things about SI are the photography and whatever articles on the NBA they have any given week. And the swimsuit issue? I guess if you're a 13-14 year old it's exciting as all get out - I'll take the HARD STUFF any day over their annual fleshfest</review_text>
I got this as a freebie along with W and it lasted only as long as I received it for one year.  The use of fur and skins was nauseating and I couldn't have been more disgusted at the vapid, innocuous, 'insights' it offered.  This magazine has no redeeming social value.</review_text>
A friend once said to me, "If you want a glossy that is a no brainer then get Vogue!"How right she is, despite having glorious photography, fashion models that daren't stand sideways or you wouldn't be able to see them and the occasional good article in it, I have to admit I find Vogue too pretentious.Vogue wants to be the voice of fashion, the voice of the high brow media but its clientele are the likes of you and me, ordinary people who can't afford to live the high life they are portraying on its gloss filled pages.Personally I'd rather spend my money on a movie ticket, I get to see a good thriller, sci-fi, romance etc, etc I don't have to know about the substence abuse and emotional demons that haunt a particular actor's life, I'm just interested in enjoying myself for a couple of hours before I go back to my hard working life in the real world.Vogue is trying to sell me a dream that I don't really want to buy into, never had a penchant for selling my soul to the devil,  it's gets two stars though because the photography is really superb, shame about the rest of it though</review_text>
I would like to classify myself as a moderate but I probably lean conservative.  Because of that, I subscribed to Harpers so that I could read good writing that would challenge my beliefs and stretch my mind in new ways.  I got that, more or less, at first, but over the course of a couple of years the magazine drifted further and further to a leftist propaganda screed, the worst of which was Louis Lapham's bitter drivel editorials.  It got to a point where the writing was incredibly predictable; I knew exactly what position (read:  left of Pelosi) the writer--any writer in Harpers--would take on whatever the issue was, and I had a pretty good idea of what the line of whining would be.If you attend dinner parties on the Upper East Side; if you drive a Prius to the Oscars; if you think commercial organic farming is an environmental travesty; if you've ever desecrated a Starbucks, then look no more--this magazine is for you.However, if you're dumbfounded at how the Republicans can keep winning elections--and then you realize they have the Democratic party as opponents; if you realize the genius of George Bush and Karl Rove is in getting liberals to underestimate George Bush and Karl Rove; if you want to read smart, insightful writing that will inform and entertain, then try The Atlantic Monthly (which, by the way, I am surprised to see reviewers describe as a liberal magazine; I think it is moderate, and if anything, a bit on the conservative side.)   Needless to say, I let my Harpers subscription lapse.Two stars, tho, for the Harper's Index--however, that wasn't worth the price of a subscription (it got to be the only thing worth anything for the price of the subscription).</review_text>
I've read many positive reviews of this magazine and I did receive, several months ago, a trial issue. After sending in the subscription fee, I was billed again. I wrote a note letting them know that the check had been endorsed and deposited. Yesterday, I got a notice telling me my subscription had expired after one issue. I give up. It might be good, but customer service is really lousy. What a disappointment.</review_text>
There was a time when liberalism had a connotation of deep thinking, tolerance, and openness to healthy, civil debate.No longer.  And HARPER'S is a perfect symbol for all that ails the Left.  To call this magazine "Left leaning" is a farce.  It doesn't lean...it completely, totally, enthusiastically, and blindly tumbles and falls into the "Far Left" swamp.  The tone is often hysterically and shrilly partisan, reflecting the ongoing deafness and disconnection that the leftist media elites have towards the mainstream of America.The quality of the writing and feature selection has declined precipitously through recent years.  This rag is about as credible now as THE GUARDIAN, NATIONAL ENQUIRER, or, come to think of it, The New York TIMES!  Save your money, LOL!</review_text>
So I ordered the magazine in Nov. 6, 2005. Its now Feb. 22nd, 2006 and the magazines (since I also ordered the Smithsonian and Scientific American) are nowhere to be seen. Of course, my account was quickly charged and at this pace, I'm guessing the whole genomic structure of all living organisms in this planet will be decoded before I receive any of them... so if you actually want to read this excellent magazine, it might be a better idea to get somewhere else..</review_text>
I dont enjoy this publication at all anymore, dont know if editorial leadership has change</review_text>
DO NOT BUY THIS MAGAZINE! FOR ANY PRICE, IT IS TOO EXPENSIVE. MARIE CLAIRE HAS HARASSED ME REPEATEDLY TO PAY FOR MY SUBSCRIPTION.  IT WAS PAID FOR IN ADVANCE THRU AMAZON. I HAVE SENT THEM COPIES OF MY AMAZON RECEIPT TWICE.  THEY ARE REPORTING ME TO A CREDIT AGENCY FOR NON-PAYMENT.  AVOID THEM, AVOID THEM.  THEY ARE SCAM ARTISTS AND WILL FALSELY AND WITH MALICE DESTROY YOUR CREDIT RATING.</review_text>
I'm a big player of PC games, but I also love reading and thinking about my favorite hobby. For the past few years I've been living in the UK, but when I come to the US (and now that I live here again) I would pick up the American version of PC Gamer.I have to say, and I hope some of you take my word on this, the U.K. publication is light-years ahead of this one. The humour is grown-up (not to mention actually funny) and doesn't drown the magazine. It's bigger, the cover and pages are of much better quality paper and ink, the articles are neatly laid out... added to this, the demo disc is a jam-packed dual sided DVD, with archives of patches, movies, free games, demoes, hardware guides....Not to mention the fact that there are many highly intelligent articles every month.In case you're still feeling sceptical: the UK version of PC Gamer was the original. It came to the US after it was set up in the UK.Having lavished the UK PC Gamer with praise, I think you can read between the lines and figure out where the US version falls short</review_text>
This magazine used to be THICK, fun to read, full of information. But that was about 5 years ago. Now it's just a flimsy looking mag filled with vulgarities and non-sense. The editorial is almost always filled with political opinions. I won't renew my subscription</review_text>
ITS BEEN MONTHS AND I STILL HAVE NOT RECIEVED MY COPY OF  THIS MAGAZINE.  THEY HAD NO PROBLEM CHARGING MY CREDIT CARD, BUT THEY CANT SEEM TO GET A COPY OF THIS WEEKLY MAGAZINE OUT IN UNDER A QUATER OF A YEAR. WHAT A BUNCH OF NONESENSE.</review_text>
This is one of the worse magazines I have picked up in years.  If you have "money to burn" traveling, then it might be for you.  Loaded with advertising and little 'true' content</review_text>
I subscribed to T+L for one year.  My wife and I found the magazine to be uninformative and of little value when planning our travels.  Most of the magazine seems to be centered around places to go shopping and the photos that accompany the articles are artistic photos, usually of models wearing $1,000 outfits, instead of informative photos of the resorts or hotels.  The recommended travel products tend to focus on $1,200 designer duffels which, while perhaps within reach of the target demographic, are unlikely to survive many trips through a major airport.In addition, my subscription came with an unrequested automatic renewal.  I didn't enjoy the magazine and nearly every copy was in my recycle bin within 15 minutes of receiving it.  However T+L decided that I would somehow like a renewal although I certainly never requested one.  In my book, those are questionable and perhaps unethical business practices.</review_text>
I subscribe to the online edition you can receive through email in PDF form. I was looking forward to reading reviews of the latest audiobooks and hearing what the reviewers thought about them. Frankly I was disappointed. The reviews are little more than 1 paragraph plot synopsis, (the same info which might be gleaned from looking up the title on amazon.com or reading the back of the book). Reviewers add about 1 sentence or so to the title and call it a review... Please. They are also fairly out of date. Most of the audio titles reviewed are older titles which have been out for a while. Some titles aren't available anywhere that I can figure. Whats the point in reviewing an audio title you can't find?My interest is primariy sci-fi, horror and romantic-horror. Most of the titles audiofile reviews are fiction. The articles aren't particularly interesting. Frankly I could care less what the narrator thinks or feels, as long as they have a good voice. There is also a sort of...Literay snob tone to audiofile. I get the feeling they like certain authors and certain titles and tend to overly focus on them.I'd really like to see audiofile have a 'coming soon' review column. It would be very useful to know what titles will be coming out in the future. I'd also like to see more romance, dark fantasy, and horror reviews, or at least make the section focusing on different genres a little more clear. I also think the sections focussing on children's titles and self-help are a little large.2 stars. If you must subscribe, get the online version. That way you can cancel anytime, and don't have to worry about subscription problems</review_text>
I ordered on 10/4/2005. As of March 27th, I still haven't received the first issue, I don't even want it now! How do I get credit for the payment made back in October</review_text>
I never received this magazine so how would I be able to rate it??  I cant even find a way to let them know I never received it</review_text>
Change can be good; however, sometimes change can be very bad.  Earlier this year PC Mag decided to become a magazine for the masses instead of providing technical information for their longtime dedicated readers.  Before the change this was a magazine that I would keep for a year or so to refer back to the content; now I can skim it in 5 minutes and don't feel there is a reason to keep it for any length of time.  As a longtime subscriber (20 years) I will not be re-subscribing to the magazine.  I wish them luck, but I believe they have lost sight of their subscription base and are chasing a broader base of subscribers that might disappoint them</review_text>
This magazine took a radical change in direction earlier this year, meaning most reviews prior to April 2006 are essentially reviewing a different magazine.I was a subscriber since the early 90's and have recently cancelled.  This magazine had a mid (end of life?) crisis and now wants to cover just about anything that uses electricity.  And cars!  Why would I pick up PC Magazine to read a car review?  Their "improved" layout uses cartoonish hand drawn arrows and "cool" sayings to replace actual review content.  What is their market here?  12 year old geeks with an extra $80k laying around to drop on an SUV?  Get real.  Until this magazine makes another radical change in direction to get back on topic, it is best avoided</review_text>
Please see tj-mccarthy's review elsewhere here; he is, to borrow a phrase from across the pond, spot-on in his comments. Just this week I cancelled my 10-year subscription to PC Magazine. One thing not mentioned elsewhere is that the new editor, Jim Louderback, has dropped the old tagline on the front cover, "An Independent Guide to Technology". I conjecture that the reason for doing so is that this magazine is no longer independent and is, in fact, just a marketing vehicle for various products. If you are like me and you do not like stealth marketing, stay away from this publication</review_text>
I remember, not quite four years ago, when this magazine actually had PC substance and catered to a sophisticated PC-oriented market. Now, it's thin, hollow, interminably off-topic and ad-choked.</review_text>
I've been watching this magazine slide downhill for some time, but they've finally hit bottom.  The bulk of the April 25 2006 magazine was devoted to cars.  Yes, todays automobiles are becoming highly computerized, but the magazine is supposed to highlight the software and hardware that we use on our desktops.PC Mag has been drifting far afield, doing articles on Apple computers, gaming systems, and extensive reviews on cameras.  Instead of PCs, the subject seems to be anything that has a computer chip in it, or is in some way remotely related to computers.  The obvious inference is that there's nothing interesting going on in the PC world, so they have to keep stretching just to fill the pages.  I find that hard to believe; I think it's more likely that the staff has lost their focus, or they've hired people who are not interested in or qualified to write about PCs.  The lack of pertinent content makes the dwindling size of the magazine even more apparent.  What used to rival a small phone book is now about the size of Time magazine.They now have a "new look", and it's awful.  Their readership used to consist of well educated, technically sophisticated professionals.  These people don't need a dozen arrows pointing into every photograph, with cutesy "handwritten" notes belaboring the obvious.  That's more appropriate for the folks who had a hard time getting through high school and have short attention spans.  Compare this issue to the issues from a couple years ago, and it's obvious that they've "dumbed down" the entire magazine.I've subscribed to PC Magazine for years, and considered it a "must read" to keep up with the rapidly evolving hardware and software of the PC world.  But no more -- it's time to find one that has something useful to write on the subject of Personal Computers.</review_text>
I just cancelled my subscription and recommended that my daughter cancel the one I bought for my 14 year-old grandson.  For some reason Ziff-Davis marketers think that  full page ads selling sex videos are appropiate for PC magazine. (Dec 27, 2005, p 122 if you want to check it out).  Previous issues had partial page ads selling "sex pheremones" which I could almost overlook, but full pages scantily clad lap dancers is over the line.</review_text>
I am utterly disappointed in the direction that Gamepro has taken over the past two years. I actually stopped my subscription for about 1 year, but came back to the 20 issues for $10 at their (10?) year anniversary.  I forget.  But the magazine is really bad.One thing I laugh is, the retro corner.  They have info about issues from 5 and 10 years before, and they always announce the number of pages from 10 years ago. I think the most recent issue, they said: 140 pages?  Huh?  I think my last issue was around 100.  And don't try to tell me they've lost 40 pages in advertising.Too bad on-line reviews and websites, are taking over the subscriptions of the hardcopy magazines. I'll stick with hardcopy until the end of my life. Or until the quality of these types of magazines gets so low, I can't stand it anymore.  Or until my subscription runs out on this craptacular effort.You guys were pretty good 5 years ago, but you've gone to pot these past two years!  I'm talkin' to you Watchdawg!!!You guys are suckin' lately!!!MC White said:  You guys are suckin'!!</review_text>
As you can tell by the title, I'm not enamored of this magazine. I've been playing video games since the early 80s, and have read many, many gaming magazines. My reasons for this negative review of Gamepro follow in no particular order: 1.) Their numerical rating system stinks. 1-5 points is just not accurate enough. Most mags/web sites have a 1-10 system with decimals. Not Gamepro. 2.) The written part of the reviews are way too short, and often are written borderline incoherantly. It's as if they hired the proverbial 1,000 monkeys to type them out. 3.) Often times they cram two or three reviews on one page. Screen shots provided with reviews are often the size of a postage stamp. 4.) The number of ads in relation to content is distinctly high. Once when I was bored, I counted all the ads in one issue. Out of around 110 pages there were 60+ pages of ads. 5.) Their article layouts are confusing, and occasionally they print on colored backgrounds that closely match the text color. Forget about reading it if you're colorblind. 6.) Their gaming tips are either so obvious that a brain dead chimpanzee could figure them out, or plain don't work. I suspect that the ones that do are ripped off from various web sites. 7.) Gamepro costs the same as better gaming mags, such as EGM and Game Informer. So, in closing... if you want a good gaming magazine, just about any magazine other than Gamepro would be an improvement. Many great gaming magazines have come and gone, why a turd like Gamepro continues is a mystery to me</review_text>
Just from picking up this mag in the store, and reading their spin-off "Pocket Gaming", I have concluded that this magazine is pure rubbish, I wouldn't waste my money subscribing</review_text>
I read this at Stop and Shop each month, hoping it'll get better. Each month I hope desperately for some pertinent, relevant, or just plain mildly useful business hints and tips... and they are just not forthcoming.For someone who is interested in making millions with vending machines, look no further.Always longed to invest in one of those MLM (multi-level marketing) ventures that start their pleas with: "Dear friend, I was once a loser like you. Thanks to this company, I've turned my life around! What are you waiting for? Just send me all your money and you could be as tanned and successful as I am." ? Then this is your mag!For a business owner who is looking for some serious help? Don't bother! You'd be far better off with a subscription to American Venture or something in that line</review_text>
This magazine is great just for keeping the spirit. It's filled with many success stories. But hardly any of those success stories include the details that led them into success. It's also extremely geared towards franchising. Every other article, and every other ad is about franchising. I have a one year subscription and at this point I'm bored. I'll keep the subscription, but it's highly unlikely that I will renew next year.*** Though one should check out their web site at entrepreneur.com. You will find that it is the total opposite of the magazine, and will prove to be a great wealth of information</review_text>
My biz partner and I were excited to receive our first mag from this group.  We were sorely disappointed.  Most of the articles are not new information, but &quot;rehashed&quot; info widely available.  We read it cover to cover for about 4 months, then cancelled the subscription.  There are better sources out there and this is not one of them!</review_text>
Harper's Bazaar is a pretty decent fashion magazine, but I wish now that I had never gotten a subscription. True, each issue would be more expensive, but1) I could pick out what issues seemed worth buying, as some are thin and empty2) They are quite often late with their delivery or you miss an issue. I have only gotten one issue on time, to be honest.</review_text>
My mom was a subscriber to Newsweek for years, and I'd flip through her copies.  Most of the material is friendly towards the powers that be (although, not friendly enough according to the review by the soldier who thinks the editors should be in jail.  So much for "protecting our freedoms").  Anyway, since Newsweek is beholden to Big Business advertisements, it won't do much to rock the boat that our corporate mafia owns.If people are interested in more honest, more critical views of the political and economic system that is causing so much devastation in the world (the neoliberalism of the US empire and other wealthy nations), then I'd recommend Z magazine.  I'll never forget finding my mom on the floor devouring it's articles on a range of issues the corporate media marginalize.  Z also publishes articles and interviews with the most-cited living author on the planet, Noam Chomsky (another figure I'm sure the US soldier thinks should be in jail.  Although, Chomsky recently spoke at West Point.  So, even the military is waking up to the hard truths he brings).</review_text>
First off I have to ask amazon what keeps happening to my reviews?  If one is too critical of a product do they get deleted?As a Peace Corps volunteer I am a forced subscriber of this rag. That should upset every American taxpayer that foots the bill for this garbage.  I would like to pint out also that Peace Corps volunteers (not your most conservative bunch) has continually lobbied to get rid of this magazine in favor of the Economist.Every week I receive my copy and page through it for 5 minutes. It then hits the burn pile or the trash bin (which ultimately gets burned).I literally feel dumber every time I try to read an article that looks interesting.  They have six page articles with all kinds of diagrams and illustrations that end up revealing far less than a 3 paragrah story that the Economist presents on the same topic.  I am just waiting for when News Weak starts introducing pop ups for their thought weak readers.As a former soldier I was enraged that the irresponsible and criminal reporting (Koran desecration) of this magazine caused the deaths and injuries to so many. Newsweak's cowardly apology made me want to puke. To the editors and writers that allowed that piece to go to print I hope it haunts your memories forever. Why you are not rotting in prison I will never know.  Freedom of the press carries with it a responsibility to facts and is not a license for editors to print whatever they want.  One cannot scream "fire" in a crowded theater and then try to hide behind their first ammendment rights when there turns out to be no fire.The economists this magazine hires seem to have been kicked out of the London School of Economics for being even too liberal for their tastes. Hey, if you haven't seen the obituary from the 70's Keynesian economics is dead. The cause was failure to stand up to free market realities.Looking for credible and up to date articles in this publication is akin to watching scrambled porn in the hopes of seeing some skin. Even if you do see something it will be so distorted you won't know what it is that you are actually seeing.Do yourself a favor and get something else. The Economist, The Wall Street Journal, hell you will be better informed if you consult a Magic 8 ball, anything but Newsweak would be better. Well almost anything, in Newsweak's defense they do not normally subscribe to conspiracy theories or decry the so called corporate controlled media as do other journals of utter nonsense.This magazine is liberal propaganda disguised as journalism. The really sad thing is that people that read this think they are informed on world events.  Do yourself a favor and go to a newstand and read an Economist.  One warning though, intelligent writing and sticking to facts and reality is highly addictive.</review_text>
I decided that I had to write a review about Newsweek this morning, after I came across yet another biased, over-hyped cover story. This particular one is entitled, "Rethinking the Marriage Crunch," and goes back on everything they presented 20 years ago about a woman's chances of getting married later in life. This was undoubtedly very easy for them to do as they probably had no evidence for their assertion the first time around, and neglected to have any on this occasion. I really think another reviewer's comparison to People is quite apt, but Newsweek also provides a reliably pro-sexual revolution and pro-sixties counter-culture take on almost every issue. Two years ago, we were made privy to another bit of front page sensationalism concerning "Infidelity Chic." Yes, it seems, according to their sources, spousal cheating is all the rage even though they argue, without even a hint of contradiction, that everybody still wants to get married as much as ever before. I find the magazine to be [...] as they offer opinion instead of news; theirs is a mission of persuasion. Overall, there is little of which to recommend this publication as it is geared for a readership of trivial people who possess the depth of a kiddy pool.</review_text>
I would have to agree with the preivous comments that state that this magazine isn't worthy of its title. I subscribed before reading review, I was hoping to find an affordable psychology-based read, though some stories are interesting I'm sure I'd be able to find them in other magazines like Vogue or Cosmo. and there is plenty of ads, probably more than stories. And much like other reviewers When I first ordered it, it took forever for the first issue to arrive, now its more regular but my subscription will soon end with no renewal of course</review_text>
The latest Pshycology Today had to be trashed. The clinic treats abused women and incest and rape victims....LUST didn't go over well</review_text>
Psychology Today is just another Glamour/Cosmo/People disguised as a magazine discussing issues in psychology. This magazine used to be well-written and had more scientific data.  However, since the appointment of the new editor, headlines became similar to that of tabloid magazines all over. If you are interested in scientific data and research, this is NOT the magazine for you. I used to subscibe to Psychology Today but stopped renewing since I took more psychology classes becuase I found out that the magazine had no new insights to offer in the field of psychology at all</review_text>
Psychology Today purports to deliver the latest trends in psychological studies to the layman, but what it really delivers is pop psychology and a whole lot of advertisements.  I give the magazine one star for a very snazzy layout, and a second star for hiring writers that don't insult the reader's intelligence by abusing alliteration (unlike another magazine supposedly aimed at intelligent adults).  However, the content is consistently concerned more with pop culture than with the lives of real people.  I have also noticed a bias against introverts in article after article that attacks shyness as a serious character defect, rather than simply a personality trait (so, introverts, if you want to avoid yet another lecture on how your way of relating to the world is intrinsically wrong, avoid this rag)</review_text>
This is probably the best music/movie magazine out today. However, you can go to Borders books or Barnes and Nobles and get it for $8.95 or something. This deal is BS</review_text>
A Great Magazine.  I had a subscription for 2 years that ended about 6-8 months ago.  I paid $104 for the 2 year subscription back then, but suddenly the price in the US has skyrocketed astronomically.I can go to any music store or a Borders/Barnes and Noble and buy each individual magazine for anywhere from $8/issue to $9/issue typically, and I have never seen it more than $9/issue.  However, suddenly the subscription they have is like $13 an issue, which is outrageous.  It's not amazon's doing either, I was a subscriber for 2 years and this same thing happened to me.  They asked me to come back at a lower rate (something like $99/year), which is still $8.25 an issue.  Sure that's might be a bit cheaper (About 25 cents an issue on the average price above) than buying each one in the store, but I doubt anyone would want every single issue individually, especially at tthat price.The upside is that UNCUT is far and away the best music/movie magazine in the world.  I'd say about 60-70% of the issues I would have bought in the store when I was a subscriber.  But until they begin printing the magazine in the states, it's just not worth a subscription.The writing of the magazine is superb.  Brilliant and varied writing throughout.  Each magazine is about as big as a small book too, and of them I'd read a good 80% of the magazine too (Even finding myself reading some articles about artists I could care less about, because the articles were so well written), but the price is way too high to subscribe.It's a shame too.  Rolling Stone is nowhere close to being as good as Uncut, and although Mojo and Q are strong, they can't hold the candle to it either.THe only blemish on the magazine itself (for all you who might want to buy a single issue) is that the covers tend to repeat every 3-4 months, and I mean how much Beatles can I read (and I'm in the upper 5% of Beatle freaks out there).Still the magazine is well worth it, the subscription price is too incredibly high though to recommend in any circumstances.  I would think this would be a great market to move into in the US if I was in that position.  I don't think Rolling Stone could compete anymore.If it would make things cheaper, I would do away with the "free cd" bonus too.  Aside from a few listens and the novelty of it all (the free CD was a good incentive to make me interested a few years back), the CD's get old quick, and after a while I would toss them out after a quick preview.Summary: Wait until/if the price drops, but don't subscribe.  It's too expensive, and much cheaper to buy each magazine individually.  The magazine itself though is 5 stars and almost always great</review_text>
where are all of my magazine subscription first issues???????mar</review_text>
This is definitely the inferior rag of the big Trio of Science monthlies. Filled with poorly-written articles. I actually went back to Home Depot once to get a refund for this magazine. It is indeed worth the gas and time to get a refund if you actually pay for this magazine. This magazine promotes commercial products, and no I'm not talking about the advertisements, but the actual articles themselves. The magazine is not a news magazine, it is just one big advertising rag where manufacturers have paid to get in. If you like paying for ads, go for it</review_text>
they may have some good info, but i was flipping through this in my local bookstore, and most of what they have is a whole lotta ads... and within the ads a lot of scams and MLM schemes.buyer beware. :</review_text>
i got charged for this and havent gotten it. what bulls**</review_text>
I still have not received this magazine, what is taking so long !!</review_text>
Give me a break,people!All Spin Magazine is a cheap rip-off/wanna-be of Alternative Press.I've looked at like maybe ten OR less issues of this waste of printed material in the past as many years.Think I may've saved ONE of those issues.Sometimes,I'll find an issue left by an uninterested patron at the post office that's been left behind.I'll then take it home,then likely toss it out after I've looked through it twice.Avoid at all costs</review_text>
I'm sure that this review isn't unique.  Spin rotates the same ten bands on its cover, not to mention the ridiculous articles written within. By the time they get done describing the 'euro-punk-indie-pop artist that just slammed them in the face on their way to the train station with their jazzed up sound' I've completely forgotten the point of thier article.  They must have the greatest time just sitting around finding how many contradictory adjectives they can tag onto useless music and still manage to say nothing. They sound like cyber-nerds who need to get out a little more and stop getting thier info from mtv.com. I'm sure that i've learned more about what thier editors do in the office on any given day than anything remotely close to music while reading spin.  Next time you see it on the stands, I suggest you spin in another direction</review_text>
I got my first month(a horrible Green Day issue)and then nothing! Uh,what up? Its not that good of a magazine,I just want what I paid for</review_text>
"Spin" is an accurate name for something like this -- a lot of hype, for an innocuous but rather tepid rock magazine. If Rolling Stone is the dirty old geezer of rock magazines, then Spin is the teenager who tries hard to convince you he's cool by name-dropping the Strokes.Spin covers some of the same turf as Rolling Stone and Blender, but less lasciviously -- lots of coverage of popular bands. Some of them are quite good -- the Hives, for example, or indie newcomer Steve Burns (who quit his job on "Blues Clues" after hearing a Flaming Lips album, and reinvented his life as a rocker).Unfortunately they overemphasize whatever bands are hot at the moment, and then overemphasize them again -- as well as tacking them up in whatever "coolest"/"best" lists they chalk up for the year/decade/century/history of rock. Indie cred is maintained by a few half-page articles on potentially hot bands like the Comas and Metric, but this info is halfhearted. It's like they're reluctant to tear themselves away from articles on better-known bands, regardless of talent.The writing, however, has that certain affliction that a lot of major rock magazines have: the Need To Be Cool. Their writers always are trying to be funny, but rarely come across that way. It seems silly and strained, like a soccer mom wearing a spandex tube dress. Even the CD reviews are mediocre. However, one recent highlight is Dave Eggers' columns -- witty, funny, and a little bit skewed. In fact, they are often the best things in the entirety of the magazine.One of the problems is the emphasis on stuff in Hollywood. Scarlett Johanssen is a wonderful actress, yes. But she doesn't sing, nor has she appeared in a music-based movie -- Jack Black yes, Scarlett no. And what is up with party coverage on TV starlet Mischa Barton and MTV couples?Check out sublimely indie mags like Chord, Filter, Under the Radar and the online Kludge for in-depth looks at some worthy bands. As for Spin? It's still trying to convince us it's cool, but Eggers is the only regularly cool thing about it</review_text>
Spin will do anything to try and stay hip. I wanted to gag when i saw a picture of blink 182 in their &quot;tribute&quot; to kurt cobain mag. Im a huge nirvana fan and the only good thing about those articles were the pictures. they were poorly written and dull. they didnt even scrape the surface of kurt's music, and his impact on an entire generation. i suggest maybe guitar world or anything other then spin..</review_text>
Love to review History Today, but haven't seen a copy yet.  Any ideas</review_text>
Why? Because it underestimates our intelligence! It has nothing to do with natural health. It has to do with advertisements. It is empty, completelly. More: it looks like a woman magazine but I believe that a clever woman would feel like I feel now, angry! I paid for something that I believed but it is not. OK, we make mistakes</review_text>
Wasn't worth the subscription. I found the magazine to be bland, full of ads and basically boring. All the information can be found doing a quick web search. Highly Disappointed</review_text>
I loved this magazine in 1995, until a few years ago.  They have changed editors a few times and now it is not even worth reading the ads.No new information.  Glossy pics of models with bright red lips.  What is about health here?Get Life Extension magazine and Alternative Medicine Magazine.  They've changed too over the last few years, but still a far sight better than this one</review_text>
IT HAS BEEN SEVERAL WEEKS AND STILL NO MAGAZINE FROM MONEY!!!!OH YEAH BUT THEY DID REMEMBER TO BILL MY CREDIT CARD IN A TIMELY FASHION....MAYBE WHEN SOMETHING TAKES OVER A MONTH YOU SHOULD BILL THE PERSON WHEN  U SHIP THE PRODUCT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
Nice cover pictures and headlines, but way too many ads.  There's a reason its only twelve bucks, this is an ad-sponsored mag</review_text>
i send away for a 2 year subscription,they sent me a 1 year sub,i wrote 5 letters,sent copies of bank cheque and order form,emailed them,no response,they could care less,what more can i do ?</review_text>
I have been a subscriber for a few years and have found alot of the articles repetitive and not all that educational. Recently I have subscribed to Shutterbug which is a much better magazine for both the novice and professional photographer. Its articles are insightful and even after many years they still can teach this old photographer a few new tricks !!!!</review_text>
This definitely a magazine for gearheads.  It's pretty much just equipment reviews and advertisements.  I would have given it a higher rating but for two things:1) I don't think I've ever seen Popular Photography not LOVE any piece of equipment.  The reviews can still be useful if you're just wondering what features the new gizmo has, but still, they ought to be a bit more critical if they're going to be such a review based magazine.2) Many of the ads are from vendors with bad reputations.  I believe they make some sort of claim about requiring a certain level of honesty from anyone they sell ad space from, but it sure doesn't look like they have ever kicked anyone out of the magazine to me.So what do you have when you have a magazine full of uncritical reviews, the occasional beginnerish article about technique, and a lot ads from stores of dubious virtue?  At best a 2 star magazine</review_text>
Don't pay Amazon $34 for this subscription when you can get it directly from National Geographic for $15</review_text>
Esquire is a subpar Men's magazine, in my opinon.  More than half of the magazine is advertisements, and when you finally get to the articles they are rarely entertaining and/or thought-provoking.  If you like ads and cologne samples, pick it up.  After all, it is pretty decently priced</review_text>
This magazine is just one more reason why women think that men are immature, stupid, and boring.  The magazine does nothing but highlight and impress upon the superficial tendancies of men and in its so-called news coverage gives short details of events and people that doesn't even begin to scratch the surface of good taste.  Don't bother</review_text>
The writing seems to have come from under-educated teenage males who try too hard to look and sound cool.  I wasn't sure if I was reading a magazine or viewing an internet chatroom filled with juveniles.  This magazine isn't for men, it's for boys.However, the one star is for the photos of the women which, we can't deny, both men and boys can appreciate</review_text>
I've at various times subscribed to Stuff, Maxim, and FHM magazines.  Stuff was the only one I ended up not resubscribing to.  It has its moments and the photography is fine.  I would describe it as Maxim's younger brother.  It's whole attitude seems to be like the younger sibling of the popular kid in high school, and this kid then tries to be hip by being just as funny, etc., but it is forced and very juvenile.  It just is snarky and predictable after awhile.  On the other hand, I'm not 21 anymore either, and maybe if I was in my 20's I would find this the height of humor</review_text>
Haven't received this item.  It has been almost 2 months</review_text>
I was told this magazine was good to look at for design ideas. It isn't really, and there isn't really that much to this magazine.  It is just another tired old AOLTimeWarner publication, just like Time, People, or Teen People.  I looked at the August and September issues and the only things in those two that impressed me were the features on Elton John's Out of Africa fundraiser and the article on Julian McMahon.  The rest of it was ads, and not the classy type ads that make the advertising tolerable in Vogue magazine, but the same old ads you'll see anywhere else, and they are annoying.  There were several nonsense fashion articles with the likes of Kelly Ripa (post excessive Photoshop airbrushing tools-one of my professors would call it "plastic person syndrome") Mark Consuelos, waay too much on Jennifer Garner and her baby, and other weird things, such as the trend of designer cupcakes.  I wish I was kidding on the latter, but I am not, nor do I have $25 to spend on a glorified cupcake just because it is Jessica Alba's favorite.  There was entirely too much dress/act/eat/shop/play this way because the stars do it that way in here.  Despite the size of this magazine, there is very little to sink ones teeth into, just way too many photos of the same old same old, and tips for mimicking them.  I am NOT interested in becoming a Teri Hatcher clone, nor am I interested in seeing Vanessa Carlton's pad.  This magazine is for you if you like excessive ads, no diversity, a subscription that is actually not a year (it says that special issues count as regular issues in the magazine) and your life's ambition is to try a cupcake from a bakery in New York because some celebrity did.  This magazine is mediocre at best, and the worst part is, it has the exact same fashion advice as Vogue.  I went with Vogue because there is substance in their magazine, and the ads are classy and very chic.  Leave this one behind-it looks to me like another brain fluff read from the folks at AOL Time Warner.</review_text>
This mag needs a new editor. I haven't seen anything interesting in Better Homes for six months. Maybe they are spread too thin with their website and contests</review_text>
This magazine is a waste of money and bores me.  Nothing here to see but ads</review_text>
I subscribed to BHG from their website and ended up subscribing to an additional year.  The articles are helpful to a degree but the layout of this magazine, with its overwhelming amount of advertising, takes away from any good points.  I've found the style to be choppy and very difficult to read because of the ads.  It's hard to tell how long an article is or where it starts.  I rarely find anything I'd want to save.  Overall a disappointment</review_text>
Bad journalism and plenty of adds....if you like to exoticize Black people then this is your mag.....Nothing to be gained here except maybe the cost</review_text>
I'de have never read Vibe in the first place, but i won a free years subscription in some online contest.  And i must also mention i'm a huge fan of hip-hop and hip-hop culture, so i'de think Vibe would be tight.....daamn, was i ever wrong.  First off, half the mag is Advertising....then what little reading there is....it's all bullsh**.  The interviews they have with artists are totally weak & watered down.  They never ask any worthwhile questions.  Vibe also contradicts itself constantly.  In one issue, they'll give an album a low rating & a poor review, then at the end of the year they name that same album one of the years best....what the f***?  Vibe has it's decent moments, but i def. won't be paying for it anytime soon.</review_text>
I started reciving Vibe magazine in the mail announced and unexpected. This wouldn't be the first time this happened, turns out my Grandmother bought me People magazine as a gift and the copies were sent to my house. I figured that somebody had got me this magazine as a gift. Next thing I know a charge for the magazine appears on my bank statement.I called Vibe immediately and asked them what had happened. They told me that there was nothing they could do and that their company didn't directly deal with the payment issues and subscription services. They gave me a toll free number that I was too call from an outside company that handled the payments. When I called this company, it was completely automated service, could not speak with an actual person regardless of what extension I used.I eventually had to go down to my bank and find out what I could do. Turns out Vibe had illegally gained my bank account number and had been charging me for months, but I had only just recently started to recieve the magazine. I had to close down my checking account and open up a new one, which resulted in me being charged by my gym and other other companies that had access to my account in order to subtract monthly bills. It was as if I had written them a bad check, something that I had never done in my life and now greatly questioned my credibility.Please do not support these people, they are theives and on top of that the magazine is terrible and uncredible. I seriously hope that my review will help deter any and all people from subscribing to this magazine</review_text>
If I could give it a zero or negative rating I would.  When VIBE was introduced, it was a relevant, interesting magazine that exposed me to new alternative, r&b and hip hop artists.  The mag featured all kinds of artists not just who's hot right now, it also featured hard hitting expose articles that were relevant to not only the hip hop community but the world.Lately I've noticed that it's nothing more than a fluffy version of The Source.  I hate a lot of new rap music that's out and didn't appreciate mags with rappers I dislike on the cover. And is it me or does it seem like since Mimi took over, all of the female r&b singers' covers and stories are HORRIBLE (we won't even discuss that disgusting Brandy cover)!This magazine SUCKS now and the only time I check it out is while I'm in line at the grocery store.  Yes, the subscription rates are cut to the bone now but that is because the quality is supremely lacking.  I'd advise the curious to check issues out at newstands or where ever before wasting your hard earned money on a subscription</review_text>
Where are the critiques? The articles lack any critical substance. Whoever is hot at the moment will get their behind kissed. It doesn't matter that the album is usually not worth all the hype, VIBE will go along with the flow. On top of that, there are more ADs now than ever before. Even articles that could have been decent are cut down to a page or so for the sake of saving advertising space.</review_text>
i wouldn't know if this was a good magazine, i have yet to receive it, after waiting three months.  it is cheaper to order through food and wine website anyway</review_text>
The editor's gratingly smug and breezy monthly letter sets the pace for this vapid Lifestyle magazine, which you'll enjoy only if you're like her -- rich, creepily entitled, self-absorbed, and interested merely in the accoutrements of opulent dining, but not really food or actual cooking itself.</review_text>
I subscribed to Food &amp; Wine for a while and was continuously disappointed. The articles are on the superficial side and more importantly a lot of the recipes and product reviews are not as well researched as they should have been. I experienced more than one flop trying their stuff. The magazine tries very hard to be trendy and pick up the latest and greatest in the cooking and restaurant scene without being careful enough in deciding what is actually an important or meaningful trend rather than a fad. This magazine can't hold a candle to &quot;Bon Appetit&quot; or &quot;Gourmet&quot;</review_text>
I ordered a subscription for my step-son and a gift for a niece at the same time.  They took my money and both of the ONE-YEAR subscriptions I paid for only resulted in ONE ISSUE to each child.  I couldn't get any more information on the magazine, as we never received any more informaiton until I got an e-mail from Amazon asking me to renew.I noticed another recent post with the same problem.  The magazine was really great, and my step-son and niece both waited and waited for their next issue which never showed.How disappointing.  I wouldn't take the chance if I were you.LD</review_text>
This magazine consistently encourages parents to spend more than $100 on babya outfits, etc.   It is not a magazine for most of America, but rather for the elite, or those who wish to pretend they are.   There are way too many ads, and insignificant articles.   Parents magazine is hands down the winner in this category.</review_text>
[...] I got a choice of a free subscription to either Parents or Child magazine. Since I already got Parents, I chose Child. I will not be renewing when my free subscription is up. The magazine is boring, the articles irrelevant and there are too many kids fashion pages. If you want a magazine about parenting/kids, go with Parents.</review_text>
I subscribe to Parents, Parenting and Child magazine and will renew all but the one to Child. It's full of ridiculous fashion spreads (like I'm going to spend $50 on a t-shirt for my 15-month old), useless travel information and near-advertising features on the newest, most expensive items I 'need' for my child. The actual articles are no better or worse than what's in the other mags, and I don't find there's nearly as much information in the magazine as in the others.As other reviewers have said, it is beautiful. However, it's thoroughly impractical unless you're one of those people who plan to shop at Neiman's for your child...not that there's anything wrong with that</review_text>
As a professional photographer, I think the organization that publishers this magazine has truly lost their way.  The images are predictable and unimaginative and haven't changed in the past 25 years.  There are much better magazines to read</review_text>
I bought the magazin on november, and I don't recive it yet</review_text>
As a child I remember finding this magazine at my doctor's office and reading it because it was the only thing available. It has not changed much. There are no redeeming features to make up for the dated and patronizing content. This Magazine will neither stretch your child's mind nor keep him entertained. It only teaches the child what he already knows and feeds him what he has already seen. In the coming era of global connection, children must become aware of other parts of the world and lifestyles alien to them. Only telling them what is already common in their everyday lives helps to foster racism and xenophobia</review_text>
I ordered this magazine a year ago, and my nephew still haven't receive a single magazine!  Every time I email customer service they would tell me that it's coming next month.  I will let you how the magazine is when I get it, but don't hold your breath.</review_text>
During the 1960's, when my sister subscribed to AHMM, the stories mirrored the fantastic television show; the stories were primarily mysterious, creepy, and unique, with lots of murders and the twist endings that made the show so great.  Now, the majority of the stories in the magazine are plain, uninteresting "detective" stories.  I subscribed up until about the early 1980's, but stopped because of the same old boring "cops and robbers" material.  I tried to read a recent copy while waiting for my aunt at the beauty shop, but switched to one of the media rags instead when discovered that AHMM hadn't changed. Subscribe only if you are a fan of pure "police" fiction</review_text>
Sure I like a mystery- who doesn't? But when you a read a magazine like Hitchcock you end up losing faith in the short mystery story. The tales are hard-edged and lacking in style and substance. We seem to have a wealth of mystery writing talent but time and again Hitchcock Magazine is a disappointment. The value for money is horrible, the magazine is printed on newsprint paper and the ink just needs to be touched to smudge- Alfred Hitchcock would not be proud</review_text>
I ordered the magizine subsribtion and when I ordered they told me it would take up to 6 weeks, So I went out and bought that months issue.  A few weeks later that issue came, which is understandable but they had sent me the previous month before that.  I hadnt even ordered my subsription that month.</review_text>
I picked up an issue of this magazine last week because I wanted to take the picture of the cover girl into my hair dresser. After I got it home, I opened it up to check it out and discovered it is the most brainless magazine I have ever seen. The articles read like something from "Teen Beat", yet it's filled with adult material. There were about 10 articles on "how to please your man" and "what guys like" and even a "sex workout". These articles didn't contain any "real" advice--just unintelligent babble. For instance, did any of you know that guys don't like it when you act unenthusiastic during sex? HMMM, crazy.Anyway, I don't see how anyone over the age of 16 could find any of this stimulating, and yet there are too many articles about one-night stands for anyone under 18 to read.But if you're still into taking quizzes and looking at "half-naked hunks" who have barely hit puberty, then this magazine is perfect. I would have given this magazine 0 stars, but unfortunately it's not an option</review_text>
If you're in search of a magazine for women that actually has worthwhile content then move on. There is nothing of substance in Cosmopolitan. Open the latest issue and you will find "sex tips that will drive your man crazy!!!" and "snag that cutie!!" galore. It's pathetic. And sophomoric.The sad thing is young women purchase magazines like this and want to emulate the fake lifestyles within that revolve around a) Looking for your "one true love" and by default B) How to achieve multiple orgasms with random sexual partners/boyfriends whilst on said search! And let's not forget inane question and answer spreads. Those are a hoot with such inquires as "my crack gets really itchy. What should I do?"No, this magazine is not my bible.This is another publication that deserves to be thrown into a furnace</review_text>
I was reading this magazine at work, and I consider it to be a trashy magazine. It only focuses on the sexual part of women, like if sex is the best thing in the world, because they had this article in which a girl was riding a taxi, and she thought the taxi guy was fine, so she unbutton her shirt and told the taxi guy to touch her breasts. And then she says it was the *best experience she ever had.I just cant believe they publish garbage like that, giving the message to women that its ok to undress yourself with a total stranger, who you dont even know.I prefer to read things that focus more on the inner heart, on the emotional, and spiritual side of things. And read books that will help me be a better person right now and the future, and throw away the garbage this society has</review_text>
Once thought of as a women's health magazine, Cosmo has taken a twisted turn into pointless redundancy. At one point, Cosmo seemed to be a must-have, along with water and oxygen.More and more lately, it seems that the magazine is posing the question "how can we survive on ONLY water and oxygen, and still be sexy while we do?" Ocassionally, a featured article faces the issues of things ranging from eating disorders to politics, but few and far between.They don't seem to realize that on the other side of the page for the eating disorder article, is a woman who wears a size 0 and is still unsatisfied with herself, thinking that she must conform to some "heroin-chic" fad.Fun Fearless Female - articles about real women who make a real difference - is great. It shines the spotlight on someone who not only is beautiful and successful, but has enough education and talent to succeed in the world, without needing a man. If the magazine featured more of these things, maybe it would be worth my subscription fee.But tell me when the last time is that you saw a cover NOT featuring the phrases "mind-blowing sex", "how to satisfy (insert breathing life form here)", or "barely-there", which seems to refer to not just underwear anymore, but EVERYTHING.This isn't a magazine about women's health anymore. It's all about how to keep your man happy, while still conforming to social standards in fashion, weight, and financial standings. I'm sorry, but the "girl on a budget" can't afford a $430 skirt, or uncomfortable shoes with the uncomfortable price of $300+.Cater more to the real woman; not the one who only cares about her relationship status, pant size, and bank account</review_text>
I made my subscription in january 23, and it said shipped february 2 2007 and Im still waiting for it! today is March 19 200</review_text>
I looked at Intermezzo in a bookstore, and my husband purchased a subscription for us because it looked like a great cooking magazine.  Beware, beware, beware!  I received a total of 2 magazines and repeated promises that others were on the way.  R. Tully is great about responding to emails.  It's a shame the magazine doesn't show up as promptly, if at all.  I recommend Cooking Light.  It is a fantastic magazine with lovely recipes and incredible customer service.  They replace missing issues and do everything in their power to make the customer happy</review_text>
Great magazine but beware of subscriptions.  My subscription was paid for back in August '06 and I have yet to see a copy (January '07).  Their customer service have assured me twice that they would send out my magazines but nothing ever arrives.  Plus, the phone number they provided is not in service!  Its a shame because the magazine looks to be really well done</review_text>
After reading the reviews and description, I have ordered Intermezzo for a relative for two years. They were too polite to tell me that they have only received four magazines (one a duplicate) in that time period and haven't been able to get the magazine's customer service to correct the problem. It doesn't feel good to give a gift that ends up being a pain to the recipient and they still don't have it. Take a pass</review_text>
It is a shame that such a good magazine lacks so much in customer service.  I subscribed  in 2005 and only received one (1) issue which was informative, well structured  and beautifully illustrated.  When i e-mailed the company to find out what had happened with the rest of my subscription,Roseanne Tully's (CEO & Publisher to Intermezzo Magazine) response to my inquiry was that the next publication would be sent immediately and that "the rest of the 6 issues would be delivered even if it takes more than a year".  To date, i have not received a single issue since i made my complaint in March nor have i received a refund.If you're a foodie as myself, and like to keep up with the trends in the culinary industry;  what good is it to subscribe to a publication that takes your money and does not deliver or delivers outdated magazines</review_text>
I subscribed to Hobby Farm and after reading two issues I cancelled it.I read an article in the March/April issue about show birds. Then, I got my May/June issue. Don Schrider, the Communication Director of ALBC, wrote in to correct the story. The article claimed "over 1000" birds at the show, the correction was 11,640 birds were present. The other correction was regarding earlobe color and egg shell color stating there are exceptions to the red earlobe/ brown eggs white earlobes/white eggs.In the Mar/Apr issue I read an article about Guinea hens. In the May/June issue I read another letter from a reader (Dana Manchester a member of the Guinea Fowl Breeders Assoc.) correcting the article in the previous issue. Apparently, Guineas aren't the "watch fowl" they are portrayed to be, but fall victim to predation often. Dana Manchester also corrected the mislabeled photos of Guineas.These may be small errors but how goods is a resource that isn't reliable?If errors were the only issues, I may have given the mag 3 stars but the article on manure management in the May/June issue was lacking on many levels. The advise in a nutshell was buy a manure spreader that you can pull around your field, fill'er up and drive. One word of caution according to the article- only use well rotted manure in the garden, but there wasn't one word on how to rot manure.I liked the article about smaller breeds of cattle, "Bigger is Not Better" May/June but we'll have to wait for the next issue to see if any readers step forward with corrections.I am not waiting around.There are a lot books and magazines dedicated to small farms. I like Mother Nature News and I just subscribed to Countryside (my nephew recommended it he owns a small farm, as well). I also like John Seymour's book Self-Sufficient Life and How to Live It. He has an upbeat attitude with a can-do spirit.</review_text>
(Pseudo)Scientific American's treatment of Lomborg's "The Skeptical Environmentalist" is nothing short of disgraceful. With this blunder, SA has seriously damaged their own credibility and exposed how politically motivated they really are. It is indeed sad that "science" has come to this. Please visit greenspirit dot com for more information on their bully tactics when faced with what should be openly embraced in science: dissenting opinion. I guess that by making increasing sensational and apocalyptic claims about the environment they think they can sell more magazines - clearly on this point they are right, which is why the magazine's title, "Scientific American", is indeed fundamentally ironic."Scientific American is behaving in a manner that is both unscientific and un-American. They should be promoting the free exchange of ideas but instead they are threatening scientists with lawsuits for daring to question their opinions. This reflects the unbridled conceit that permeates the extreme environmental movement today. They are convinced the world is coming to an end and no amount of facts or statistics will sway them from their self-righteous dogmatism."- Patrick Moore, co-founder, Greenpeac</review_text>
this magazine is almost as bad as consumer reports. their comparison tests never adhere to their thesis about what the tests is measureing, for example a comparison test is said to be about quick acceleration and on point handling and then the car with the lack lust performance in handling and acceleration would be #1 in ranking. often, the car reviews are always mentioning information about a car that isn't relevant, or doesn't make sense, or the review isn't consistent with the posted viehicle stats. the magazine also seems to be biased. some vehicles are criticized with more irrelevant information than others to say its awful. after further reading of many issues, you would think they are playing favortism towards certain brands or recieving kick backs from manufacturers, for example, you will always see the domestic brand being referred to as basically "trash" and a japanese brand or a BMW is always the way to go, when once again the posted stats and sometimes photos say different.this is more noticeable when you can predict the out come of their reviews. ultimately, its a bad guide towards getting any  information on automobiles period. its the pat robertson of auto magazines. if it were possible, i woudln't even give this magazine 1 star.</review_text>
This magazine is not for the average car buyer.  They might as well call this the Robb Report.  They only test highend cars and the "best" ones are the ones that go 0-60mph the quickest, not ride nice or get good mpg</review_text>
I do not who to contact on this problem but I have as of yet to recieve a magazine yet. I kow it is to take awhile but i have recieved other order of a  different magazine I placed</review_text>
This magazine has great covers and gets your attention right away. I was was drawn to the cover because it claims to have great article inside, but the articles are very short and pointless. It was a good magazine few years back but now it just seems like they don't know what their doing</review_text>
I never received this product so I can not review it.  I ordered it through AMAZON.COM and they never sent the magazine.  DO NOT ORDER MAGAZINES THROUGH AMAZON.COM.  I called customer service and being re-routed several times I finally spoke to a customer service agent who said the magazine is on its way. That was two weeks ago and I still have not received any copies of the magazine.  DO NOT ORDER THROUGH AMAZON.COM.  Order all magazines directly through the publisher or any other way.  AMAZON.COM was a terrible experience.  If I ever recieve the magazine I am sure the first issue will show that I started receiving the magazine at the order date so I will have to fight with them to have my subscription end with the my first delivered magazine</review_text>
If you are looking to do major renovation work in rooms of an older house, then this magazine will give you some ideas, before and after pictures, etc.  There is precious little about minor jobs, improvements and fixes you may make on an older house.  There is a lot of showcasing new and expensive top of the line stuff.   My needs are more simple.  I want information on fixing and improving things in my house.  I am not a professional contractor.  For the major stuff, I will hire someone.   I have subscribed for three years but find that there is only one or two pages in each issue that can help me.  Their TV show "Ask this old house" is much more informative.  For magazines, I am going to try "Family Handyman" magazine instead.</review_text>
This is a magazine for paid product-placement in articles, tons of ads, and so-so articles.  You are paying for the name, and getting much less in return.I HIGHLY recommend Fine Homebuilding instead of This Old House.  You will not only see fabulous new and old construction, but actually take something away from it (that is the point behind magazines, right?)  A magazine that actually saved me money!I'm cancelling my subscription to T.O.H. and adding another year onto my Fine Homebuilding subscription.  It's money well spent</review_text>
What can be said? The show sucks and the magazine is just an ad for it! Wow, that's impressive. Just makes you wonder how much money the "This Old House" folks are swimming in, doesn't it. Yep! Look at all the 1-star reviews. Doesn't that signal you not to buy it? Doesn't it?LOCAL CRAZY MONKE</review_text>
I had, repeat had been reading this magazine for ten years or so. Over that time they have really changed. I guess it started when they got a new editor four or five years ago. After that the adds changed from building suppliers to lexus ads. I don't like seeing automotive and home stereo ads in my how-to magazine. The information is more akin to Martha Stewart than it is Norm Abrams. Who by the way is hardly in there anymore if at all. Not to mention the new guy, A stray they picked up from ask this old house, what an opie taylor he is. What makes him eligible to write something for TOH magazine. I really miss Steve Thomas. The how-to's though somewhat informative really lack the intricate details. All I can say is thank god Tom Silva still puts in some minutia of his wealth of information. If you'd like a "Better Homes and Gardens plus magazine" then this magazines for you if you want to learn something try Fine Homebuilding or at the least Family Handyman</review_text>
Vogue Knitting does not have customer service, strange as it sounds. I've bought subscription through Amazon and received 1 issue; I since moved to another state and all my magazines followed me except Vogue Knitting. All pleas, e-mails and other attempts to communicate with magazine failed - its been over 6 months and 2 missing issues and I still dont have my magazine; probably won't. On the other hand, why would Vogue Knitting worry about lonely subscriber whose money they long spent</review_text>
I ordered and paid in full (through Amazon) for a gift subscription to Vogue Kitting last Christmas, 2005. The recipient never received a single issue and was treated very poorly when she phoned to inquire on more than on occasion.It is a quarterly publication but no longer seems to be consistently offered on news stands in major bookstores. Read the policy regarding refunds and cancellations carefully before you give them your money!The content of the magazine may be worthwhile but their inability to deliver as promised and poor customer service earn them one star</review_text>
I ordered this magazine thru Amazon three months ago, and STILL haven't received a single issue.  I've emailed their subscription department to no avail.  They have my money, but i don't have a magazine</review_text>
It takes too much time to receive the first book.I haven't received the first book yet</review_text>
GD USA is a monthly magazine targeted at, and available free to, professionals within the graphic design community.  It consists overwhelmingly of promotional material - advertising, company profiles, personal profiles, and so on.  If you are not in the business, you will find little of interest here.  If you ARE in the business, you can get the magazine free from their website</review_text>
I agree with the others in that this magazine is too content-filled with the most irrelevant content! The copy is way heavy, but few true words of wisdom. It showcases VERY little work by other graphic designers so if you're looking to peruse the latest talent, definitely stick with CA or HOW</review_text>
This magazine seems to exist solely to promote their advertisers and their products. Their articles focus heavily on their sponsors and the ads far outweigh what little content there is. When they do focus on the best work of the design community, their examples are puzzling. They choose work that is often genuinely awful, and you rarely see any of the work that wins awards in other publications and award shows (ComArts, ADC, Graphis, AIGA, One Club).  While that would be admirable had they found other good work, most of the work they highlight is mediocre at best. There is a reason this magazine is free</review_text>
If they made a television station with nothing but commercials, it would be like this magazine.  Had the publisher been more forthcoming, they would have entitled it "RV Reviews" or something of that nature.  There is little in this magazine having to do with actual camping.  It's almost exclusively RV articles.  I'm not opposed to RV camping (I rather enjoy RV'ing too) but I was under the impression that it covered tent camping as well.  It does precious little of that!  The most unacceptable portion of the magazine is the fact that it's just pages and pages of ads for RV's and RV-related items.  I wouldn't even recommend this to an RV owner as there just really aren't all that many articles here.  The few articles they have are pretty good, but not great.  Look elsewhere for a good camping magazine.</review_text>
Although 'Camping Life' does contain a nice article or two each issue, the thrust of the magazine seems more to be a showcase of nice big campers/RV's rather than the experience of camping and related camping activities. I subscribed sight unseen from the boy next door who was selling subscriptions for school. I will definitely let this subscription lapse. There's just not enough love of camping and the outdoors in the magazine. However, if your camping interests run more to great big RV's and all the related gear, you might find some value here that I did not</review_text>
I ordered this as a gift for my neice for Christmas.  It's June, and she has yet to get a copy.  I called them in March, and they verified they have her correct name and address in their computer.  I'll going to ask for a refund</review_text>
I ordered in November and I am still waiting to receive this item</review_text>
Don't get me wrong..I love the two hard cover books, Real Simple Solutions and Real Simple: The Guide to Organized Living. They are gems. However, the magazine simply betrays it's words. As one rater stated, it seems like the reader is cajoled into buying un-needed expensive products, and my god..the magazine is cluttered with ads and inserts, plus it is very hard to turn the pages and read. I realize ads are necessary, but this is extreme, especially for a magazine that supposedly promotes a less complicated and cluttered life for it's readers</review_text>
This magazine should really be titled &quot;Better Living Through Buying Stuff.&quot; It's beautifully designed but during the course of my subscription, the only important thing I've learned is how to fold a sweater. I will not be renewing</review_text>
Calling all Brighton Mums!  This magazine presents a relatively contrived viewpoint on contemporary interior design, smothered in advertising for crisp, white bed linen and pressed quartz bench tops.  A pretty lousy effort as Australia's top selling interior design magazine.  Though designed for the wealthy mainstream Brighton market, Vogue Interiors will satisfy anyone who doesn't quite know what the colour brown will &quot;work&quot; with.   VI's current editor is David Clark, Art Director is Anna Utzon and Interior Design Editor is Matt Page</review_text>
I ordered this magazine on 10/7/06 (over three months ago) and haven;t received a single copy yet!!! STINKY SERVICE!!</review_text>
It's almost as if this magazine writes it's stories 2 mounths in advance onces you get the "latest" copy it's news that has been repeated 7961,583 times . It does however have decent posters (that's why it got a 2 and not just 1) but thats about the only thing that this magazine has to offer.</review_text>
I don`t like this magazine. It is so boring. The gossip is lame and dry, and it`s basically a mag for tweens to say OMG, ANOTHER HD poster for my room!! There`s hardly any real pages, just regular old posters. Teens, beware- you will be disappointed and totally bored. This is a magazine for girls aged 9-12. Strictly for tweens</review_text>
This magazine tries hard, but its quality is perhaps the lowest in the woodworking magazine field. Photos not lighted well, illustrations lacking in detail, and lots of rambling text pretty much sums it up. The annual tool issue is a wasted issue IMHO</review_text>
Knitters take note:  I purchased what was titled as "Anna:Burda Knitting & Needlecrafts-English Ed".  What arrived was "Anna Needlework and Crafts," which contains very little knitting.I should have looked at the photo of the magazine cover in the ad, which displays the Needlework & Crafts cover.  Since I can't find the magazine conveniently in my North Mississippi area I'll shell out another 50 bucks and order from the publisher, I guess.</review_text>
i too have stacks of organic gardening and farming. i love to go back and visit Robert Rodale.  Too bad it has become a political bullypulpit. I would not subscribe again with out a major change</review_text>
I have read and subscribed to Organic Gardening (and Farming)since mid-70's but dropped my subscription in and around 2000. I pick up an issue now and then in newstands, just to "check in" and hope for a return to the "good ole days". The publication used to be superior (find old issues in a library to see the what I mean - especially the 70's) and gave tons of information to all levels of gardeners (some issues used to have 100's of pages, almost all text - though in a smaller format). I still have old copies and to this day find inspiration in those articles. Now its just LARGE glossy pictures, sparse writing, reduced page counts, basic gardening info/lists and more than a dose of Maria Rodale's opinion/politics. I guess their surveys/advertisers tell them this is what "organic" gardeners want...but I would bet Robert Rodale (who edited the mag back in 70's and early 80's) would be upset to see how his daughter has screwed up the magazine. Save your subscription and read the old ones at a library. Yeah...the varieties will be out of date (that's what a seed catalog is good for and/or seedsavers.org) but the info is pure "organic gardening"</review_text>
The magazine is not bad, marginal at best. To my surprise, I am now a member of a club. I also was surprised to receive the first of a series of gardening books (mine to keep for a small fee).Needless to say, the description for the magazine was not forthcoming with the additional items and obligations (mailing the book back, etc).All I wanted was the magazine. I don't like to feel like I was taken advantage of. Please pass on this one. THere are plenty of other good gardening magazines to order.</review_text>
After ordering this magazine it sems that I've got a gardening membership, which was okay I guess, but now I've got some book sitting in my office that I can preview for 10 days and decide to keep for the low low cost of only.....   you get the picture.  All I wanted was a gardening magazine.  If I wanted to join a book club or a gardening club than I would have.  I really feel like I was decieved by the discription of this magazine and now I get the joyful fun of returning items I don't want or getting charged for them.  Yeah!</review_text>
Unfortunately, I have not received the item.  It's been 4.5 weeks since I placed the order.  I am reviewing this a low star, it should not take this long to receive a magazine subscription</review_text>
I really enjoy how they illustrate and break down their lessons into different playing abilities.  Even though they break down the lessons into breaking 80, 90, 100, straight hitter looking for power or power hitter looking for accuracy, they are all very helpful. No matter what your playing ability, I think any golfer can take away a little bit of advice from the playing lessons.   Unfortunately, Golf Magazine seems to be a little weak on their travel side lately though; not really focusing on that perhaps due to the downturn in travel in recent months.  I wish they would focus on that a little more like some other magazines such as T&amp;L golf or The Golfer</review_text>
It takes too much time to receive the first book.I haven't received the first book yet</review_text>
This magazine is published by the same people that brought us Maxim.  So if you like Maxim, check it out.  If you don't: pass.  The pictures are slick, models are attractive, but there is little in the way of information on how to do it yourself or what was actually done to the bike.  It is basically a picture book.  If you are looking for technical articles, how tos or performance installs; check out Road Bike for metrics or Hot Bike or American Iron for Harleys and Victory's</review_text>
I haven't received my subscription to Sunset magazine yet.  I can't review the actual magazine, but I can say they are very slow at getting new orders out</review_text>
As is typical of many magazines, Sunset jams it to existing subscribers.  They offered me a "deal" to re-subscribe for 12 months for $29.95!  Here on Amazon, I can get two years (24 months) for $29.95.  Magazines need to understand basic marketing.  It takes a lot of advertising dollars (mailings) to get a new subscriber.  Once you have a subscriber it is easy to keep them if you treat them right.  Charging existing subscribers double what is offered to new subscribers is bad business</review_text>
If your into lesbians, sluts and mild porn than this is the rag for you. if your looking for a rag about american v-twins and babesthen go somewhere else ,cause your wasting your money with anythingeasyrider has its hands on. for this price I would buy Hustler or Penthouse.</review_text>
If you've read one "Cosmo", you've read them all. Do yourself a favor and check out "Glamour" and "Self" - you'll walk away happy, inspired, and hunting down the mailman for the next month's issue</review_text>
The magazine does have good information, but not for a child...it's more geared to an adult.  Watch out though!  They like to send you notices of collection if you do not renew the magazine when your subscription is up</review_text>
I also got this disgusting subscription "invoice" from these jerks. I don't care HOW GOOD A MAGAZINE IS, if someone has to use deceptive, threatening and totally bogus marketing practices to ensnare new subscriptions, their magazine should not be rewarded with anyone's business. I never ordered or got a single issue of their rag. Only a repeating smack in the face via mailbox claiming I am going to be "referred to a collection agency."  KIDS Discover, you will NEVER get a cent out of me. Last time I checked we still live in a land where we don't have to pay for what we never got. If you spent as much time working on a good magazine for kids as you do sending out fake bills, you would have enough subscribers you wouldn't have to Shanghai any new ones with your fraudulent billing scam.</review_text>
We've never received this magazine, but we just received the bill with a message that we are about to be turned over to a collection agency.BEWARE OF THIS COMPAN</review_text>
We had a subscription to this magazine and it's a pretty good one for the kids, albeit woefully thin. I found it too expensive for the few pages the magazine has and did not renew it. After ignoring the standard renewal pleas, yesterday I found in my mailbox a letter (with subscription invoice attached, of course) stating that my account was "seriously past due" and that "further action is pending" on my "delinquent" account. For those getting similar notices, I found this number to call:1-800-825-2821The lady I spoke with said she cancelled the 'unathorized order'...we shall see if I receive any other notices.It really is a shame that the tactics of the subscription services overshadow the actual product</review_text>
I just received a first-time correspondence from Kids Discover threatening referral to a credit agency for copies of a magazine that we didn't order and haven't received.  There is no telephone number to call and only a p.o. box to correspond with.  I suspect many people just pay the bill in order to avoid any trouble.  I sent a notice to the Consomer Complaint agency in the states involved in order to get this fraud on record</review_text>
This is not a rating of the magazine - just a warning to check your Wish List address if you "wish" for magazines.My son changed his address in his Amazon account when he moved 2 years ago within the same city. Amazon did not use this information to update his address within his Wish List. When I ordered $138 worth of magazines from his wish list last December, Amazon hid the street address "for privacy" - therefore I could not know the magazines would be sent to the wrong address.In November, I asked my son if he'd like to have these magazines renewed and he said he had never received any!After I spoke with Amazon, my son now gets a message when he goes to his Wish List that his address doesn't match the one in his account, so it's clear Amazon is now aware of this problem.The publisher will not redo this subscription for Luerzers, saying the magazines were never returned to them, and Amazon has not responded to my request for a refund</review_text>
The magazine has a broad range of patterns. Out of 1 year there are about 10 things I want to make.  Or I should say I wanted to make- Until I started on the first one.They have a high percentage of errors in the patterns.  One Issue had 13 out of 30 that had corrections.  The worst part is, they don't seem to post corrections until a reader has tried to knit the item and told them what was wrong. Which means that unless you want to do a lot of counting, calculating, ripping and reknitting, you have to wait until an issue has been out for 6 months and other readers have found the errors.I'm working on a cardigan that I plan to give to someone for Christmas, and have found 2 major errors so far.  No idea if I will get this done in time and when I get done if I'll have a cardigan or a layette!  One more error that causes me to rip it out and start over and I'll find a new pattern or make my own.  After spending $130 on angora yarn to make this gift, I'm not going to give up, but the renewal notices I get for the magazine are promptly thrown out.update- Still working on the cardigan, have pretty much had to start over and redesign the pattern on my own.  Still no correction online, but they have added many other corrections for other patterns from this issue. The Corrections sometimes are little, simple ones, but some of the corrections are a total rewriting of the instructions or charts!  I have thrown out all of the magazines so I don't get tempted to try another pattern from them</review_text>
I am not alone here when I say that Knit 'n Style is a joke to most knitters. Myself and my knitting friends agree that it's evidence that someone, somewhere, is seriously deluded if they think that these patterns are what the average knitter is yearning to make. I can't help but believe that if you can't get published in a worthwhile knitting magazine then you go to Knit 'n Style. Because, seriously, they'll take anything and try to sell it to poor unsuspecting knitters.Save yourself the money and flip through this magazine if you see it on the shelf somewhere. You may get lucky and find one pattern that's worth making in a single issue... but then again, you may not. I suggest Interweave Knits, Family Circle Easy Knits, or Vogue Knitting if you want patterns you'll actually want to wear.</review_text>
Don't waste your time even just simply flipping through this magazine at the newstand.  Trust me... there will be no worthwhile patterns (I mean... just look at what they choose to grace their cover!!!)I have stopped hoping for even a half-way decent pattern to come along during the two years or so.  I have seen litteraly only ONE knittable pattern in the last three years (December 2004 I believe it was... a lace cardigan with beaded trim).  Even the articles are pointless.  Save your time and money and get a subscription to Interweave Knits or Vogue Knitting.  Or opt for a new magazine (not available at all newstands in the US) called Simply Knitting, which is imported from the UK.It amazes me that this magazine is even still in production with how horible it is!!</review_text>
I hope I get program to receive it next monthPatty Jone</review_text>
I have about two to three years of Knit N Style (2001 - 2003)Magazines, and lately have spent a lot of time looking through them for a Cardigan Pattern to Knit for myself.  I haven't found a single one.  All of the patterns have serious faults: Drop Shoulders, (totally unacceptable) little or no armhole, neck and/or shoulder shaping. Most sleeves have little or no cap. And, worst of all, they are all made in five or more pieces. Haven't any of these &quot;designers&quot; heard of Elizabeth Zimmerman?  I was going to give the lot to the library, but am wondering if perhaps the trash might be a better place.  If you are trying to attract new knitters from among younger people, why don't you teach them the PROPER way to knit?  Young people are smarter than you think</review_text>
i sir still did not received anyFancy Food and Culinary Products magazine</review_text>
I have read Bird Times many times.  The articles are much less complicated than the Bird Talk magazine articles, which are fairly simplistic as well.  I recommend that you look at the cover and see if there are any articles that you want to read.  This magazine usually takes me 15-20 minutes to read, and that is if there is an interesting article.  Fewer ads than Bird Talk</review_text>
I have never gotten this product so it's hard to know how to rate it.  Wish amazon would send me things in a timely manner</review_text>
I've been receiving this magazine for almost 4 years now. It hasn't changed much since I started receiving it... and I pretty much still think of it as THE worst teen magazine that's still in business. I'm 16 now and haven't liked it anymore as I've gotten older. The strangest part about this magazine to me is the fact that they just keep sending it to me! I mean, I barely even remember when I was first subscribed to it (it was some kind of deal where you can get certain magazines for like 6 months or something, and I didn't have many choices so I picked this one). Eventually the other magazines stopped coming. But this one continued to come. And still does! I would have thought it might be nice if a company made an accidental error or something and continued to send me a magazine. I would have been thrilled if that happened with any other magazine (I actually don't mind Seventeen, Allure, CosmoGirl, TeenPeople occasionally, or even Teen Magazine.). But this one just makes me wonder if these people are downright stupid... the least they could have done is "accidentally" send it to someone who likes their magazine! If that person exists?I think I read a fairly broad variety of teen magazines these days, so I'll try to discuss my dislikes about it in relation to those.So this is a comparison of this one versus: Seventeen, Cosmogirl, Ellegirl (I suspect it recently went out of print however), Teen Magazine, Teen People Magazine, Allure, Cosmopolitan, and Jane magazines.1. Overall ValueConclusion:Teen Vogue= Very low value and overpriced.SMALLER SIZEFirst off, one of the easiest things to see about this magazine when its on the shelf is the fact that it's SMALLER then the others. All of my magazines are about the same size. Except for this one; which is maybe as much as 2 inches shorter in height and 1 inch smaller in width. I don't know why the magazine makers decided to do this. In my opinion, it only draws more attention to the fact that while it is around the same price as the other magazines... they had to cut out at least something to make it smaller. Sounds like a RIP OFF to me. (...but I'm getting it for free for some reason, so I guess that's hardly my biggest concern. It may be yours though).COST COMPARED TO CONTENTMagazine prices can be a little missleading at first glance. It's easy to find a thicker magazine and assume that MORE PAGES = BETTER VALUE? But that's not the case.The abundance of ads in a magazine can lead you to that conclusion, but there's a good chance you'll be disappointed when there are hardly any articles in between ad after ad after ad.By the way... for those of you who aren't familiar with teen magazines these days, I hope you realize: THEY ALL HAVE ADSThis is the truth, but I don't see it as a terrible thing personally. When I was 11 and I first found an issue of Teen Magazine at the library, I was shocked at the ad content. But I used to read American Girl magazine (which had no ads) so I thought it was so bizarre. Now I don't mind it. I even save some of the ads because I like photography and looking at different angles of things. I don't think it's fair however, to hate Teen Vogue solely because of the ads though, as all the magazines are going to have ads. The amount of ad content in each one is the main thing that varies; so here's my interpretation...Seventeen, Cosmogirl - Limited Ad content (They have more ads towards the beginning, and then they're much more spread out. Seventeen is probably my favorite magazine of the bunch and they manage to get by with one ad opposite of an article for a few pages and then a stop the ads for a few pages or so before they do it again. I find it highly tolerable)Teen Magazine - Even less Ad content. (I think they've really decreased the amount of ads over the years actually. They probably have the least ads of all my magazines)Teen People, Ellegirl, Jane - More than Seventeen and Cosmogirl but not terrible.Allure and Cosmopolitan = High ad content. (I almost put them seperately, but they are similar. They have a lot of ads I think, but for the most part, I don't mind. They manage to balance most of it out with enough articles and pictures to make buying the magazine worth while. The main difference I see is just in the choice of ads. Cosmopolitan puts in so many ads for sex related things and has many more vulgar ads. Allure I like more anyway. And I guess Cosmopolitan as a magazine focuses a whole lot more on sex already, so many teen moms may not appreciate their daughter reading it in the first place.)TEEN VOGUE = HIGH AD CONTENTI'd say the ad content was very similar to the ad content in Cosmopolitan and Allure. However, the thing that pisses me off, is the fact that there isn't enough content to balance it out! (Maybe I mean "meaningful content" but more on that later...). The saddest part about this magazine is that I save more of the ads then I ever save articles. The ads really are more exciting then the content unfortunately...2. ArticlesConclusionTEEN VOGUE = FLUFF FILLED, UNIMPORTANT TO MENow, generally, I consider Seventeen to have the best articles (with cosmogirl in a close second) along with maybe Allure although it's addressed to an older crowd.Reasons why I actually take the time to read the Seventeen articles, although I hardly even bother with the Teen Vogue ones:A. Seventeen writes about something that actually interests me (ok, ok, so occasionally they have a little stinker. But overall, I think they do a good job.)Teen Vogue... does not.I'm interested by things I haven't thought of before, or personal accounts of things that I would be unsure how to react to, issues that seem to happen everywhere but with stunning new facts enclosed and statistics to give me a perspective... etc. I could go on. But unfortunately, I don't think teen vogue has managed to intrigue me. Ever. A typical teen vogue article is something like "The Truth about Crystal Meth", "I was being bullied online!", blah blah. I can hardly even think of anything I've ever been interested by.They have a tendency to focus on things that I already know are bad, things like drugs especially. It makes me feel like I'm being babied... like "Hey, well I bet you didn't know this.... if you do this your liver could turn black and blue and all the colors of the rainbow" and then pile a bunch of tear jerking stories of teens who had "no idea" of the dangers of _____ drug and then something terrible happened. I mean I think it's important that teens see the dangers in doing such things... I just get annoyed rather than enlightened when it seems like such an easy and obvious thing. Particularly when they make a big deal about it being so "unknown" and mysterious like nobody has ever heard of it before, when I know that most of the people I talk to every day do anyway. If I don't take the freaking drug... I won't have to worry about all the problems associated with it, and sometimes it's hard for me to be sympathetic to these girls who screw their lives up (especially when in the article, they make themselves seem like complete idiots!). I'm not anti drug articles though either. When Seventeen did one a while back, for example, it was an article (or maybe more of a chart?) of "Drugs that make you Ugly". Now that I found enlightening and very interesting. It didn't focus on one drug, but instead on one effect that many different drugs cause. Not only do I want to use the drugs less, I also feel like I'm more able to recognize the signs of its use, so I could identify the signs. It's important to me that magazine editors take the time to teach us something new, without beating us over again with the same stuff we hear everywhere else. Teen Vogue just hasn't figured that out yet.B. I find the good advice in Seventeen meaningful. Teen Vogue... makes me wonder if I should be the one giving them good advice...I think I was most disappointed with Teen Vogue on this when they did an article that caught my eye about girls who are addicted to tanning. They spent nearly 2 whole pages rambling about different girls and their tanning habits (and general stupidity...). And BARELY even gave the reason why it's not a good idea. I remember reading one of the last sentences in my head over and over again. It was like "Remember to live your life and have fun, but try to be safe". I mean WTF??! You could be talking about anything with that. Cooking, driving, sex... it's so generic that it's stupid. The only thing that I got from that article was a justification that there really are a lot of stupid girls who are damaging their skin to be tan, and have no idea about it. Unfortunately, if these girls read teen vogue, they will probably never know either.3. FeaturesConclusionTEEN VOGUE = ...are you serious?Um. I can't find a better word than worthless to describe this magazine's features.I used to like the "A room of my own" thing that they had at the back of my issue. It was nice to be inspired by the way that other girls kept their rooms based on what they liked. But in the last year... I think they managed to totally kill that part too. The uniquenesses and interesting things that once intrigued me a little have been replaced by more mediocre rooms by other girls (lately they've been somehow connected to a famous person. yeah, how exciting... not) that just don't inspire me at all.Oh, and one of the second to last pages or so, there's a feature where they find some girl with "Style" and tell her to describe it and what brands she likes... blah blah. Occasionally (well, no, rarely), there will be something that I actually find interesting and want to save to remember. But most of the time it's just a bunch of 13 year olds trying to be trendy by throwing on the coolest things they know... all at the same time.No thank you.In most other magazines, I can appreciate a monthly space for something about hair, or makeup, or something related to beauty that I could find useful. Teen Vogue does not do this. But then again, everytime that I have seen them slip something along those lines in, they manage to make me question their intelligence. ("OMIGOD, Mom! Teen Vogue says I should put glittery pink eyeshadow up to my eyebrows so I can be cool. We have to go spend $67 now so that we can have the exact product that they used!" eek.) The makeup is useful... if you want to be a stage artist perhaps? I don't know... I'm still working on that one.4. The Fashion FocusConclusionTEEN VOGUE = FASHION HELP FOR THE EXTREMELY WEALTHY AND CONFUSEDIf you disregard the fact that virtually everything in the magazine is rediculously overpriced and just unpractical... I suppose someone might find their fashion sense useful/inspirational somehow. But I'm afraid I do not.I remember skimming through one article that answered a question asking "How do I avoid looking like a tourist on vacation?" to which they answered with showing how you can pile on a bunch of random clothing pieces and come off as an idiot instead. How exciting...They also have a tendency to encourage readers to buy things by showing us models wearing such clothing. I wouldn't be surprised if the plus-size community completely gave up on them, in fact I'm surprised that there is no outrage over this.Look teen vogue, I know Gemma Ward looks excellent in that (ok, I'm lying... but I can pretend, right?). But you see, me and Gemma, we have some differences. For example... Her thighs are probably less then half the size of mine, she's like half a foot taller then me, she weighs maybe half of what I do, and... well... she's a model that seems to look good in everything. I do not. And I refuse to let you convince me that such a hideous outfit won't look hideous on anyone else.Actually, I wonder if Gemma Ward could afford the things in their magazine. She's a super model afterall. But maybe after spending $150 on each pair of underwear... things begin to add up, even for her.Darn...The Bottom Line:Don't waste your money on this magazine (in fact, don't even get it accidentally for free like me, it's not worth your time). If you want to buy a teen girl a magazine subscription, try something like Seventeen, Cosmogirl, Teen People etc. Just about anything is better than this.</review_text>
I have not received the magazine yet and my daughter is pissed</review_text>
I ordered the magazine "All In" on October 10, 2006 for my boyfriend for a Christmas present it is now Jan. 15, 2007 and we still haven't received the magazine. My checking account was charged for these magazines the very day I purchased the magazines so........I payed for something 3 months ago and still haven't received them. I dout that I will purchase anything else from amazon.com on linePenny Stephen</review_text>
We subscribed to this magazine, in part due to the special offer of 12 free cycling booklets & road log with each new subscription.  What did we get?  A note letting us know that unfortunately "the gift described in the promotion is no longer available" and that "rather than keep us waiting, (they've) taken the liberty of sending the enclosed substitute..." The substitute?  A crummy little pamphlet.I let it slide at the time, but several months later they were still offering this special promotion, so I wrote a letter to customer service stating that "since they now had the special gift, perhaps they'd be so good as to finally send ours."  No response.Time came to renew and all of a sudden there was that offer again... so against my better judgement, we did.  And guess what!  Another note "unfortunately the gift described in the promotion is no longer available..."  and the same crummy pamphlet!In short, if you're interested in being lied to, or receiving a stupid little pamphlet, by all means subscribe... if you want what you paid for, go somewhere else.</review_text>
Multi page story on asphalt? WHO THE F@#K CARES!!!Skimpy and unfocused editorially. The only thing they're consistent about is the use of short punchy blurbs in different fonts and sizes. For example, they had Mari Holden on the cover of a recent issue promising pro secrets. What was her secret? My parents told me to use a helmet... And similar advice from other pros.Read CyclePlus magazine from the UK for an in depth, systematic approach to product review, ride routes(almost all in the UK) and a variety of short relevant articles that inform without dumbing down the issue. (OK. The two pages on yoga every month is a bit too much but they can get away with that becaause the magazine is so much fatter that Bicycling.</review_text>
Should I require more information on asphalt, I'll subscribe to the Practical Paving Newsletter, maybe attend the World of Asphalt 2007 Show & Conference.In the meantime, the "World's Leading Bike Magazine" has whet the appetite with a dozen-page spread on the stuff in their September '06 issue.On a positive note, the Giro helmet ad with Floyd Landis is sure to become a collectible</review_text>
So I'm mostly with other folks on the content.  If you get lucky, the small sampling of product reviews will include some item you're looking at (or should), and the anemic review will prompt you to follow up at the manufacturers website.  The "Buyer's Guide" was of decent breadth and useless depth on the bikes.  No bikes from Gary Fisher, the inventor of mountain biking.  Huh?  I'm primarily interested in MTB and the issues of Mountain Bike are good.  But, you only get 4 issues, and the content is redundant between the two magazines (or even within each mag).  For instance, the May MTB issue had a story on rebuilding trails in Los Alamos (I actually really like their reviews of specific places), and the cover also boasted a "Great American Trail Guide."   One of the FOUR trails talked about in this "Great American..Guide":  Los Alamos.  I can spot a cut and paste job when I see one.  Also in that issue "The Bike that Started a Revolution" about the Sp Stumpjumper.  A great idea for an interesting article that was butchered into a condescending comic strip.  Also, having ordered the mag for the issues of MTB, I was disappointed when they didn't even show up.  Emails with customer service resulted in one of the more disappointing "did you not read my email" type exchanges.  Two months later, and I now have one of the two missing issues in hand.  They have great photography, and I have yet to find a better option, but I'm really disappointed.  I won't renew</review_text>
Leading on what? Innovation, quality articles, coverage, reader satisfaction? No sir.Profit from advertising, volume sales, high percentual of biased articles? Most likely.Unfortunately, to boost profits Rodale press is up to anything, like rerun of old articles to save money and misleading "special advertising" sections. If you are into Mt. Biking, there are better magazines out there (Mountain Biking Magazine is not one of them, of course). If your thing is road biking, sorry, there is nothing else except racing magazines. As we know, America is about vehicles that waste energy, like high-powered cars, motorcycles and boats (just count the number of magazines about them next time you stop at your favorite bookstore)</review_text>
On the whole, Bicycling is a huge disappointment. I agree with some writers that the occassional tidbits of information are good, but I don't pay for a subscription for a sidebar or two -- I read those in the newstand. Further, as I will mention below, once and a while there is a real gem of an article.In the meantime, almost everything else they do is poor. The entire magazine is pitched at the readership as though we were all budding pros, training obsessively and fighting with that last 1% of body fat. The reality is, what Bicycling's readership principally is is rich -- in their own pages, they recently listed average household income of a subscription at $115,000. So it's not people with the ability tor ride like the pros ride, it's people with the ability to buy what the pros ride.The result is a majority of articles and reviews that focus on just this -- $3000+ bikes (and, as one reviewer said, the occassional review of more reasonably priced choices around $1500. Wait, $1500 is *not* chump change?!?!), advanced training and eating techniques, etc., as opposed to real world riding -- centuries and club rides, touring, commuting (gasp!), etc. Even it's racing coverage is terrible -- its recent spread on the San Fran GP, one of the three most important races in the US, was 6 pages of photos, 4 of which were of people watching the race, not the racing itself.For me, though, the worst part is its hypocrisy. In a recent issue, there was a truly excellent article on what the author called "Invisible Riders" -- low income laborers who depended on their cheap bicycles to get them to and from work sites everyday. Yet: the author mentioned several times (albeit with embarrassment) that he was riding a Seven while doing research on people whose lives depended on $100 bikes; the author commented on the significance of these riders commuting everyday, a movement which riders like Bicycling readers had never been able to mobilize (maybe because they all drive to work and the magazine does little or nothing to encourage bicycle commuting); and the five bikes reviewed in that issue ranged from $3500-$7000.Really, really sad. One star for "Invisible Riders" and the like, and that's it</review_text>
During the 1970s, Bicycling was a great magazine with lots of in-depth articles about bike tours, bike racing, and bicycle technology.  The magazine zoomed downhill through the 1990s into the worthless rag that it is now.  The articles in the current version of the magazine are very superficial and lifeless.  Many are thinly veiled press releases from various advertisers.  If you really want to learn about road bicycles and bicycling, a much better magazineis *CyclingPlus*.  For mountain biking, try *Bike* or *Dirt Rag*</review_text>
Having regularly read "Bicycling" for many years (even when it was called "Bicycling!" in a tasteless 1970s way), I find it surprising to see how much the quality of the magazine has declined. In spite of all those people spending huge amounts of money on fancy equipment, "Bicycling" has become thinner and thinner. It has recently improved somewhat, after most of the editorial staff was fired, and a sign is the dropping of the truly horrible marginal comments (Bike Love and so forth) but it is only suitable for real neophytes. Unfortunately, there is no other single magazine that covers racing, bike touring, test reviews, technique and fitness in North America, no matter how poorly. The articles are very short and sometimes, well, just stupid. There is very little on cycling destinations or serious equipment tests. The photography remains decent, but compared to the German magazine "Tour," for example, "Bicycling" is a pretty sad effort. If you can read this, you have access to the Internet, which means you have far better sources of information to draw on. I am letting my subscription lapse and advise you to save your money. A big disappointment, "Bicycling" has not advanced with its readers</review_text>
This overpriced magazine is for the weekend warriors who would like to start a new hobby. There is nothing wrong with this, we all started somewhere. However, one can only stand for so much of new tool ratings and how to build the same old challege-less pieces of furniture. Please don't waste your money. Try Fine Woodworking, woodworking, or even Popular woodworking. You will be greatful you did, and will be on the road to becoming an expert weekend warriors</review_text>
I have yet to receive my first issue and it has been over 2 months</review_text>
Unfortunately as this subscription has not yet started I am not in a position to comment or review</review_text>
This is not a rating of the magazine - just a warning to check your Wish List address if you "wish" for magazines.My son changed his address in his Amazon account when he moved 2 years ago within the same city. Amazon did not use this information to update his address within his Wish List. When I ordered $138 worth of magazines from his wish list last December, Amazon hid the street address "for privacy" - therefore I could not know the magazines would be sent to the wrong address.In November, I asked my son if he'd like to have these magazines renewed and he said he had never received any!After I spoke with Amazon, my son now gets a message when he goes to his Wish List that his address doesn't match the one in his account, so it's clear Amazon is now aware of this problem.The publisher will not redo this Communication Arts subscription, saying the magazines were never returned to them, and Amazon has not responded to my request for a refund</review_text>
Unless you want the Editor's liberal political views SHOVED down your throat, avoid this magazine.  It leans to the left so hard that you have to lie on your side to even read it.  (And no, I am NOT a Republican or Democrat, but an Independent who looks at all sides).  The Editor of this magazine has a huge agenda to get the Democrats back in power, he bashes Bush and the Republican party over the head with a 10-ton hammer on a monthly basis, yet worships eco-phonies like Laurie David and celebrities who want the rest of us to drive eco-friendly cars while they fly the world in their private jets. (I understand Laurie and her friends like Sheryl Crow ARE "trying" to wean themselves off this practice by cutting down on their private jet hopping trips a wee bit and using a huge gas guzzling bus that is criss-crossing the country instead, but that poor Laurie is finding this hard to give up.  What hyprocrites these Hollywood folks are!)  Though I am personally trying to do my bit for the environment, I hate when I read issues like the current "Green" issue where these so called eco-environmentalists really only want us "common people" to make the changes. This used to be a great fashion, entertainment and current event magazine with a lot of in-depth articles, but now it is only a political platform publication.  I now will just throw it away as soon as it arrives when I receive it, until my subscription expires</review_text>
I'm not sure how this magazine ever got the reputation for being more than the glossy fanzine it is. There's nothing wrong with celebrity mags, but this one has pretensions of so much more when essentially, it's about as deep as an E! True Hollywood Story about Kato Kaelin. I've tried many times, but alas, this one is sadly not worth the tree destroyed to print it</review_text>
Still have not received an issue yet. Please give me an update as to when the first one will arrive</review_text>
DO NOT order.  They only placed an order for 7 months but I got billed for 12.  After 3 hours on the phone they said that 7 months was all the publisher had available and they cannnot extend it.  After pitching a fit they offerred to give me a partial refund but cannot extend the subscription.  Only order from the magazine itself</review_text>
Loved the magazine, but after two years of it, the onslaught of mostly bare-chested men both in the mag and on the cover was too much.  Where are the women?  If it is targeting the gay audience, please say so.  Each month, I'd count the number of men vs. women photos and there are very few women.  Just unshaven boys.  Not my cup of tea, so my subscription hasn't been renewed</review_text>
(I sent the following letter to their customer service last week)After about 15 years of getting your magazine, I have decided not to renew my subscription. It is a shame that your once great publication has become such a joke.After receiving your November issue, and spending 10 minutes removing all the inserts and gimmick ads so I could actually read it, I found no substance. Instead there is a fashion section (yikes), a `hot list' with young barely dressed men and women (hey I'm not against a little sex and skin, but I'll subscribe to Vogue or Maxim for that), an article about Larry David's wife that might as well have come from People magazine, an Aussie travelogue that I am convinced their tourist board paid for, all sandwiched in between so many ads for monster SUVs and other crap that you need a compass and a map just to keep up with where the articles worth reading continue from one page to the next.What happened to the great writers like Krakauer? What happened to having any environmental conscience? Where are the stories of adventure that are real and make you want to go there? Maybe I am just getting older than your current demographic. I haven't lost my sense of adventure, which is why I live in Durango CO and spend a lot of time outdoors. I used to look to your magazine for inspiration. Now I half expect the cover to tout stories on `killer abs'. You've become the Clear Channel of the outdoor magazine world.Get real again and I may come back</review_text>
I'm not sure who's at the helm of this operation but I'd be willing to bet they don't get Outside too often. Not to be too cynical about it, but I just don't find this mag to be as USEFUL as it was before. If you like LOTS of articles on who the coolest extreme sports stars are, how they got their abs, and what gear they're wearing, subscribe NOW. The magazine looks amazing, the photography is top notch and they still manage to come up with a thorny article on the environment periodically. But for my money, it just feels like the editorial staff has been plucked from New York image mags that do one thing really well - SELL. I read National Geographic Adventure, and unlike Outside, I USE IT for information because it has CONTENT</review_text>
This used to be my favorite magazine, but now it's just ad after ad after ad.  I go outside to get away from it all, and I like to read about climbing, biking, hiking, etc., when I have to be inside.   All the ads drain the joy from me.</review_text>
I used to buy this off the shelf each month, but last November, my wife bought me a subscription.   I bought the December issue,...cause it hadn't arrived by mail yet. No problem.  In January, I received the November issue.   A few weeks later, in early February, I received the December issue, but not the January, so I went out and bought the January.   By the end of February, still hadn't received the Feb yet, so bought it.  Then, received the January issue and a few weeks later the February.   I was fed up.   I know they were getting 'caught up', but not only was I getting editions that I'd already bought off the shelf, but I figured these were counting against my 12 issues.     I cancelled.  They deducted a few bucks from my refund for "issues received" and had no apologies for the mess.I like the magazine, but I will say that if you read it over time, it become redundant.   The suggested work-outs are mostly rehashes of past work-out routines.  Lets face it...there are only so many ways to work out and when you get right down to it, you gotta hit it hard and often, change things up, etc...bla bla bla...   The BEST part of the magazine are the few pages they dedicate to the correct way to execute a lift or detail what muscles are hit.   Lots of Weider ads...but then its a Weider publication, so what can you expect...I'd buy it off the shelf because you'll eventually get tired of the same old thing...and their subscription program is iffy.-</review_text>
I have been reading this mag off and on for the past 20 years.  As other reviews have said, I think I am just reading the same tired old stuff from three or four issues ago.  "Big Guns!"  "Huge Chest!"  "Massive Gains!"  These seem to be the ones you'll see featured about every other month in here.  As for adds?  Don't get me started on adds!   When half of your magazine is adds, it spells trouble.  Not only that, they need to specify to people who may not already know, "This mag's training tips are for people who do not work for a living and can spend 6-8 hours a day in the gym, eat 8-10 meals a day and spend MASSIVE amounts of cash on supplements."  In other words, people with no real responsibilities other than taking care of their physiques (Which as far as jobs go, that's a great one to have). I teach all day and into the night, literally, for me to eat and train like they require, I'd have to quit my day job, sell my kids into slavery, and become a homeless person.  In which case I'd have no money to have a gym membership.  I think you get the idea.On the positive side, the photos are awe-inspiring.  Also, to be realistic, it's a mag that has been around for decades upon decades.  How many different ways can you say, "Lift heavy, eat like a horse, and train like you have no other responsibilities in life"? It just becomes repetitive any way you slice it.  My recommendation would be to buy an issue or two every decade or so.  Buy January's "BIG GUNS" issue, and then February's "HUGE CHEST".  Then wait a decade and repeat.Good luck</review_text>
I'm referring to the U.K version of this magazine but my sentiments are the same as that written by most of the other reviewers. This mag has deteriorated so much over the last few years. I recent;y discouraged my son from reading this magazine as it almost resembled a soft porn mag! Also, if you were to follow the routines in this magazine, you will just end up overtrained and frustrated with your lack of results. Why? the rotuines listed here only work if you have 6 days a week and two hours a day to train. and it also requires that you live on supplements! Most of the 'champs' feautured in this magazine are just paid to say they use the supplements. in reality they are all surgically enhanced and are on large amounts of anabolic hormones. There is no way the routines in this mag will work for typical people. please look elsewhere</review_text>
I am sad it takes so long to send me my first issue-\Sure it would be good if I was ever to get one?Dave TumanNew Bern , NC</review_text>
Would love to review but have not received anything yet!  What's up wit dat?</review_text>
I use to buy this magazine every mouth when I was much younger which was just a big waste of money all the stories and pictures can be found in any other teen bop magazine. This magazine is not for people who can actually read or understand any of the stories</review_text>
I started reading this magazine because i needed something to read, but I stopped right away. Thr articles are pointless, because you can buy another magazine and see the same information, and same with the pictures. The editors of this magazine put exclamation points basically after every single sentence, none of which were exciting at all. Maybe i just hate Pop Star! just because i don't care for celebrity magazines. Or maybe not. But the only people I would recommend this magazine to is children under 10 years of age</review_text>
I cook almost everything from scratch, so I figured Home Cooking would be for people like me, who make the effort to make good quality home cooking without the silly ingredients you see in some of those gourmet magazines. Instead, recipes consist of packaged dough in a can, bottled sauces, etc. I don't need to read a magazine to figure out that I can put a jar of spaghetti sauce on some pasta and add velveeta to make a casserole!</review_text>
I made the mistake of subscribing to Make, based on the hype.  It turns out to be long and tedious, with instructions on how to make really messy junk of virtually no interest or use.  Successive issues have gone down hill, and by issue 4 they were dealing in vanity pictures of people's garage workshops.  Maybe you'll be the one in a million who wants to make useless junk, but buy a copy or two at the newstand before you subscribe.  It's not obviously wonderful</review_text>
Ordered 11/27 - Never received a single copy.  Not very fast is it?  SLOW COMPANY may be a better description.  Can I have my money back</review_text>
all you manager types.you know who you areyou read 'who moved the cheese' and jesus ceo,this is the mag for youlame, triteand oh so self importen</review_text>
I have always enjoyed every issue of Threads in the past.  The new format / contents does not appeal to me.  Threads is now a beginner sewing magazine like many others on the market.  Thread's was once a great magazine, the only one on the market for the intermediate and advanced sewers.  The projects were wonderful and I and other's I know kept every single issue.  Not now, there isn't really much in Thread's for the wearable art/advanced sewer.  I will really miss the couture finishing techniqes and other articles with new ideas. These articles were much more detailed than any book.  Because of this detail a sewer with some experience could use these articles to become an advanced sewer more quickly than buying many books. I only gave the 2 star's because it is a nice beginner magazine.  If you are new to sewing this is a good magazine, but the more advanced sewer's should pass this one up</review_text>
I purchased this item in January, but I haven't seen it yet. It take a long time</review_text>
Hi,I am sure I will love it, but I ordered it on Feb. 15th. and still haven't received the magazine. Maybe it is just published every few months. I do look forward to receiving the magazine.Sincerely,Becky Watkin</review_text>
I ordered this magazine as a gift.  Not only was there no gift card sent, but the company sent the magazine to me instead of gift recipient.  It took about 20 minutes on the phone with the subscription company to fix the problem and not once was there any mention of an apology for the inconvenience.  The biggest disappointment was not having a gift on time!</review_text>
but if they don't send you the magazine, then there are no way that you can contact the publisher about it.I didn't get the magazine after about first four issues.First, I didn't notice that I wasn't receiving my issues, but after three months, I found out and tried to contact the publisher about it.They don't have e-mail to contact them, but only automated phone number.If you call there and waste about 5 minutes to reach section "I didn't get my last issue", then you get about $.60 refund.No further explanation or guaranty my next issues.and I'm still not getting any issues.If you go to ripoff website, you can find the publisher was registered as ripoff company</review_text>
I ordered this magazine for my kids on 2/3 and have not received it yet</review_text>
I have not received even one issue yet, what seems to be the problem?????? I am giving no stars whatsoever, and I demand an explanation</review_text>
I ordered a subscription in jan and just received my first issue in may after several calls. Unfortunately, it is in Italian which is not mentioned in the details on amazon. they offered  to refund the remaining subscription but the first issue cost me $25. Unless you can read italian and are very patient, I would pass on this periodical.</review_text>
DO NOT order.  They only placed an order for 7 months but I got billed for 12.  After 3 hours on the phone they said that 7 months was all the publisher had available and they cannnot extend it.  After pitching a fit they offerred to give me a partial refund but cannot extend the subscription.  Only order from the magazine itself</review_text>
After reading a review here mentioning subscription issues I went directly to American Artists web site and ordered a subscription. That was November 23, 2005 and now Feb. 10, 2006 still no magazine. When I finally complained I got a request to send my credit info again to vnu@espcomp.com. Can't say from looking at that address that I have confidence I was communicating with American Artist or a magazine publisher. Would you send your credit info...I think not. I'd say don't blame Amazon as a previous reviewer did.  Hey, the magazine is good if you can get a subscription</review_text>
I was pleased with the magazine but even though I renewed my suscription for the third year (and I was charged!) I never got any more magazines. Upon requesting Amazon what had happened, they answered that they would not accept my renewal (no reason whatsoever) that they'd return my money (not yet, after 6 months) and that they would send 2 or 3 issues at no cost for my trouble...(I haven't gotten anything). I don't trust suscriptions throu Amazon anymore</review_text>
This was to go to my son who chose it in his wish list. Instead it is coming to me and I can get no response. PLEASE SEND THIS TO MY SON AND NOT TO M</review_text>
I ordered this item on 2/28/07 and I still have not received it...today is 4/19/07.  I want a refund ASAP.  And I've been on hold forever trying to resolve this...answer the phone</review_text>
Dear SirsAs per your records I purchased the subscribtion to Essence Magazine on08/19/2006. And today's date is November 6, 2006 and I've just recieved my first copy. I hope your company is keeping track of the delay in mailing this product. At this time I cannot give this product a rating.Respectfully, Elizabeth De Jesu</review_text>
I paid too much from Amazon.  The subscription would be significantly less expensive straight from the magazine.  I learned my lesson</review_text>
While the magazine itself is a great magazine (very informative)you can buy it through the cards that come in the magazine for far less money. Don't get ripped off. Buy it through the magazine</review_text>
We never receive the zoo books, so I am not sure how they are illustrated. My son is  very disappointed. I hope no one else orders from Zoo books, and if you have I hope you have not had the same problems as us. I have never had any problems with any of the merchants from Amazon.com. Hopefully since I never receive the Magazine as promise after emails and phone calls to them, they can at least reimburse us for the purchase amount</review_text>
I ordered Hamptons Magazine through Amazon.com back in October 2004.  I am still waiting for my first issue to arrive.</review_text>
Cooking Pleasures magazine is the magazine produced by the Cooking Club of America. I very happily joined Cooking Club of America, and began receiving this magazine quite a while ago. The Club offers so much to its subscribers, but as time wore on, I could see that the Marketing Department was a tad too aggressive for my taste.The Cooking Club of America offers their potential members numerous items to entice them to join. Members can take part in member-only contests where kitchen products and gift baskets are some of the prizes. They can be sent food items or kitchen products to review. They can also receive a cheese grater for joining!There are some nice photographs in this publication. The recipes are not complicated either, although they do require some unusual ingredients and some that are very expensive that many people would find hard to locate. I, personally, had to forego some recipes, and others; I had to order a couple of ingredients online, because of the reasons given.The cheese grater sent to you is a nice idea, but being it is a rotary grater, you have to squeeze very hard to get the cheese to grate. Also, the grater is made of plastic and eventually snaps in half after using it only a handful of times.The Club also offers you a Culinary Resource Directory. The information contained in this directory is not difficult to find in a basic Internet search. You can also receive standard sized blank recipe cards. Unfortunately, due to the size of recipe cards, I do not believe anyone can even write the ingredients onto them without running out of space.Also, part of the member benefits is to sample products for review. Potential members can see photographs of blenders, ice cream makers and much more. While a member there for three years, I did have the opportunity to review quick rise yeast and a chipotle spice. Both were nice products. They were not the glamorous photos of kitchen appliances, but it was something!Currently, they are offering a VISA credit card with their logo. With this card, not only can you use the card like any other credit card, but also you can receive club discounts. If this is something that appeals to you, see the Club for details.Approximately 3 months after you renew your own subscription, they start mailing you about how you should renew your membership for the following year now, so that you can help them keep club costs down. After just paying for the current year, I was not interested in paying for another year already. An idea may be to NOT contact members so soon after they just paid their subscriptions. That may save the club some money.I have Caller ID, and I utilize it all the time, screening my calls to specifically avoid telemarketing calls. Imagine my surprise when I pick up a call and it was a representative for Cooking Club of America. I was, actually, pleasantly surprised, thinking I was about to embark on another benefit of being a member. I was most disappointed to hear the mono-toned voice on the other end of the line, reading the script, suggesting I become a Lifetime Member now. When I tell them I am not interested, they have a "new" deal for me. When I still tell them I am not interested, they have yet another deal. The calls continued after this conversation for another couple of months.At this point, my subscription has expired. I was relieved as the telemarketing phone call really turned me off. You should have been there to see me receive my credit card statement. Cooking Club of America automatically charged my credit card with my next subscription without my permission. It was three months after my original subscription expired! As you can imagine, this was extremely upsetting.Upon doing my research for this article, I have come to find that others have had similar experiences with this magazine. It's a shame too, as this magazine has plenty of potential. Unfortunately, their marketing department could utilize different tactics in maintaining their current membership.Despite this magazine being very affordable, I recommend that you save your money on this one and try Fine Cooking, Cuisine at Home or Cook's Illustrated. Not only do these magazines provide better recipes, more professional tips, they also do not call you daily to get your money</review_text>
The magazine is very nice with color pictures and recipes that look okay, but that ingredients are either rare or expensive, the magazine is too fancy, and it's hard to find what the recipe is like. They don't put a review, you have to tell for yourself. And plus if it doesn't have a picture, you have to guess what's in it. I rate it one star. I'd rate it a half star if there was such thing, but there isn't. I wouldn't buy this magazine</review_text>
Big publication.  Little unique coverage.  The mag is very repetitive and lacking.  Almost no womens coverage.  Gee, are they not very hard working cycling athletes as well?  The same big name riders are always mentioned.  Definetly a US publication, not covering an international sport.  May have done more harm than good to cycling with the covers and article structure in 2005 having a lopsided, somewhat sensationalized, view of the doping issue.  I wouldn't subscribe again.  There are too many other good to excellent choices available</review_text>
An anti-Catholic newspaper in a Catholic town (this peculiar quality of the paper existed long before the priest-child sex abuse scandal in the area). Whether you are a Catholic or not the paper's anti-Catholic bias makes one wonder why it has such an ax to grind and wonder too if the paper does not hold other prejudices.  Its "factual reporting" often times  reads more like editorials. It has elitist pretensions without the quality to back them up.I live in the Boston area and am exasperated with the Globe. I prefer  reading the New York Times</review_text>
I'm very disappointed with this magazine.  It seems to be a total waste of money.  I found one article that was somewhat helpful and sometimes 2-3 pictures in each issue that give me some style ideas, but it's not worth the money or my time digging through it trying to find something I can use.</review_text>
Truth-be-told, I hated "HAVING" to give this magazine even one star, but that was the least I could do via this rating system. This magazine has some good writers but needs a new editor. Mr. Shoaf is very bad at his job, clearly, and seems to use and reuse the "buddy system" in using writers. Perhaps he gets a kickback? At any rate, this is, overall, a cruddy example of journalism. My facts tell me it should fall under fiction rather than nonfiction in many issues. I am done with it. Get a new editor and perhaps I will reinvestigate the publication. Until then, so long. I have no time for absolute rubbish</review_text>
I bought the magazin on november, and I don't recive it yet</review_text>
Have not received the produst yet- be prepared to wait a long time for Gardens Illustrade</review_text>
It is impossible to review this item as item was never received.  I have found it very difficult to contact anyone to find out where this item is</review_text>
If you don't tend to care about writing, then this would be the magazine for you.  Save your pennies and indulge on something else maybe</review_text>
I purchased this magazine solely to get cheaper access to ESPN Insider Online.  The magazine is so all over the place otherwise that its hardly worth reading.  Its chock full of tidbits that barely gloss over sports topics.  I keep it in my bathroom and I guess its good there when I only have a few minutes to read while brushing my teeth or whatnot.  Don't expect SI-type depth though, its full of ads and slick factoid type departments.  Reading this magazine is like watching Sportscenter, a lot of many little things with no depth on anything.  I guess its worth it for less than 60 cents an issue, but if I sat down to read this magazine cover to cover I would be done with it totally in under 15 minutes....enjoy</review_text>
I am sad it takes so long to send me my first issue-\Sure it would be good if I was ever to get one?Dave TumanNew Bern , NC</review_text>
I agree with Ms Hunters review, for me too many ads not enough depth on our relevant subjects</review_text>
But over the last 10 years it has just become another "muscle" mag that uses T&A to prop up its "bodybuilders".  I'm surprised its still around</review_text>
I'm not sure why this magazine is so highly rated. Sure it's an O.K. magazine, if you like immersing yourself in hype, marketing-speak and incredibly superficial language. Admittedly the pictures are pretty and as an obsessed mountain biker i can say we like bike porn. I just cannot read any of the articles. Chock full of over-the-top adjectives and 'xtreme' language. I don't trust a magazine that calls every new incremental advancement in biking technology 'revolutionary' or 'amazing' or any number of disgustingly inappropriate modifiers. They ceaselessly use vapid 'technical' jargon made up to sound high-minded and high-tech, but is nothing more than marketing spew.The tech advice column is full of suspicious letters that have the stench of stealth advertising. If there's one thing that's well thought-out about this magazine, it's how best to bombard the reader with sales pitches, half-truths and hype.In short, this magazine is blatant industry propaganda. My first advice: don't buy it. If you do buy it (for the love of god) don't take anything between those covers seriously.</review_text>
Many of us who have contibuted years of creative expertise to our field feel quite insulted by publications of this sort that attempt to "take a ride" on the creativity of others. My advice: Do not purchase, read, or advertise in this third-rate publication. There is little more credibility or validity than watching "Jerry Springer". Please, do not embarass yourself or your clients! Save this one for the bottom of the cat box only</review_text>
amazon sells a one year subscription for $14 which includes a $5 amazon certificate that you get later.in the actual magazine, the subscription card is 6.99 for one year or 2 years for $10.00so use the card, save some money and also dont have to wait for your $5 back and then find something at amazon that you can use the $5 certificate on.</review_text>
For some strange reason, I began receiving this magazine in the mail. Never ordered. Never paid for. My conclusion based on reading the last three issues: You're kidding me. How can Time Inc. still publish this rag? What's the point</review_text>
As someone who is very interested in healthy eating and living, I was actually appalled by this magazine.  It is ostensibly health conscious, but upon closer examination it ignores important health information.  For example, in one issue, it had a whole article about diabetes and how, thanks to the miracles of science, diabetics can now eat sugary foods.  It proceeded to give a table of artificial sweeteners explaining when to use which.  A truly health conscious person would know that aspartame is suspected of causing cancer, and that the only real way to avoid diabetes is to only include a reaonable and moderate amount of sugar in your diet.  I was disappointed with the magazine</review_text>
I used to love Light & Tasty, then they decided to change the look and format, even though reader surveys said keep it the same.  The new look is hard to read, and lacks the down-home feel that makes the magazines popular.  There are less pictures of the finished dishes, and the pictures they do show are smaller.  They added full page ads for thier country store products, which goes against the no ad promise.  I have subscribed for years, but this new look is horrible.  Get it at the store to see if you like it first</review_text>
The pantings are nice and colorful and mostly in oil but not enough technique shown to really be of help</review_text>
I bought a copy of this magazine and initially enjoyed a great deal of it, but ultimately found it distasteful.  It was graphically hyperactive, which became distracting and irritating, and there was something else that didn't seem quite right, though at first I couldn't identify just what that was.  Eventually I realized that it wasn't making a clear distinction between the editorial content and commerce (items offered by companies advertizing in the magazine, workshops sponsored by the magazine, books sold by the publisher of the magazine).  Eventually I figured out that the publisher was Australian.  If Rupert Murdoch is any guide, then this magazine is coming from a tradition that doesn't respect boundaries between journalism and financial gain.  I ended up putting this magazine aside in distaste</review_text>
I purchased subscription on December 23, 2006. Trusted Amazon to deliver a good service. The estimate for delivery was 4-6 weeks. Now, it is March 7, 2007; the magazine has never arrived; the provider of subscriptions first kept promising "any week now" but now they say I wouldn't start my subscription until mid-April. No explanation why. Cannot cancel and get a refund of $150. Extremely disappointed. Should have ordered directly - another French weekly, subscribed directed from the publisher a month ago and already received two issues. I am not even sure at this point I would receive my paid subscription for Paris-Match. I contacted the publisher and they told me they provide US subscriptions through a completely different agent. So, Amazon, what do I do now about my subscription</review_text>
The adage holds steady with this magazine.  What, to the hip consumer, appears to be a hopeful window into the world of cool turns out to be completely empty.  It would be insulting how hard they try to represent the scene of New York, if it weren't so embarrassing.  Get the village voice.  Try the other coast with Interview.  Just stay away from this disgusting fluff</review_text>
I started ordering Glamour 2 months ago, and honestly it is a huge disappointment to me. There are so many ads in this magazine its unbelievable. Ladies, my advice is to save your money for a different magazine..I dont recommend Glamour at all.</review_text>
I purchased subscriptions to both "Ask" and "Muse" for my daughter (9 years old) and am thrilled at the lack of advertising in those magazines.  I subscribed to "Young Rider," as my daughter is very much a horse lover.  I was dismayed to find it full of advertisements.  And not only that, but poor quality ads, irresponsible ads perpetuating gender stereotypes (e.g., males do not wear pink) and blatant consumerism ("From hoof to toe, wear the brand.")  While I'm using the magazine as a means for teaching media literacy, we certainly will not be resubscribing.  As to the content, it does seem informative, especially for a beginning rider, though the writing is not particularly compelling.  And the articles are hard to find amidst all the marketing, making it visually confusing.  While my daughter picked up her first issue of "Ask," sat down and did not get up until she'd read it cover to cover, she picked up "Young Rider," glanced through it, tossed it back down and has not yet returned to her first issue.  And this is a child who is horse crazy -- not much of a testimonial for a horse magazine</review_text>
Placed subscription order on 6/29.  It's 8/16 today and I have yet to get my first issue.  :</review_text>
I ordered this thinking it was a Magazine, it is more like a newspaper. It has good information, but it was not what I thought it would be.</review_text>
I subscribed in Sept 04 and still have not received any single issue (as of Jan 05). There is no phone number or email address, so the only way to contact them is by mail, only they don't respond. They took my money, and I never heard from them again.Finally I had enough and subscribed to Garden Gate Magazine instead. They are prompt and efficient, and the magazine is great</review_text>
Where's the content in this magazine.  ADs...ads...ads.  They try and make themselves out to be a great golf travel magazine, but I have seen much better in other publications.  I agree with the woman from England...Links loads up on these inserts.  I like to read a magazine like The Golfer, where they travel all over the world and review spectacular courses from the Carribbean to New Zealand</review_text>
This magazine makes girls who feel geeky and nerdy bad, and girls who are normal teens who have crushes, and like to stay in style, terrible! Plus, this magazine is sexist! It doesn't have models anywhere, because it says that it makes girls feel bad! If you want a magazine that is good and inspires, read American Girls, or Girls Life!</review_text>
Look at the price of this magazine! Over $30 for 6 magazines! I once read one of these magazines at the library and I hated it! There were NO articles about celebrities, Tv, Music, or Beauty. There were some good advice questions in this, but it didn't give any advice for them! It said, "Find the answers to these questions in the next issue of New Moon." Also, in the mail bag, someone wrote, "Why didn't you put Martin luther King day on your calendar?" They wrote back, "sorry, this magazine is ONLY about girls and women." This magazine is really anti-male and disses girls that act like normal teenagers. If you want to get a good magazine, try Girls Life for almost half the price that New Moon is</review_text>
I have seen many craft magazines come and go.  I hope this one goes.  Granted, there is no commercial advertising in it, but paying anything over $1.98 per issue would be too much.  The crafts are mainly useless, juvenile, and lack polish.  I purchased my subscription sight unseen because it was through supporting a local school (the only saving grace to this whole experience), but that is a mistake I will not make again.  It took at least three months after ordering it that I finally received my first issue.  I opened it with great expectation of finding original and practical crafts for my home, but was immediately thoroughly disappointed. Thankfully, my subscription will be expiring soon.If you are a serious crafter, I recommend passing by this one.</review_text>
It is hard to review a magazine that I have yet to receive even though it was order 12/04/2005.  Please let me know when I can expect to receive my 1st issue</review_text>
What is it with these gossip magazines?? Please tell me, because I truly think NO ONE in their right mind would ever subscribe to this garbage. All it is is mindless crap that the media puts into kids minds, while not having anything important else in the magazine. Unless your 10 years old, do NOT subscribe to this. There are better magazines out there fortunately, like Seventeen and CosmoGIRL! which aren't nearly as filled with garbage like this. The reason you don't see J-14 or this magazine or any other magazine like this on the top of the magazine list is because it has no effect on people, it's for little kids and it's not mature. PERIOD.</review_text>
Like a reviewer below said, this magazine was good a while back. Try back in 2002. It used to have better tips and less filler. Now, it's all filler. Seriously. There are maybe 5 quizzes which don't say much, a "dream decoder" which is complete phooey, and yes, the many tweeny posters that I'd be embarassed to have on my wall, even if I were 11. I grew, but sadly, this magazine did not, let alone stay the same. Nothing is serious in here, it's like the magazines that tweenybopper brats read.Age reccomendation: 9-12Simply put, this magazine is like M Magazine, but not as infantile</review_text>
I am 14. I used to read this about two and a half years ago. It was a pretty good magazine back then, with health tips, some real life stories, and even things like sex questions (which is saying alot more than some of these other magazines.) It wasn't packed full of teenyboppers and cheesy glitter makeup. I liked it, and if it was still the way it was, I'd probably still be reading it. But now, it's gone. I read my last issue one year ago and gave it up. It got way to young for me. All they talk about is celebrities (aka JoJo, Good Charlotte, Hilary Duff, Jesse McCartney, Usher, etc.) Alright, two of them make some passable music, but what about the others? They're talentless! Plus, I do not see anything that would appeal to anyone over the age of 13. They refer to guys as "hotties" and "babes," and they just put the same person on every five pages! There are stupid quizzes to tell you your kissing type or how psychic you are (seriously.) Half the magazine is huge posters for your room of airbrushed teeneyboppers. If you want a magazine with real substance, try Seventeen (highly reccomended), CosmoGirl, Teen Vogue, and maybe Teen People (I don't know, it's kind of lost its fun factor.) Some of these magazines may not be "appropriate" to the people that read this magazine, but I personally think it is better for young girls to learn the hard honest truth about the world than to be obsessed with pop stars and the latest Mary-Kate and Ashley gossip.</review_text>
When I was 9 I loved this magazine. It seemed so gown-up to be reading this when my friends were still playing dolls. Now when I read it all I find is trash. The magazine dosen't have one useful article in it. Unlike Seventeen or Cosmogirl! there are no real life stories or health articles just trash about stars. All the quizzes are the same thing. They repeat and repeat and repeat. And about the stars. Puh-leeze! I don't care if Hilary Duff is dating Joel or not, nor do I want to know if Ashlee Simson dies her hair herself or goes to a salon. I don't reccomend this magazine to anyone. If you have nothing to do than go ahead and read it, but you won't enjoy it if you've ever read a real magazine like Seventeen or Ellegirl</review_text>
It is beyond me why any pre-teen or teen would want to read this kind of magazine. I was reading this magazine a couple of weeks ago on a ski trip because my 13-year old friend happens to get it in her mail. The truth is, this magazine lacks substance.I don't see why people even care what JoJo's friend thinks about her being a celebrity, how MK is recovering in the hospital from being anorexic or what Jesse McCartney's marital status is.  Leave the celebs alone; let them live their life. I've seen the same things printed in this magazine over and over. This magazine is shallow and is downright materialistic (i.e. some articles that I have seen on various covers were "Get him to do anything you want!", "What's Jesse McCartney's nickname?" and "Terrified of being alone?").I don't like most magazines, but if you want a mag with REAL substance, look forth for Seventeen or CosmoGIRL! magazine. And to the preteens--skip this magazine. The editors write at a level that 2nd graders can understand. Read anything but this--your local newspaper, even National Geographic (one of my favorites). This magazine is $17 for 10 issues--don't you think that's a bit pricey? If you're a parent, please don't buy your daughter this mindless garbage. Can't you find anything decent for your kids to read?</review_text>
I must say that I've read just about every teen magazine on the market, and this is by far the worst one I've ever read. However, at this point in my life, everything appears superficial and immature.I first picked up Twist when it debuted on newsstands. I believe that was in August 1997. I was nine then, and looking to be fashion forward among my girlfriends who were still into the Jungle Gym. Because of my insane desire to be cool, and because Twist wasn't too hard for me to understand, I loved it and bought it religiously for about a year. My obsession with it slowly faded as the magazine got progressively worse and I didn't pick it up again......until my junior year in high school. Looking through a then-current issue of the magazine, I noticed that the way in which it was written was MADE to be comprehensible to a nine year-old, or the lowest common denomination of older teenage readers. What I'm trying to say is this magazine is totally dumbed-down. It doesn't give girls any credit for being able to think creatively, let alone read above a fourth-grade level.I also found the content to be more childish and superficial than other teen magazines (although they are all superficial to an extent - that doesn't mean they don't make delightfully fun and entertaining reading to share with friends). Therefore, I recommend this magazine to tweens (9-13), and tweens only. But even they can do better than this magazine. Older readers should check out the somewhat more sophisticated 'Elle Girl' or 'Cosmo Girl', my two personal favorites.P.S. I agree with one of the other reviewers who pointed out the numerous spelling errors in the magazine. Possibly my biggest caveat is the constant misuse of the apostrophe (i.e. Tuesday's instead of Tuesdays).</review_text>
How's J-Lo doing? Are Jennifer and Brad Pitt still together? What are the Olsen twins up to? Is Orlando Bloom a hottie or what?? Well...WHO THE HELL CARES??? I got better things to care about than some news about these celebrities--people I've never actually met, let alone "know." Please, teenagers should be steered away from this kind of worthless, trashy magazine (other examples include Seventeen, YM, Teen People, and the list goes on). There are other issues which happen to be more important, you know. Try National Geographic or The New Yorker instead. The newspapers are also good</review_text>
I have never received a copy of this magazine that I ordered in August of last year!  They didn't hesitate to take my money though!  I have no idea if the magazine has any redeemable articles in it at all</review_text>
I received this magazine as a gift... and I will not renew. Articles are very short and refer you to websites, telephone numbers, etc. for more information. Why so little information in the magazine itself?Additionally, there is a load of advertising: take that out of the equation and the magazine would only be a few pages long.For my money, there is much more available elsewhere, including a "google" search. Waste of paper, IMHO</review_text>
When I bought this magazine subscription I was under the impression that is for the Cosmo that is sold/printed in Spain.  I was wrong.  When my first issue arrived I see that it's nothing more than the United States/English version translated into Spanish.  These 2 magazines are very different in content.  While I'll read this, I will not renew.  Just a "heads up" for anyone who wants to purchase this magazine</review_text>
This is just like the English version but in Spanish. The content does not reflect the culture or morals of the general Latino people. Nearly all models (especially on the cover) are white and/or American and are very thin and tall. They try to use photos of American celebrities when they have brown hair, for example Christina Aguilera, Mandy Moore, Angelina Jolie or just natural brunettes like Catherine Zeta-Jones. Maybe Cosmo thinks we're too ignorant and can be easily fooled by the dark hair dye job or the computer generated tans. There are tons of beautiful and succesful Latinas that could easily be placed on the covers but I think they'd rather just use the same photos that they already took for their English-version magazines. The ads are also for high-end American and European products. I've bought this magazine in Mexico and while it still has the same problems at least they feature real Mexicans and Mexican products in some of the ads.If you want a magazine that more reflects Latino culture, although it's mostly in English, get Latina Magazine. They use lots of Latina models and it's more relevant to Latin-American women and people interested in Latino culture</review_text>
the company is taking for ever to send me the magazines I ordered. They has charged my account over 3 months ago and not yet deliver a single copy of its magazines. when I call the company they dont have a number to call or a way they can be accounted for their wrong doing. IWANT MY MAGAZINES OR MY MONEY BACK NOT ANY MORE SORY WE ARE SENDINGT IT TO YOU....</review_text>
Trashy magazine, it only focuses on sex. Like ifsex is going to solve your emotional problems.This culture is so obssesed with sex.If you really want to read about relationships,I recommend "save your marriage before it starts"it gives you real info from two psychologist whymarriage is going downhill and how you can save it</review_text>
You know "Blush" magazine? Its fictional headquarters are the set of the NBC sitcom Just Shoot Me. You read their headlines and article ideas, and you know they're based on this little piece of waste! What shocks me is that I know 13-year-old girls get their dose of sex and guys information from it. Very shallow, they try to be so sophisticated it ends up being naive! Stay away from i</review_text>
As a new elementary art teacher, I do not find School Arts to be a very helpful magazine at all.  Other educators write in general ideas about lessons to teach, but do not specifically outline materials, vocabulary, procedures, safety cautions, steps, or ways to integrate art lessons with general subject areas.  I was also hoping for large posters to use with lessons.  The posters and art lessons in Instructor magazine are much more hands on and usefull.  Also, because the magazine has lessons for all ages and grades, there are only a couple of lessons to work with on the elementary level.  I will not renew my subscription on this magazine.  New copies I receive lay around unopened and useless</review_text>
We paid for a 12 month subscription and I got the magazine for about 4 months. I couldn't get anyone to answer why it stopped and basically they just took my money. I didn't get a 12 month subscription. I got ripped off.Plus when I did get the issues they are very poor paper quality and the covers and some of the pages were always ripped and bent up. Very disapointing...</review_text>
The only reason I subscribe is i found a free subscription somewhere. The magazine had some interesting articles but Most of the time they are just completely wrong. One example was a preview to last years NFL draft. They talked up Terrell Suggs in a long article to the point he was definetely going at the latest third even with the quaterback needy Bengals and the lions who really wanted rogers were finding it hard to take a pass at him. Where does he end up? Going to the Baltimore Ravens. Not even his homestate team the cardinals wanted him. Another example is the cover of the their college football preview. They picked Auburn to be their national champions. I don't follow college football enough to understand, but I know auburn lost its first two games and doesn't look much like a team vying for a national championship. I'm not saying that Sports Illustrated is perfect and their picks are always accurate, but they seem to me to get a better grasp on sports. Yes Sports Illustrated has ads, but looking through my last issue it doesn't seem that  The Sporting News has any less. It takes a while till you get at least two consecutive non ad pages. It seems like they both have the same amount. And even if One had more ads than the others is it that hard to really turn the page? Are you that lazy? The articles are the important thing and not many people say that the ones in Sporting news are better. I'd like to hear what some people thought were so nonsports related in sports illustrated. I personally haven't seen anything non sports relat1ed. Yes they have reviews of the occasional sports themed book and movie but they are usually short just letting fans know whether its worth it</review_text>
I ordered this magazine as a gift, and, so far, the first two issues have been sent to me rather than to the intended gift recipient.  There must be a better way to handle gift subscriptions.  I supplied the address of the gift recipient when I placed this order.  The same thing happened last year, and I do not intend to order gifts from Amazon again</review_text>
I used to subscribe to this when it was ALL NATURAL.  Then overnight they went to all drugs and sleaze and childish nonsense.  I tried to get a refund but was ignored.  Unable to cancel my subscription I simply threw it into the trash can each month before my children would see it.  I hate this magazine and would not allow it in my house once it was filled with nothing but drugs and insults.  Thank god there are much better alternatives.  Actually, any magazine any where is better.  If and when they switch back to ALL NATURAL I may buy it again, until then NO WAY!!</review_text>
This is a disgusting rag full of Synthol articles, profanity, porn, and blurry black-and-white photos.  It has nothing positive to say about bodybuilding, and it's obvious publisher Steve Blechman only wants to destroy competitive bodybuilding at any cost</review_text>
this is great if you're a hobbyist.  or a maker of hotel..no motel paintings.sucks if you're not</review_text>
